Indiana, session 2026, HB1004.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-1-11.5-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.244-2017,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) This section applies only to a school
corporation that has an ADM of more than fifteen thousand (15,000)
for the school corporation's most recent fall count. Notwithstanding any
other law, a school corporation subject to this section may not issue
bonds after August 15, 2020, unless the school corporation has for its
preceding budget year prepared an annual financial report using the
modified accrual basis of accounting in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles. However, upon request of a school
corporation to the state examiner, the state examiner may waive the
requirement under this section if the state examiner determines that a
waiver is in the best interest of the school corporation.
(b) If a school corporation described in subsection (a) uses the
accounting described in subsection (a), the school corporation may
not be required to use another form of accounting.
SECTION 2. IC 5-11-10-1.6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.6. (a) As used in this section, "governmental
entity" refers to any of the following:
HEA 1004 — Concur

2
(1) A municipality (as defined in IC 36-1-2-11).
(2) A school corporation (as defined in IC 36-1-2-17), including
a school extracurricular account.
(3) A county.
(4) A regional water or sewer district organized under IC 13-26
or under IC 13-3-2 (before its repeal).
(5) A municipally owned utility that is subject to IC 8-1.5-3 or
IC 8-1.5-4.
(6) A board of an airport authority under IC 8-22-3.
(7) A board of aviation commissioners under IC 8-22-2.
(8) A conservancy district.
(9) A public transportation corporation under IC 36-9-4.
(10) A commuter transportation district under IC 8-5-15.
(11) The state.
(12) A solid waste management district established under
IC 13-21 or IC 13-9.5 (before its repeal).
(13) A levee authority established under IC 14-27-6.
(14) A county building authority under IC 36-9-13.
(15) A soil and water conservation district established under
IC 14-32.
(16) The northwestern Indiana regional planning commission
established by IC 36-7-7.6-3.
(b) As used in this section, "claim" means a bill or an invoice
submitted to a governmental entity for goods or services.
(c) The fiscal officer of a governmental entity may not draw a
warrant or check for payment of a claim unless all of the following
apply:
(1) There is a fully itemized invoice or bill for the claim.
(2) The invoice or bill is approved by the officer or person
receiving the goods and services.
(3) The invoice or bill is filed with the governmental entity's fiscal
officer.
(4) The fiscal officer audits and certifies before payment that the
invoice or bill is true and correct.
(5) Payment of the claim is allowed by the governmental entity's
legislative body or the board or official having jurisdiction over
allowance of payment of the claim.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c), the following are permitted:
(1) A school corporation, with prior approval of the board having
jurisdiction over allowance of payment of the claim, may make
payment in advance of receipt of services as allowed by
guidelines developed under IC 20-20-13-10. IC 20-20.5-6-5.
HEA 1004 — Concur

3
(2) A municipality may make advance payment of meal expenses
to a municipal employee who will be traveling on official
municipal business if the municipal fiscal body has adopted an
ordinance allowing the advance payment. An ordinance adopted
under this subdivision must provide for all of the following:
(A) The maximum amount that may be paid in advance.
(B) The required invoices and other documentation that must
be submitted by the municipal employee.
(C) Reimbursement from the wages of the municipal employee
if the municipal employee does not submit the required
invoices and documentation.
(3) A political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13) may make
advance payments to contractors to enable the contractors to
purchase materials needed for a public works project of the
political subdivision. The solicitation for the public works
contract providing for advance payment for contractors under this
subdivision must include the following information:
(A) That the political subdivision will make advance payments
to contractors to enable contractors to purchase materials.
(B) Any limitations on the amount of advance payments that
will be made.
(C) Requirements for documentation relating to making
advance payments to contractors for materials.
(D) Any other information about advance payment for
materials the political subdivision considers useful to
contractors that make offers.
(4) A political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13) may make
advance payments for goods or services before the goods are
delivered or services are completed if the fiscal body of the
political subdivision authorizes making advance payments. If the
fiscal body of the political subdivision authorizes making advance
payments, the local fiscal officer or the local fiscal officer's
designee must do all of the following when advance payments are
made:
(A) Track prepayments by defining the prepayment on a
purchase order.
(B) Create a prepayment invoice that is associated with the
purchase order.
(C) Require insurance or a surety bond in the amount of the
prepayment if the amount of the prepayment is more than one
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).
(e) Advance payments made under subsection (d)(3) or (d)(4) may
HEA 1004 — Concur

4
not exceed the lesser of the following:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the entire cost of the contract.
(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000).
(f) The fiscal officer of a governmental entity shall issue checks or
warrants for claims by the governmental entity that meet all of the
requirements of this section. The fiscal officer does not incur personal
liability for disbursements:
(1) processed in accordance with this section; and
(2) for which funds are appropriated and available.
(g) The certification provided for in subsection (c)(4) must be on a
form prescribed by the state board of accounts.
SECTION 3. IC 5-22-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.140-2022,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. Except as provided in this article, this article
does not apply to the following:
(1) The commission for higher education.
(2) A state educational institution. However, IC 5-22-5-9 and
IC 5-22-15 apply to a state educational institution.
(3) Military officers and military and armory boards of the state.
(4) An entity established by the general assembly as a body
corporate and politic. However, IC 5-22-15 applies to a body
corporate and politic.
(5) A local hospital authority under IC 5-1-4.
(6) A municipally owned utility under IC 8-1-11.1 or IC 8-1.5.
(7) Hospitals established and operated under IC 16-22-1 through
IC 16-22-5, IC 16-22-8, IC 16-23-1, or IC 16-24-1.
(8) A library board under IC 36-12-3-16(b).
(9) A local housing authority under IC 36-7-18.
(10) Tax exempt Indiana nonprofit corporations leasing and
operating a city market owned by a political subdivision.
(11) A person paying for a purchase or lease with funds other than
public funds.
(12) A person that has entered into an agreement with a
governmental body under IC 5-23.
(13) A municipality for the operation of municipal facilities used
for the collection, treatment, purification, and disposal in a
sanitary manner of liquid and solid waste, sewage, night soil, and
industrial waste.
(14) The department of financial institutions established by
IC 28-11-1-1.
(15) The insurance commissioner in retaining an examiner for
purposes of IC 27-1-3.1-9.
HEA 1004 — Concur

5
(16) The department of natural resources for the procurement of
supplies purchased for resale at properties owned or managed by
the department of natural resources.
(17) The Indiana horse racing commission in making an
expenditure under IC 4-31-3-15(b).
(18) An entity that has entered into a memorandum of
understanding with the department of education under
IC 20-20-38.5-2(a)(2). IC 20-20.5-11-2(a)(2).
SECTION 4. IC 6-1.1-20-3.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.1. (a) Subject to section 3.5(a)(1)(C) of this
chapter, this section applies only to the following:
(1) A controlled project (as defined in section 1.1 of this chapter
as in effect June 30, 2008) for which the proper officers of a
political subdivision make a preliminary determination in the
manner described in subsection (b) before July 1, 2008.
(2) An elementary school building, middle school building, high
school building, or other school building for academic instruction
that:
(A) is a controlled project;
(B) will be used for any combination of kindergarten through
grade 12; and
(C) will not cost more than the lesser of the following:
(i) The threshold amount determined under this item. In the
case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before January 1,
2018, making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease for the project, the threshold amount is ten
million dollars ($10,000,000). In the case of an ordinance or
resolution adopted after December 31, 2017, and before
January 1, 2019, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, the threshold
amount is fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000). In the case
of an ordinance or resolution adopted in a calendar year after
December 31, 2018, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, the threshold
amount is an amount (as determined by the department of
local government finance) equal to the result of the
maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by the threshold
amount determined under this item for the preceding
calendar year. In the case of a threshold amount determined
under this item that applies for a calendar year after
HEA 1004 — Concur

6
December 31, 2018, the department of local government
finance shall publish the threshold in the Indiana Register
under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60) days after the
date the budget agency releases the maximum levy growth
quotient for the ensuing year under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(ii) An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date, if that total gross assessed value
is more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000), or ten
million dollars ($10,000,000), if the total gross assessed
value of property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date is not more than one billion dollars
($1,000,000,000).
(3) Any other controlled project that:
(A) is not a controlled project described in subdivision (1) or
(2); and
(B) will not cost the political subdivision more than the lesser
of the following:
(i) The threshold amount determined under this item. In the
case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before January 1,
2018, making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease for the project, the threshold amount is
twelve million dollars ($12,000,000). In the case of an
ordinance or resolution adopted after December 31, 2017,
and before January 1, 2019, making a preliminary
determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for the
project, the threshold amount is fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000). In the case of an ordinance or resolution
adopted in a calendar year after December 31, 2018, making
a preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a
lease for the project, the threshold amount is an amount (as
determined by the department of local government finance)
equal to the result of the maximum levy growth quotient
determined under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by
the threshold amount determined under this item for the
preceding calendar year. In the case of a threshold amount
determined under this item that applies for a calendar year
after December 31, 2018, the department of local
government finance shall publish the threshold in the
Indiana Register under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60)
days after the date the budget agency releases the maximum
levy growth quotient for the ensuing year under
HEA 1004 — Concur

7
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(ii) An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date, if that total gross assessed value
is more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), or
one million dollars ($1,000,000), if the total gross assessed
value of property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date is not more than one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000).
(4) A controlled project funded by debt service if the scope of the
project changes from the purpose of the project initially
advertised to taxpayers as determined under section 4.2(c) of this
chapter.
(5) This subdivision does not apply to a project for which a public
hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been conducted
under IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2023, or to a project for which
an ordinance or resolution making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease is adopted after June 30, 2025.
Any other controlled project if both of the following apply:
(A) The political subdivision's total debt service tax rate is
more than forty cents ($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100)
of assessed value, but less than eighty cents ($0.80) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value.
(B) The controlled project is not otherwise described in section
3.5(a)(1) of this chapter.
This subdivision expires December 31, 2025. For purposes of this
subdivision, a political subdivision's total debt service tax rate
does not include a tax rate imposed in a referendum debt service
levy approved by voters.
(6) Any other controlled project if the following apply:
(A) An ordinance or resolution making a preliminary
determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for the
project is adopted after June 30, 2025.
(B) The controlled project is not otherwise described in section
3.5(a)(1) of this chapter.
(C) In the case of a:
(i) school corporation, the school corporation's total debt
service tax rate is more than forty cents ($0.40) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value, but not more than
seventy cents ($0.70) per one hundred dollars ($100) of
assessed value;
(ii) city, county, or town, the city's, county's, or town's total
HEA 1004 — Concur

8
debt service tax rate is more than twenty-five cents ($0.25)
per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value, but not
more than forty cents ($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100)
of assessed value; or
(iii) political subdivision not described in item (i) or (ii), the
political subdivision's total debt service tax rate is more than
five cents ($0.05) per one hundred dollars ($100) of
assessed value, but not more than ten cents ($0.10) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value.
However, this subdivision does not apply to a project for which a
public hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been
conducted under IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2025. For purposes
of this subdivision, a political subdivision's total debt service tax
rate does not include a tax rate imposed in a referendum debt
service tax levy approved by voters.
(b) A political subdivision may not impose property taxes to pay
debt service on bonds or lease rentals on a lease for a controlled project
without completing the following procedures:
(1) The proper officers of a political subdivision shall publish
notice in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and send notice by first class
mail to the circuit court clerk and to any organization that delivers
to the officers, before January 1 of that year, an annual written
request for such notices of any meeting to consider adoption of a
resolution or an ordinance making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease and shall conduct at least two (2)
public hearings on a preliminary determination before adoption
of the resolution or ordinance. The political subdivision must at
each of the public hearings on the preliminary determination
allow the public to testify regarding the preliminary determination
and must make the following information available to the public
at each of the public hearings on the preliminary determination,
in addition to any other information required by law:
(A) The result of the political subdivision's current and
projected annual debt service payments divided by the net
assessed value of taxable property within the political
subdivision.
(B) The result of:
(i) the sum of the political subdivision's outstanding long
term debt plus the outstanding long term debt of other taxing
units that include any of the territory of the political
subdivision; divided by
(ii) the net assessed value of taxable property within the
HEA 1004 — Concur

9
political subdivision.
(C) The information specified in subdivision (3)(A) through
(3)(H).
(2) When the proper officers of a political subdivision make a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for
a controlled project, the officers shall give notice of the
preliminary determination by:
(A) publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1; and
(B) first class mail to the circuit court clerk. and to the
organizations described in subdivision (1).
(3) A notice under subdivision (2) of the preliminary
determination of the political subdivision to issue bonds or enter
into a lease for a controlled project must include the following
information:
(A) The maximum term of the bonds or lease.
(B) The maximum principal amount of the bonds or the
maximum lease rental for the lease.
(C) The estimated interest rates that will be paid and the total
interest costs associated with the bonds or lease.
(D) The purpose of the bonds or lease.
(E) A statement that any owners of property within the
political subdivision or registered voters residing within the
political subdivision who want to initiate a petition and
remonstrance process against the proposed debt service or
lease payments must file a petition that complies with
subdivisions (4) and (5) not later than thirty (30) days after
publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1.
(F) With respect to bonds issued or a lease entered into to
open:
(i) a new school facility; or
(ii) an existing facility that has not been used for at least
three (3) years and that is being reopened to provide
additional classroom space;
the estimated costs the school corporation expects to incur
annually to operate the facility.
(G) A statement of whether the school corporation expects to
appeal for a new facility adjustment (as defined in
IC 20-45-1-16 (repealed) before January 1, 2009) for an
increased maximum permissible tuition support levy to pay the
estimated costs described in clause (F).
(H) The following information:
(i) The political subdivision's current debt service levy and
HEA 1004 — Concur

10
rate.
(ii) The estimated increase to the political subdivision's debt
service levy and rate that will result if the political
subdivision issues the bonds or enters into the lease.
(iii) The estimated amount of the political subdivision's debt
service levy and rate that will result during the following ten
(10) years if the political subdivision issues the bonds or
enters into the lease, after also considering any changes that
will occur to the debt service levy and rate during that
period on account of any outstanding bonds or lease
obligations that will mature or terminate during that period.
(I) The information specified in subdivision (1)(A) through
(1)(B).
(4) After notice is given, a petition requesting the application of
a petition and remonstrance process may be filed by the lesser of:
(A) five hundred (500) persons who are either owners of
property within the political subdivision or registered voters
residing within the political subdivision; or
(B) five percent (5%) of the registered voters residing within
the political subdivision.
(5) The state board of accounts shall design and, upon request by
the county voter registration office, deliver to the county voter
registration office or the county voter registration office's
designated printer the petition forms to be used solely in the
petition process described in this section. The county voter
registration office shall issue to an owner or owners of property
within the political subdivision or a registered voter residing
within the political subdivision the number of petition forms
requested by the owner or owners or the registered voter. Each
form must be accompanied by instructions detailing the
requirements that:
(A) the carrier and signers must be owners of property or
registered voters;
(B) the carrier must be a signatory on at least one (1) petition;
(C) after the signatures have been collected, the carrier must
swear or affirm before a notary public that the carrier
witnessed each signature; and
(D) govern the closing date for the petition period.
Persons requesting forms may be required to identify themselves
as owners of property or registered voters and may be allowed to
pick up additional copies to distribute to other owners of property
or registered voters. Each person signing a petition must indicate
HEA 1004 — Concur

11
whether the person is signing the petition as a registered voter
within the political subdivision or is signing the petition as the
owner of property within the political subdivision. A person who
signs a petition as a registered voter must indicate the address at
which the person is registered to vote. A person who signs a
petition as an owner of property must indicate the address of the
property owned by the person in the political subdivision.
(6) Each petition must be verified under oath by at least one (1)
qualified petitioner in a manner prescribed by the state board of
accounts before the petition is filed with the county voter
registration office under subdivision (7).
(7) Each petition must be filed with the county voter registration
office not more than thirty (30) days after publication under
subdivision (2) of the notice of the preliminary determination.
(8) The county voter registration office shall determine whether
each person who signed the petition is a registered voter.
However, after the county voter registration office has determined
that at least five hundred twenty-five (525) persons who signed
the petition are registered voters within the political subdivision,
the county voter registration office is not required to verify
whether the remaining persons who signed the petition are
registered voters. If the county voter registration office does not
determine that at least five hundred twenty-five (525) persons
who signed the petition are registered voters, the county voter
registration office shall, not more than fifteen (15) business days
after receiving a petition, forward a copy of the petition to the
county auditor. Not more than ten (10) business days after
receiving the copy of the petition, the county auditor shall provide
to the county voter registration office a statement verifying:
(A) whether a person who signed the petition as a registered
voter but is not a registered voter, as determined by the county
voter registration office, is the owner of property in the
political subdivision; and
(B) whether a person who signed the petition as an owner of
property within the political subdivision does in fact own
property within the political subdivision.
(9) The county voter registration office, not more than ten (10)
business days after determining that at least five hundred
twenty-five (525) persons who signed the petition are registered
voters or receiving the statement from the county auditor under
subdivision (8), as applicable, shall make the final determination
of the number of petitioners that are registered voters in the
HEA 1004 — Concur

12
political subdivision and, based on the statement provided by the
county auditor, the number of petitioners that own property within
the political subdivision. Whenever the name of an individual
who signs a petition form as a registered voter contains a minor
variation from the name of the registered voter as set forth in the
records of the county voter registration office, the signature is
presumed to be valid, and there is a presumption that the
individual is entitled to sign the petition under this section. Except
as otherwise provided in this chapter, in determining whether an
individual is a registered voter, the county voter registration office
shall apply the requirements and procedures used under IC 3 to
determine whether a person is a registered voter for purposes of
voting in an election governed by IC 3. However, an individual is
not required to comply with the provisions concerning providing
proof of identification to be considered a registered voter for
purposes of this chapter. A person is entitled to sign a petition
only one (1) time in a particular petition and remonstrance
process under this chapter, regardless of whether the person owns
more than one (1) parcel of real property, mobile home assessed
as personal property, or manufactured home assessed as personal
property, or a combination of those types of property within the
subdivision and regardless of whether the person is both a
registered voter in the political subdivision and the owner of
property within the political subdivision. Notwithstanding any
other provision of this section, if a petition is presented to the
county voter registration office within forty-five (45) days before
an election, the county voter registration office may defer acting
on the petition, and the time requirements under this section for
action by the county voter registration office do not begin to run
until five (5) days after the date of the election.
(10) The county voter registration office must file a certificate and
each petition with:
(A) the township trustee, if the political subdivision is a
township, who shall present the petition or petitions to the
township board; or
(B) the body that has the authority to authorize the issuance of
the bonds or the execution of a lease, if the political
subdivision is not a township;
within thirty-five (35) business days of the filing of the petition
requesting a petition and remonstrance process. The certificate
must state the number of petitioners that are owners of property
within the political subdivision and the number of petitioners who
HEA 1004 — Concur

13
are registered voters residing within the political subdivision.
If a sufficient petition requesting a petition and remonstrance process
is not filed by owners of property or registered voters as set forth in this
section, the political subdivision may issue bonds or enter into a lease
by following the provisions of law relating to the bonds to be issued or
lease to be entered into.
(c) A political subdivision may not divide a controlled project in
order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this
chapter. A person that owns property within a political subdivision or
a person that is a registered voter residing within a political subdivision
may file a petition with the department of local government finance
objecting that the political subdivision has divided a controlled project
in order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this
chapter. The petition must be filed not more than ten (10) days after the
political subdivision gives notice of the political subdivision's decision
to issue bonds or enter into leases for a capital project that the person
believes is the result of a division of a controlled project that is
prohibited by this subsection. If the department of local government
finance receives a petition under this subsection, the department shall
not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the petition make a final
determination on the issue of whether the political subdivision divided
a controlled project in order to avoid the requirements of this section
and section 3.2 of this chapter. If the department of local government
finance determines that a political subdivision divided a controlled
project in order to avoid the requirements of this section and section
3.2 of this chapter and the political subdivision continues to desire to
proceed with the project, the political subdivision shall fulfill the
requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this chapter, if
applicable, regardless of the cost of the project in dispute. A political
subdivision shall be considered to have divided a capital project in
order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this
chapter if the result of one (1) or more of the subprojects cannot
reasonably be considered an independently desirable end in itself
without reference to another capital project. This subsection does not
prohibit a political subdivision from undertaking a series of capital
projects in which the result of each capital project can reasonably be
considered an independently desirable end in itself without reference
to another capital project.
SECTION 5. IC 6-1.1-20-3.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.246-2017,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.2. (a) Subject to section 3.5(a)(1)(C) of this
chapter, this section applies only to controlled projects described in
HEA 1004 — Concur

14
section 3.1(a) of this chapter.
(b) If a sufficient petition requesting the application of a petition and
remonstrance process has been filed as set forth in section 3.1 of this
chapter, a political subdivision may not impose property taxes to pay
debt service on bonds or lease rentals on a lease for a controlled project
without completing the following procedures:
(1) The proper officers of the political subdivision shall give
notice of the applicability of the petition and remonstrance
process by:
(A) publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1; and
(B) first class mail to the circuit court clerk. and to the
organizations described in section 3.1(b)(1) of this chapter.
A notice under this subdivision must include a statement that any
owners of property within the political subdivision or registered
voters residing within the political subdivision who want to
petition in favor of or remonstrate against the proposed debt
service or lease payments must file petitions and remonstrances
in compliance with subdivisions (2) through (4) not earlier than
thirty (30) days or later than sixty (60) days after publication in
accordance with IC 5-3-1.
(2) Not earlier than thirty (30) days or later than sixty (60) days
after the notice under subdivision (1) is given:
(A) petitions (described in subdivision (3)) in favor of the
bonds or lease; and
(B) remonstrances (described in subdivision (3)) against the
bonds or lease;
may be filed by an owner or owners of property within the
political subdivision or a registered voter residing within the
political subdivision. Each signature on a petition must be dated,
and the date of signature may not be before the date on which the
petition and remonstrance forms may be issued under subdivision
(3). A petition described in clause (A) or a remonstrance
described in clause (B) must be verified in compliance with
subdivision (4) before the petition or remonstrance is filed with
the county voter registration office under subdivision (4).
(3) The state board of accounts shall design and, upon request by
the county voter registration office, deliver to the county voter
registration office or the county voter registration office's
designated printer the petition and remonstrance forms to be used
solely in the petition and remonstrance process described in this
section. The county voter registration office shall issue to an
owner or owners of property within the political subdivision or a
HEA 1004 — Concur

15
registered voter residing within the political subdivision the
number of petition or remonstrance forms requested by the owner
or owners or the registered voter. Each form must be
accompanied by instructions detailing the requirements that:
(A) the carrier and signers must be owners of property or
registered voters;
(B) the carrier must be a signatory on at least one (1) petition;
(C) after the signatures have been collected, the carrier must
swear or affirm before a notary public that the carrier
witnessed each signature;
(D) govern the closing date for the petition and remonstrance
period; and
(E) apply to the carrier under section 10 of this chapter.
Persons requesting forms may be required to identify themselves
as owners of property or registered voters and may be allowed to
pick up additional copies to distribute to other owners of property
or registered voters. Each person signing a petition or
remonstrance must indicate whether the person is signing the
petition or remonstrance as a registered voter within the political
subdivision or is signing the petition or remonstrance as the
owner of property within the political subdivision. A person who
signs a petition or remonstrance as a registered voter must
indicate the address at which the person is registered to vote. A
person who signs a petition or remonstrance as an owner of
property must indicate the address of the property owned by the
person in the political subdivision. The county voter registration
office may not issue a petition or remonstrance form earlier than
twenty-nine (29) days after the notice is given under subdivision
(1). The county voter registration office shall certify the date of
issuance on each petition or remonstrance form that is distributed
under this subdivision.
(4) The petitions and remonstrances must be verified in the
manner prescribed by the state board of accounts and filed with
the county voter registration office within the sixty (60) day
period described in subdivision (2) in the manner set forth in
section 3.1 of this chapter relating to requests for a petition and
remonstrance process.
(5) The county voter registration office shall determine whether
each person who signed the petition or remonstrance is a
registered voter. The county voter registration office shall not
more than fifteen (15) business days after receiving a petition or
remonstrance forward a copy of the petition or remonstrance to
HEA 1004 — Concur

16
the county auditor. Not more than ten (10) business days after
receiving the copy of the petition or remonstrance, the county
auditor shall provide to the county voter registration office a
statement verifying:
(A) whether a person who signed the petition or remonstrance
as a registered voter but is not a registered voter, as
determined by the county voter registration office, is the owner
of property in the political subdivision; and
(B) whether a person who signed the petition or remonstrance
as an owner of property within the political subdivision does
in fact own property within the political subdivision.
(6) The county voter registration office shall not more than ten
(10) business days after receiving the statement from the county
auditor under subdivision (5) make the final determination of:
(A) the number of registered voters in the political subdivision
that signed a petition and, based on the statement provided by
the county auditor, the number of owners of property within
the political subdivision that signed a petition; and
(B) the number of registered voters in the political subdivision
that signed a remonstrance and, based on the statement
provided by the county auditor, the number of owners of
property within the political subdivision that signed a
remonstrance.
Whenever the name of an individual who signs a petition or
remonstrance as a registered voter contains a minor variation from
the name of the registered voter as set forth in the records of the
county voter registration office, the signature is presumed to be
valid, and there is a presumption that the individual is entitled to
sign the petition or remonstrance under this section. Except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, in determining whether an
individual is a registered voter, the county voter registration office
shall apply the requirements and procedures used under IC 3 to
determine whether a person is a registered voter for purposes of
voting in an election governed by IC 3. However, an individual is
not required to comply with the provisions concerning providing
proof of identification to be considered a registered voter for
purposes of this chapter. A person is entitled to sign a petition or
remonstrance only one (1) time in a particular petition and
remonstrance process under this chapter, regardless of whether
the person owns more than one (1) parcel of real property, mobile
home assessed as personal property, or manufactured home
assessed as personal property or a combination of those types of
HEA 1004 — Concur

17
property within the subdivision and regardless of whether the
person is both a registered voter in the political subdivision and
the owner of property within the political subdivision.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if a petition
or remonstrance is presented to the county voter registration
office within forty-five (45) days before an election, the county
voter registration office may defer acting on the petition or
remonstrance, and the time requirements under this section for
action by the county voter registration office do not begin to run
until five (5) days after the date of the election.
(7) The county voter registration office must file a certificate and
the petition or remonstrance with the body of the political
subdivision charged with issuing bonds or entering into leases
within thirty-five (35) business days of the filing of a petition or
remonstrance under subdivision (4), whichever applies,
containing ten thousand (10,000) signatures or less. The county
voter registration office may take an additional five (5) days to
review and certify the petition or remonstrance for each additional
five thousand (5,000) signatures up to a maximum of sixty (60)
days. The certificate must state the number of petitioners and
remonstrators that are owners of property within the political
subdivision and the number of petitioners who are registered
voters residing within the political subdivision.
(8) If a greater number of persons who are either owners of
property within the political subdivision or registered voters
residing within the political subdivision sign a remonstrance than
the number that signed a petition, the bonds petitioned for may
not be issued or the lease petitioned for may not be entered into.
The proper officers of the political subdivision may not make a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for
the controlled project defeated by the petition and remonstrance
process under this section or any other controlled project that is
not substantially different within one (1) year after the date of the
county voter registration office's certificate under subdivision (7).
Withdrawal of a petition carries the same consequences as a
defeat of the petition.
(9) After a political subdivision has gone through the petition and
remonstrance process set forth in this section, the political
subdivision is not required to follow any other remonstrance or
objection procedures under any other law (including section 5 of
this chapter) relating to bonds or leases designed to protect
owners of property within the political subdivision from the
HEA 1004 — Concur

18
imposition of property taxes to pay debt service or lease rentals.
However, the political subdivision must still receive the approval
of the department of local government finance if required by:
(A) IC 6-1.1-18.5-8; or
(B) IC 20-46-7-8, IC 20-46-7-9, and IC 20-46-7-10.
SECTION 6. IC 6-1.1-20-4.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.136-2024,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.2. (a) This section applies only if, with respect
to a particular controlled project that fulfilled the petition and
remonstrance process under sections 3.1 and 3.2 of this chapter, the
political subdivision subsequently changes the scope of the controlled
project beyond that initially presented.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, if at least
ten (10) persons who are either owners of property within the political
subdivision or registered voters residing within the political
subdivision file a petition with the proper officers of the political
subdivision contending that the scope of a controlled project has
changed from how it was initially presented, the proper officers of the
political subdivision shall hold a public hearing to determine whether
any change in scope is significant enough to warrant a new petition and
remonstrance process. A petition under this subsection must be filed
not later than one (1) year after the controlled project received final
approval.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, if it is
determined at the hearing described in subsection (b) that the political
subdivision has subsequently changed the scope of a controlled project
beyond that initially presented as described in subsection (a), the
political subdivision must complete the following procedures under this
section:
(1) The proper officers of the political subdivision shall give
notice of the applicability of the petition and remonstrance
process by:
(A) publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1; and
(B) first class mail to the circuit court clerk. and to the
organizations described in section 3.1(b)(1) of this chapter.
A notice under this subdivision must include a statement that any
owners of property within the political subdivision or registered
voters residing within the political subdivision who want to
petition in favor of or remonstrate against the proposed debt
service or lease payments must file petitions and remonstrances
in compliance with subdivisions (2) through (4) not earlier than
thirty (30) days or later than sixty (60) days after publication in
HEA 1004 — Concur

19
accordance with IC 5-3-1.
(2) Not earlier than thirty (30) days or later than sixty (60) days
after the notice under subdivision (1) is given:
(A) petitions (described in subdivision (3)) in favor of the
bonds or lease; and
(B) remonstrances (described in subdivision (3)) against the
bonds or lease;
may be filed by an owner or owners of property within the
political subdivision or a registered voter residing within the
political subdivision. Each signature on a petition must be dated,
and the date of signature may not be before the date on which the
petition and remonstrance forms may be issued under subdivision
(3). A petition described in clause (A) or a remonstrance
described in clause (B) must be verified in compliance with
subdivision (4) before the petition or remonstrance is filed with
the county voter registration office under subdivision (4).
(3) The state board of accounts shall design and, upon request by
the county voter registration office, deliver to the county voter
registration office or the county voter registration office's
designated printer the petition and remonstrance forms to be used
solely in the petition and remonstrance process described in this
section. The county voter registration office shall issue to an
owner or owners of property within the political subdivision or a
registered voter residing within the political subdivision the
number of petition or remonstrance forms requested by the owner
or owners or the registered voter. Each form must be
accompanied by instructions detailing the requirements that:
(A) the carrier and signers must be owners of property or
registered voters;
(B) the carrier must be a signatory on at least one (1) petition;
(C) after the signatures have been collected, the carrier must
swear or affirm before a notary public that the carrier
witnessed each signature;
(D) govern the closing date for the petition and remonstrance
period; and
(E) apply to the carrier under section 10 of this chapter.
Persons requesting forms may be required to identify themselves
as owners of property or registered voters and may be allowed to
pick up additional copies to distribute to other owners of property
or registered voters. Each person signing a petition or
remonstrance must indicate whether the person is signing the
petition or remonstrance as a registered voter within the political
HEA 1004 — Concur

20
subdivision or is signing the petition or remonstrance as the
owner of property within the political subdivision. A person who
signs a petition or remonstrance as a registered voter must
indicate the address at which the person is registered to vote. A
person who signs a petition or remonstrance as an owner of
property must indicate the address of the property owned by the
person in the political subdivision. The county voter registration
office may not issue a petition or remonstrance form earlier than
twenty-nine (29) days after the notice is given under subdivision
(1). The county voter registration office shall certify the date of
issuance on each petition or remonstrance form that is distributed
under this subdivision.
(4) The petitions and remonstrances must be verified in the
manner prescribed by the state board of accounts and filed with
the county voter registration office within the sixty (60) day
period described in subdivision (2) in the manner set forth in
section 3.1 of this chapter relating to requests for a petition and
remonstrance process.
(5) The county voter registration office shall determine whether
each person who signed the petition or remonstrance is a
registered voter. The county voter registration office shall not
more than fifteen (15) business days after receiving a petition or
remonstrance forward a copy of the petition or remonstrance to
the county auditor. Not more than ten (10) business days after
receiving the copy of the petition or remonstrance, the county
auditor shall provide to the county voter registration office a
statement verifying:
(A) whether a person who signed the petition or remonstrance
as a registered voter but is not a registered voter, as
determined by the county voter registration office, is the owner
of property in the political subdivision; and
(B) whether a person who signed the petition or remonstrance
as an owner of property within the political subdivision does
in fact own property within the political subdivision.
(6) The county voter registration office shall not more than ten
(10) business days after receiving the statement from the county
auditor under subdivision (5) make the final determination of:
(A) the number of registered voters in the political subdivision
that signed a petition and, based on the statement provided by
the county auditor, the number of owners of property within
the political subdivision that signed a petition; and
(B) the number of registered voters in the political subdivision
HEA 1004 — Concur

21
that signed a remonstrance and, based on the statement
provided by the county auditor, the number of owners of
property within the political subdivision that signed a
remonstrance.
Whenever the name of an individual who signs a petition or
remonstrance as a registered voter contains a minor variation from
the name of the registered voter as set forth in the records of the
county voter registration office, the signature is presumed to be
valid, and there is a presumption that the individual is entitled to
sign the petition or remonstrance under this section. Except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, in determining whether an
individual is a registered voter, the county voter registration office
shall apply the requirements and procedures used under IC 3 to
determine whether a person is a registered voter for purposes of
voting in an election governed by IC 3. However, an individual is
not required to comply with the provisions concerning providing
proof of identification to be considered a registered voter for
purposes of this chapter. A person is entitled to sign a petition or
remonstrance only one (1) time in a particular petition and
remonstrance process under this chapter, regardless of whether
the person owns more than one (1) parcel of real property, mobile
home assessed as personal property, or manufactured home
assessed as personal property or a combination of those types of
property within the subdivision and regardless of whether the
person is both a registered voter in the political subdivision and
the owner of property within the political subdivision.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if a petition
or remonstrance is presented to the county voter registration
office within forty-five (45) days before an election, the county
voter registration office may defer acting on the petition or
remonstrance, and the time requirements under this section for
action by the county voter registration office do not begin to run
until five (5) days after the date of the election.
(7) The county voter registration office must file a certificate and
the petition or remonstrance with the body of the political
subdivision within thirty-five (35) business days of the filing of a
petition or remonstrance under subdivision (4), whichever
applies, containing ten thousand (10,000) signatures or less. The
county voter registration office may take an additional five (5)
days to review and certify the petition or remonstrance for each
additional five thousand (5,000) signatures up to a maximum of
sixty (60) days. The certificate must state the number of
HEA 1004 — Concur

22
petitioners and remonstrators that are owners of property within
the political subdivision and the number of petitioners who are
registered voters residing within the political subdivision.
(8) If a greater number of persons who are either owners of
property within the political subdivision or registered voters
residing within the political subdivision sign a remonstrance than
the number that signed a petition, the political subdivision may
not proceed with the changed scope of the controlled project. In
that case, the political subdivision may either:
(A) proceed with the controlled project as it was initially
presented; or
(B) terminate the controlled project as it was initially
presented and initiate procedures for the controlled project that
reflects the change in scope.
Withdrawal of a petition carries the same consequences as a
defeat of the petition.
(9) After a political subdivision has gone through the petition and
remonstrance process set forth in this section, the political
subdivision is not required to follow any other remonstrance or
objection procedures under any other law (including section 5 of
this chapter) relating to bonds or leases designed to protect
owners of property within the political subdivision from the
imposition of property taxes to pay debt service or lease rentals.
However, the political subdivision must still receive the approval
of the department of local government finance if required by:
(A) IC 6-1.1-18.5-8; or
(B) IC 20-46-7-8, IC 20-46-7-9, and IC 20-46-7-10.
SECTION 7. IC 6-2.5-5-38.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.118-2024,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 38.1. (a) As used in this section, "service center"
means an educational service center established under IC 20-20-1.
IC 20-20.5-1.
(b) As used in this section, "school" means a public or private
elementary or secondary school containing students in any grade from
grade 1 through grade 12.
(c) As used in this chapter, "qualified computer equipment" means
computer equipment, including hardware and software, specified by the
state board of education under IC 6-3.1-15-10 (as in effect on January
1, 2012).
(d) Sales of qualified computer equipment are exempt from the state
gross retail tax, if:
(1) the seller is a service center or school;
HEA 1004 — Concur

23
(2) the purchaser is a parent or guardian of a student who is
enrolled in a school; and
(3) the qualified computer equipment is sold to the parent or
guardian under IC 6-3.1-15-12 (as in effect on January 1, 2012).
SECTION 8. IC 9-18.5-15-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.43-2021,
SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The fees collected under this chapter shall be
distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five percent (25%) to the secretary of education to
administer the school intervention and career counseling
development program and fund under IC 20-20-17. IC 20-20.5-7.
(2) Seventy-five percent (75%) as provided under section 6 of this
chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 10-19-2-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The definitions in IC 20-18-2 apply to this
section.
(b) The department, in collaboration with the state police
department, shall:
(1) identify a set of best practices; and
(2) develop a set of educational materials;
regarding recommendations for the safe possession and storage of
a firearm in a home with a child.
(c) The best practices and educational materials described in
subsection (b) must include information on:
(1) firearm access;
(2) firearm handling;
(3) firearm storage;
(4) ammunition access; and
(5) ammunition storage.
(d) After December 31, 2026, the department shall provide the
best practices and educational materials described in subsection (b)
to public schools, charter schools, and state accredited nonpublic
schools.
(e) The department shall maintain a public website that contains
the best practices and educational materials described in
subsection (b). The department shall publicize the website and
promote the best practices and educational materials to all
elementary and high schools operating in the state.
SECTION 10. IC 10-21-1-2, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HEA 1004 — Concur

24
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The Indiana secured school fund is
established to provide:
(1) matching grants to school corporations, charter schools, and
accredited nonpublic schools, where the matching grants may be
used to:
(A) employ a school resource officer, employ a law
enforcement officer, or enter into a contract or a memorandum
of understanding with a:
(i) local law enforcement agency;
(ii) private entity; or
(iii) nonprofit corporation;
to employ a school resource officer or a law enforcement
officer;
(B) conduct:
(i) a site vulnerability assessment of the buildings within a
school corporation or the buildings that are operated by a
charter school or accredited nonpublic school; or
(ii) critical incident digital mapping of the buildings within
a school corporation or the buildings that are operated by a
charter school or accredited nonpublic school;
(C) purchase equipment, hardware, materials, and technology
to:
(i) restrict access to school property and classrooms;
(ii) assist with visitor management on school property;
(iii) expedite notification of first responders;
(iv) expedite access to school property for first responders;
(v) provide school staff with information about the open or
closed status of interior and exterior doors;
(vi) detect fire, chemical, visual, or audible threats;
(vii) enhance emergency communications inside the
building; or
(viii) assist with emergency medical response on school
property;
(D) implement a student and parent support services plan; as
described in IC 20-34-9;
(E) purchase or provide training for a canine trained to detect
drugs and illegal substances, explosives, or firearms, or to
otherwise provide protection for students and school
employees and the canine shall:
(i) be primarily assigned to a school corporation, charter
school, or accredited nonpublic school;
(ii) be primarily assigned to a school resource officer or law
HEA 1004 — Concur

25
enforcement officer described in clause (A) who has
received appropriate training for handling a canine trained
to detect drugs and illegal substances, explosives, or
firearms, or to otherwise provide protection for students and
school employees, including training regarding handling a
canine in a school setting; and
(iii) receive continuous training as appropriate;
(F) provide funding for school employees to receive training,
including expenses for per diem, travel, and lodging, related
to:
(i) site vulnerability assessments;
(ii) mental health or behavioral health threat assessments;
(iii) multi-disciplinary threat assessment teams; or
(iv) emergency preparedness or response activities;
(G) provide funding for school resource officers or law
enforcement officers described in clause (A) to receive
training, including expenses for per diem, travel, and lodging,
related to handling a canine trained to detect drugs and illegal
substances, explosives, or firearms, or to otherwise provide
protection for students and school employees;
(H) purchase student safety management technology;
(I) design and construct additions or renovations on school
property if the primary purpose of the construction project is
to enhance the physical security of the school building; or
(J) implement a bullying prevention program; or and
(K) develop, implement, and carry out a Stop the Bleed
program required by IC 20-34-3-24, including for the purchase
of bleeding control kits; and
(2) one (1) time grants to enable school corporations, charter
schools, and accredited nonpublic schools with the sheriff for the
county in which the school corporation, charter school, or
accredited nonpublic school is located, to provide the initial set up
costs for an active event warning system.
(b) A school corporation or charter school may use money received
under a matching grant for a purpose listed in subsection (a) to provide
a response to a threat in a manner that the school corporation or charter
school sees fit, including firearms training or other self-defense
training.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the department of homeland
security.
(d) The fund consists of:
(1) appropriations from the general assembly;
HEA 1004 — Concur

26
(2) federal grants;
(3) amounts deposited from any other public or private source;
and
(4) amounts deposited under IC 33-37-9-4.
(e) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(f) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(g) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the state general fund.
SECTION 11. IC 10-21-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.150-2023,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The board may award a matching grant to
enable a school corporation, charter school, or accredited nonpublic
school (or a coalition of schools applying jointly) to:
(1) employ a school resource officer, employ a law enforcement
officer, or enter into a contract or memorandum of understanding
with a:
(A) local law enforcement agency;
(B) private entity; or
(C) nonprofit corporation;
to employ a school resource officer or a law enforcement officer;
(2) conduct a site vulnerability assessment of the buildings within
a school corporation or the buildings that are operated by a
charter school or accredited nonpublic school;
(3) conduct critical incident digital mapping of the buildings
within a school corporation or the buildings that are operated by
a charter school or accredited nonpublic school;
(4) purchase equipment, hardware, materials, and technology to:
(A) restrict access to school property and classrooms;
(B) assist with visitor management on school property;
(C) expedite notification of first responders;
(D) expedite access to school property for first responders;
(E) provide staff with information about open or closed status
of interior and exterior doors;
(F) detect fire, chemical, visual, or audible threats;
(G) enhance emergency communications inside the school
building; or
(H) assist with emergency medical response on school
property; or
HEA 1004 — Concur

27
(I) monitor areas of school property used for student
seclusion (as defined in IC 20-20.5-13-9) or time-out (as
defined in IC 20-20.5-13-10) with audiovisual devices;
(5) implement a student and parent support services plan; in the
manner set forth in IC 20-34-9;
(6) purchase or provide training for a canine trained to detect
drugs and illegal substances, explosives, or firearms, or to
otherwise provide protection for students and school employees
and the canine shall:
(A) be primarily assigned to a school corporation, charter
school, or accredited nonpublic school;
(B) be primarily assigned to a school resource officer or law
enforcement officer described in subdivision (1)(A) who has
received appropriate training for handling a canine trained to
detect drugs and illegal substances, explosives, or firearms, or
to otherwise provide protection for students and school
employees, including training regarding handling a canine in
a school setting; and
(C) receive continuous training as appropriate;
(7) provide funding for:
(A) school employees to receive training, including expenses
for per diem, travel, and lodging, related to:
(i) site vulnerability assessments;
(ii) mental health or behavioral health threat assessments;
(iii) multi-disciplinary threat assessment teams; or
(iv) emergency preparedness or response activities; or
(B) school resource officers or law enforcement officers
described in subdivision (1)(A) to receive training, including
expenses for per diem, travel, and lodging, related to handling
a canine trained to detect drugs and illegal substances,
explosives, or firearms, or to otherwise provide protection for
students and school employees;
(8) design and construct additions or renovations on school
property if the primary purpose of the construction project is to
enhance the physical security of the school building;
(9) provide one (1) time grants to enable school corporations,
charter schools, and accredited nonpublic schools with the sheriff
for the county in which the school corporation, charter school, or
accredited nonpublic school is located to provide the initial set up
costs for an active event warning system;
(10) implement a bullying prevention program; or
(11) purchase student safety management technology;
HEA 1004 — Concur

28
in accordance with section 2(a) of this chapter.
(b) A matching grant awarded to a school corporation, charter
school, or accredited nonpublic school (or a coalition of schools
applying jointly) may not exceed the lesser of the following during a
two (2) year period beginning on or after May 1, 2013:
(1) The total cost of the program established by the school
corporation, charter school, or accredited nonpublic school (or the
coalition of schools applying jointly).
(2) Except as provided in subsection (d), the following amounts:
(A) Thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) per year, in the case
of a school corporation, charter school, or accredited
nonpublic school that:
(i) has an ADM of at least one (1) and less than one
thousand one (1,001) students; and
(ii) is not applying jointly with any other school corporation,
charter school, or accredited nonpublic school.
(B) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per year, in the case of a
school corporation, charter school, or accredited nonpublic
school that:
(i) has an ADM of more than one thousand (1,000) and less
than five thousand one (5,001) students; and
(ii) is not applying jointly with any other school corporation,
charter school, or accredited nonpublic school.
(C) Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per year, in the
case of a school corporation, charter school, or accredited
nonpublic school that:
(i) has an ADM of more than five thousand (5,000) and less
than fifteen thousand one (15,001) students; and
(ii) is not applying jointly with any other school corporation,
charter school, or accredited nonpublic school.
(D) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per year, in the
case of a school corporation, charter school, or accredited
nonpublic school that:
(i) has an ADM of more than fifteen thousand (15,000); and
(ii) is not applying jointly with any other school corporation,
charter school, or accredited nonpublic school.
(E) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per year, in the
case of a coalition of schools applying jointly.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), the match requirement for
a grant under this chapter is based on the ADM for the school
corporation, charter school, or accredited nonpublic school (or coalition
of schools applying jointly) that is the subject of the grant as follows:
HEA 1004 — Concur

29
(1) For a school corporation, charter school, or accredited
nonpublic school with an ADM of less than five hundred one
(501) students, the grant match must be twenty-five percent
(25%) of the grant amount described in subsection (b).
(2) For a school corporation, charter school, or accredited
nonpublic school with an ADM of more than five hundred (500)
and less than one thousand one (1,001) students, the grant match
must be fifty percent (50%) of the grant amount described in
subsection (b).
(3) For a school corporation, charter school, or accredited
nonpublic school with an ADM of more than one thousand
(1,000) students or a coalition of schools applying jointly, the
grant match must be one hundred percent (100%) of the grant
amount described in subsection (b).
(d) A school corporation, charter school, or accredited nonpublic
school may be eligible to receive a grant of up to:
(1) one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) if:
(A) the school corporation, charter school, or accredited
nonpublic school receives a grant match of one hundred
percent (100%) of the requested grant amount; and
(B) the board approves the grant request; or
(2) for a school corporation, charter school, or accredited
nonpublic school described in subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2), a grant
of up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) if:
(A) the school corporation, charter school, or accredited
nonpublic school receives a grant match of fifty percent (50%)
of the requested grant amount; and
(B) the board approves the grant request.
(e) A school corporation, charter school, or accredited nonpublic
school may receive only one (1) matching grant under this section each
year.
(f) The board may not award a grant to a school corporation, charter
school, or accredited nonpublic school under this section unless the
school corporation, charter school, or accredited nonpublic school is in
a county that has a county school safety commission, as described in
section 12 of this chapter.
SECTION 12. IC 12-14-2-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.161-2007,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) To retain eligibility for TANF assistance
under this article, a recipient of TANF assistance and a dependent child
who is a recipient of TANF assistance must attend school if all of the
following apply:
HEA 1004 — Concur

30
(1) The recipient or the dependent child meets the compulsory
attendance requirements under IC 20-33-2.
(2) The recipient or the dependent child has not graduated from
a high school or has not obtained a high school equivalency
certificate (as defined in IC 12-14-5-2).
(3) The recipient or the dependent child is not excused from
attending school under IC 20-33-2-14 through IC 20-33-2-17.
IC 20-33-2-15.
(4) The recipient or the dependent child does not have good cause
for failing to attend school, as determined by rules adopted by the
director under IC 4-22-2.
(5) If the recipient or the dependent child is the mother of a child,
a physician has not determined that the recipient or the dependent
child should delay returning to school after giving birth.
(b) A recipient or the dependent child of a recipient described in
subsection (a) who has more than three (3) unexcused absences during
a school year is subject to revocation or suspension of assistance as
provided in section 18 of this chapter.
(c) The director, in consultation with the department of education,
shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish a definition for the term
"unexcused absence".
SECTION 13. IC 12-15-1-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.35-2022,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) Each:
(1) school corporation; or
(2) school corporation's employed, licensed, or qualified provider;
must enroll in a program to use federal funds under the Medicaid
program (IC 12-15-1 et seq.) with the intent to share the costs of
services that are reimbursable under the Medicaid program and that are
provided to eligible children by the school corporation. However, a
school corporation or a school corporation's employed, licensed, or
qualified provider is not required to file any claims or participate in the
program developed under this section.
(b) The secretary and the department of education may develop
policies and adopt rules to administer the program developed under this
section.
(c) The federal reimbursement for services provided under this
section must be distributed to the school corporation. The state shall
retain the nonfederal share of the reimbursement for Medicaid services
provided under this section.
(d) The office of Medicaid policy and planning, with the approval
of the budget agency and after consultation with the department of
HEA 1004 — Concur

31
education, shall establish procedures for the timely distribution of
federal reimbursement due to the school corporations. The distribution
procedures may provide for offsetting reductions to distributions of
state tuition support or other state funds to school corporations in the
amount of the nonfederal reimbursements required to be retained by the
state under subsection (c).
(e) The office may apply to the United States Department of Health
and Human Services for a state plan amendment to allow school
corporations to seek Medicaid reimbursement for medically necessary,
school based Medicaid covered services that are provided under federal
or state mandates. If the state plan amendment is approved and
implemented, services may be provided by a qualified provider in a
school setting to Medicaid enrolled students. Subject to subsection (f),
the services may be pursuant to any of the following:
(1) An individualized education program (as defined in
IC 20-18-2-9).
(2) A plan developed under Section 504 of the federal
Rehabilitation Act, 29 U.S.C. 794.
(3) A behavioral intervention plan (as defined in IC 20-20-40-1).
IC 20-20.5-13-1).
(4) A service plan developed under 511 IAC 7-34.
(5) An individualized health care plan.
The office may, in consultation with the department of education,
develop any necessary state plan amendment under this subsection. The
office may apply for any state plan amendment necessary to implement
this subsection.
(f) Services under subsection (e) may not include the following:
(1) An abortion.
(2) Counseling for abortion procedures.
(3) Referrals for abortion services.
(4) Abortifacients.
(5) Contraceptives.
(g) If the state plan amendment described in subsection (e) is
approved and implemented, the medically necessary, school based
Medicaid covered services described in subsection (e):
(1) may only be performed by a qualified provider;
(2) must be within the qualified provider's scope of practice; and
(3) must be provided in accordance with this article and
administrative rules concerning the Medicaid program.
SECTION 14. IC 20-17 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Effect of Recodification of Title 20).
SECTION 15. IC 20-18-2-12, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
HEA 1004 — Concur

32
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) "Nonpublic school" means a school that is
not:
(1) maintained by a school corporation; or
(2) a charter school.
(b) The term includes a private school or parochial school.
SECTION 16. IC 20-18-2-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2019,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) "School corporation", for purposes of this
title (except IC 20-20-33, IC 20-20.5-9, IC 20-26-1 through
IC 20-26-5, IC 20-26-7, IC 20-26-7.1, IC 20-28-11.5, IC 20-30-8,
IC 20-30-16, IC 20-43, and IC 20-50), means a public school
corporation established by Indiana law. The term includes a:
(1) school city;
(2) school town;
(3) consolidated school corporation;
(4) metropolitan school district;
(5) township school corporation;
(6) county school corporation;
(7) united school corporation; or
(8) community school corporation.
(b) "School corporation", for purposes of IC 20-26-1 through
IC 20-26-5, IC 20-26-7, and IC 20-26-7.1, has the meaning set forth in
IC 20-26-2-4.
(c) "School corporation", for purposes of IC 20-20-33, IC 20-20.5-9,
IC 20-26.5, IC 20-30-8, and IC 20-50, includes a charter school (as
defined in IC 20-24-1-4).
(d) "School corporation", for purposes of IC 20-43, has the meaning
set forth in IC 20-43-1-23.
(e) "School corporation", for purposes of IC 20-28-11.5, has the
meaning set forth in IC 20-28-11.5-3.
(f) "School corporation", for purposes of IC 20-35, has the meaning
set forth in IC 20-35-1-6.
(g) "School corporation", for purposes of IC 20-30-16, has the
meaning set forth in IC 20-30-16-4.
SECTION 17. IC 20-18-2-18, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2016,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
"Secondary school" means a high school.
(b) For purposes of IC 20-28-9-25, "secondary school" has the
meaning set forth in IC 20-28-9-25.
SECTION 18. IC 20-19-2-2.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
HEA 1004 — Concur

33
SECTION 160, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. (a) The state board consists of
the following members:
(1) The secretary of education.
(2) Eight (8) members appointed by the governor. The following
provisions apply to members of the state board appointed under
this subdivision:
(A) At least six (6) members appointed under this subdivision
must have professional experience in the field of education as
provided in subsection (b).
(B) Members shall be appointed from different parts of
Indiana with not more than one (1) member being appointed
from a particular congressional district.
(C) Not more than five (5) members of the state board may be
appointed from the membership of any one (1) political party.
(D) Subject to subsection (h), At least one (1) member shall be
a practicing licensed special education teacher or special
education director at the time the member is appointed.
(3) One (1) member, who is not a member of the general
assembly, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(4) One (1) member, who is not a member of the general
assembly, appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a), an individual is considered to
have professional experience in the field of education if the individual
has teaching or leadership experience at a postsecondary educational
institution or is currently employed as, or is retired from a position as:
(1) a teacher;
(2) a principal;
(3) an assistant superintendent; or
(4) a superintendent.
(c) A quorum consists of six (6) members of the state board. An
action of the state board is not official unless the action is authorized
by at least six (6) members.
(d) The members of the state board shall elect a chairperson and
vice chairperson annually from the members of the state board. The
vice chairperson shall act as chairperson in the absence of the
chairperson.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), each member
appointed under subsection (a)(2) through (a)(4) serves a four (4) year
term. The term begins on July 1.
(f) A member appointed under subsection (a)(2) through (a)(4) may
HEA 1004 — Concur

34
be removed from the state board by the member's appointing authority
for just cause. Vacancies in the appointments to the state board shall be
filled by the appointing authority. A member appointed under this
subsection serves for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(g) The state board shall meet at a minimum at least one (1) time
each year. The state board shall establish the date of the next meeting
during a meeting of the state board. In addition to the annual meeting
required under this subsection, the state board shall meet at the call of
the chairperson.
(h) This subsection expires July 1, 2024. The governor shall appoint
a member who has the qualifications described in subsection (a)(2)(D)
for the first appointment made by the governor to fill a vacancy on the
state board after March 31, 2020.
SECTION 19. IC 20-19-2-2.3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 2.3. (a) After May 31, 2015, a reference to the state
board in a statute, rule, or other document is considered a reference to
the state board established by section 2.1 of this chapter.
(b) After May 31, 2015, a rule adopted by the state board
established by section 2 of this chapter (expired June 1, 2015) is
considered a rule adopted by the state board established by section 2.1
of this chapter. However, a rule concerning driver education is
considered a rule of the bureau of motor vehicles.
(c) On June 1, 2015, the property and obligations of the state board
established by section 2 of this chapter (expired June 1, 2015) are
transferred to the state board established by section 2.1 of this chapter.
(d) An action taken by the state board established by section 2 of
this chapter (expired June 1, 2015) before June 1, 2015, shall be treated
after May 31, 2015, as if it were originally taken by the state board
established by section 2.1 of this chapter.
SECTION 20. IC 20-19-2-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.242-2017,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. The state board shall do the following:
(1) Establish the educational goals of the state, developing
standards and objectives for local school corporations.
(2) Assess the attainment of the established goals.
(3) Assure compliance with established standards and objectives.
(4) Coordinate with the commission for higher education
(IC 21-18-1) and the department of workforce development
(IC 22-4.1-2) to develop entrepreneurship education programs for
elementary and secondary education, higher education, and
individuals in the work force.
(5) (4) Make recommendations to the governor and general
HEA 1004 — Concur

35
assembly concerning the educational needs of the state, including
financial needs.
(6) (5) Provide for reviews to ensure the validity and reliability of
the statewide assessment program.
SECTION 21. IC 20-19-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.269-2019,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The department shall:
(1) perform the duties required by statute;
(2) implement the policies and procedures established by the state
board;
(3) conduct analytical research to assist the state board in
determining the state's educational policy;
(4) compile statistics concerning the ethnicity, gender, and
disability status of students in Indiana schools, including statistics
for all information that the department receives from school
corporations on enrollment, number of suspensions, and number
of expulsions; and
(5) provide technical assistance to school corporations.
(b) In compiling statistics by gender, ethnicity, and disability status
under subsection (a)(4), the department shall also categorize
suspensions and expulsions by cause as follows:
(1) Alcohol.
(2) Drugs.
(3) Deadly weapons (other than firearms).
(4) Handguns.
(5) Rifles or shotguns.
(6) Other firearms.
(7) Tobacco.
(8) Attendance.
(9) Destruction of property.
(10) Legal settlement. (under IC 20-33-8-17).
(11) Fighting (incident does not rise to the level of battery).
(12) A battery offense included in IC 35-42-2.
(13) Intimidation (IC 35-45-2-1).
(14) Verbal aggression or profanity.
(15) Defiance.
(16) Other.
(c) The department shall provide the state board any data, including
fiscal data, as determined by the state board, in a reasonable time frame
established by the state board after consultation with the department,
necessary to conduct an audit or evaluation of any federal or state
supported program principally engaged in the provision of education,
HEA 1004 — Concur

36
including, but not limited to:
(1) early childhood education;
(2) elementary and secondary education;
(3) postsecondary education;
(4) special education;
(5) job training;
(6) career and technical education; and
(7) adult education;
or for the enforcement of or compliance with federal legal requirements
related to those education programs as determined by the state board.
The state board and the department are considered state educational
authorities within the meaning of the federal Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. 1232g and 34 CFR Part 99) for the purpose
of allowing the free exchange of information between the department
and the state board.
(d) The department may, upon request by a new school, assign an
identification number for the new school.
(e) The department shall develop guidelines necessary to implement
this section.
SECTION 22. IC 20-19-3-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 8. (a) The department may not approve or disapprove plans
and specifications for the construction, alteration, or repair of school
buildings, except as necessary under the terms of a federal grant or a
federal law.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the department shall establish
a central clearinghouse for access by school corporations that may want
to use a prototype design in the construction of school facilities. The
department shall compile necessary publications and may establish a
computer data base to distribute information on prototype designs to
school corporations. Architects and engineers registered to practice in
Indiana may submit plans and specifications for a prototype design to
the clearinghouse. The plans and specifications may be accessed by any
person. However, the following provisions apply to a prototype design
submitted to the clearinghouse:
(1) The original architect of record or engineer of record retains
ownership of and liability for a prototype design.
(2) A school corporation or other person may not use a prototype
design without the site-specific, written permission of the original
architect of record or engineer of record.
(3) An architect's or engineer's liability under subdivision (1) is
subject to the requirements of subdivision (2).
The state board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this
HEA 1004 — Concur

37
subsection.
SECTION 23. IC 20-19-3-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.83-2010,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The department, in collaboration with
organizations that have expertise in dating violence, domestic violence,
and sexual abuse, shall identify or develop:
(1) model dating violence educational materials; and
(2) a model for dating violence response policies and reporting.
Not later than July 1, 2011, The department shall make the models
developed or identified under this section available to assist schools
with the implementation of dating violence education programs in
grades 6 through 12 and dating violence response policies.
(b) The model dating violence policy identified or developed under
subsection (a) may include the following topics:
(1) Warning signs of dating violence.
(2) The basic principles of dating violence prevention.
(3) Methods of parental education and outreach.
SECTION 24. IC 20-19-3-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.25-2016,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The department, in collaboration with the
Indiana criminal justice institute, the department of child services, the
center for evaluation and education policy at Indiana University, the
state police department, and any organization that has expertise in
providing criminal organization education, prevention, or intervention
that the department determines to be appropriate, shall:
(1) identify or develop evidence based model educational
materials on criminal organization activity; and
(2) develop and maintain a model policy to address criminal
organizations and criminal organization activity in schools.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2015, The department shall make the
model policy developed under subsection (a)(2) available to assist
schools. in the development and implementation of a criminal
organization policy.
(c) The model educational materials on criminal organization
activity identified or developed under subsection (a)(1) must include
information:
(1) to educate students and parents on the extent to which
criminal organization activity exists;
(2) regarding the negative societal impact that criminal
organizations have on the community;
(3) on methods to discourage participation in criminal
organizations; and
HEA 1004 — Concur

38
(4) on methods of providing intervention to a child suspected of
participating in criminal organization activity.
(d) The model criminal organization policy developed under
subsection (a)(2) must include:
(1) a statement prohibiting criminal organization activity in
schools;
(2) a statement prohibiting reprisal or retaliation against an
individual who reports suspected criminal organization activity;
(3) definitions of "criminal organization" as set forth in
IC 35-45-9-1 and "criminal organization activity";
(4) model procedures for:
(A) reporting suspected criminal organization activity; and
(B) the prompt investigation of suspected criminal
organization activity;
(5) information about the types of support services, including
family support services, available for a student suspected of
participating in criminal organization activity; and
(6) recommendations concerning criminal organization
prevention and intervention services and programs for students
that maximize community participation and the use of federal
funding.
SECTION 25. IC 20-19-3-23 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 23. (a) The department may adopt and provide to schools
an early warning system or systems that:
(1) provide actionable data on students as early as elementary
school;
(2) provide metrics based on student-level data to assist in
identifying potential learning loss at the student, school, and
district level;
(3) research proven predictive analytics for on time high school
graduation using local data to determine threshold based
indicators; and
(4) may include the following:
(A) Recommendations regarding an actionable intervention
plan for each student who, based on graduation indicators and
multitiered systems of support, is not on track to graduate on
time or prepared for postsecondary success.
(B) Summative success data by each intervention plan used by
each student, student group, and school.
(b) The department may, not later than August 1, 2021, annually
select one (1) or more vendors to make available an early warning
system or systems described in subsection (a). The department may
HEA 1004 — Concur

39
require that the vendor or vendors provide to the department, at least
twice annually, a summary report in the aggregate regarding:
(1) students who, based on graduation indicators, are not on track
to graduate on time;
(2) the intervention plans implemented for the students described
in subdivision (1) in attempting to ensure the students graduate on
time; and
(3) whether the intervention plans described in subdivision (2)
are, based on graduation indicators, successful in moving students
to be on track to graduate on time and, if applicable, graduating
on time for the purpose of evaluating the return on investment of
intervention programs.
The information provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) may be
disaggregated by grade level.
SECTION 26. IC 20-19-3-25, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25. (a) The department shall establish an online
adjunct teacher portal on the department's Internet web site website or
incorporate into the teacher referral system developed under IC 20-20-3
IC 20-20.5-2 a functionality to allow:
(1) a school corporation to post a vacant adjunct teacher position;
and
(2) an individual to:
(A) post a resume;
(B) post any other information requested by the school
corporation through the portal or system; and
(C) make inquiries to the school corporation through the portal
or system. and
(D) view information relating to adjunct teachers employed by
a particular school corporation reported to the department in
accordance with IC 20-28-5-27(g).
(b) The department shall post the information received under
IC 20-28-5-27(g) on the department's portal or teacher referral system
described in subsection (a).
SECTION 27. IC 20-19-3-28 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 28. Not later than September 1 of each year, the
department shall do the following:
(1) Compile and prepare a report regarding the information
reported by school corporations and charter schools to the
department under IC 20-26-5-42.1.
(2) Submit the report to the legislative council in an electronic
HEA 1004 — Concur

40
format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 28. IC 20-19-3-29 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 29. (a) Not later than July 1, 2024, the department may
establish or license for use an online platform that:
(1) provides information and training on each of the subjects and
content described in IC 20-28-3-5.5 and IC 20-28-5.5-1.5;
(2) is accessible by both teachers and students enrolled in a
teacher preparation program; and
(3) upon successful completion of the training, provides written
confirmation to a teacher or student described in subdivision (2)
that the teacher or student successfully completed the training.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2025, the department may include the
following information and training on the online platform described in
subsection (a):
(1) 29 CFR 1910.1030 concerning bloodborne pathogens.
(2) 29 CFR 1910.147 concerning lock out/tag out.
(3) 511 IAC 5-5-5 concerning assessment training.
(c) If a teacher successfully completes a training on the online
platform, the training must count towards continuing education
required for licensure renewal, as prescribed by the department.
SECTION 29. IC 20-19-3-30.4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 30.4. (a) The department, in collaboration with the state
police department, shall:
(1) identify a set of best practices; and
(2) develop a set of educational materials;
regarding recommendations for the safe possession and storage of a
firearm in a home with a child.
(b) The best practices and educational materials described in
subsection (a) must include information on:
(1) firearm access;
(2) firearm handling;
(3) firearm storage;
(4) ammunition access; and
(5) ammunition storage.
(c) After December 31, 2023, the department shall provide the best
practices and educational materials described in subsection (a) to
public schools, charter schools, and state accredited nonpublic schools
for annual distribution to parents of students.
(d) The department shall maintain a public website that contains the
best practices and educational materials described in subsection (a).
The department shall publicize the website and promote the best
practices and educational materials to all elementary and high schools
HEA 1004 — Concur

41
operating in the state.
SECTION 30. IC 20-19-3-35 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 35. (a) Not later than July 1, 2024, the department shall
do the following:
(1) Establish an online, self-paced professional development
module to support educators in doing the following with regard to
mathematics:
(A) Implementing the Indiana academic standards.
(B) Applying effective teaching strategies.
(C) Emphasizing contextual problem solving.
(D) Fostering collaborative learning environments.
(E) Using universal supports for students.
(2) Develop math descriptions correlated to proficiency level
descriptors to track proficiency at the student level that are:
(A) appropriately aligned to the Indiana academic standards;
and
(B) readily available to educators, parents, and students across
the state.
(3) Create and identify dedicated math resources for parents,
families, and educators to assist with intervention and enrichment
opportunities and instructional strategies.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2024, the department shall post the
resources created and identified under subsection (a)(3) on the
department's website.
(c) Not later than December 1, 2024, the department shall submit a
plan to the legislative council in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6
that includes:
(1) strategies for the early identification of students who are at
risk of not meeting grade level proficiency in mathematics; and
(2) recommendations for high quality intervention policies for
mathematics that focus on:
(A) providing data driven, systematic small group or
individualized instruction focused on building student
understanding through mathematical learning progressions;
(B) using materials aligned to daily core instruction; and
(C) using evidence based instructional strategies to promote:
(i) conceptual understanding;
(ii) procedural fluency; and
(iii) real world problem solving.
This subsection expires July 1, 2025.
SECTION 31. IC 20-19-3-37 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 37. (a) The department shall do the following:
HEA 1004 — Concur

42
(1) Study the basis for student suspensions and expulsions
categorized as "other" by school corporations.
(2) Prepare a report that includes the following:
(A) Information concerning the study under subdivision (1).
(B) Any recommendation regarding expanding the suspension
and expulsion category options.
(3) Not later than November 1, 2025, submit the report prepared
under subdivision (2) to the legislative council in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6.
(b) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 32. IC 20-19-3-37.4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 37.4. Not later than October 1, 2025, the secretary of
education shall compile and prepare a report concerning the feasibility
of offering the school bus driver safety education training course
described in IC 20-27-8-10 at several regional locations.
SECTION 33. IC 20-19-3-38 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 38. (a) As used in this section:
(1) "school health plan" refers to a school employee health plan
offered under IC 20-26-17; and
(2) "state health plan" refers to a state employee health plan
offered under IC 5-10-8-6.7.
(b) Before November 1, 2025, the department shall prepare and
submit a report to the general assembly in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6 that provides an analysis of the feasibility and cost of
increasing school corporation employee health plan options.
(c) The report described in subsection (b) must include the
following:
(1) An analysis of the feasibility and cost of allowing a school
corporation employee to elect to participate in a state health plan
if the state health plan is less expensive than the school health
plan offered by the employee's school corporation.
(2) An analysis of the feasibility and cost of allowing a school
corporation employee who elects, as described in subdivision (1),
to participate in a less expensive state health plan to apply the
difference between the amount of the school health plan offered
by the employee's school corporation and the amount of the state
health plan to:
(A) the employee's defined contribution account, if the
employee maintains a defined contribution account; or
(B) the employee's annual salary.
(d) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 34. IC 20-19-3-40 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
HEA 1004 — Concur

43
1, 2026]. Sec. 40. (a) Not later than December 1, 2025, the department
shall submit a report to the general assembly in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6 on the academic readiness of students who enroll in a
virtual school or program. To the extent possible, the report must
include course completion data and student performance data on the
statewide assessment.
(b) This section expires June 30, 2026.
SECTION 35. IC 20-19-11-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 4. This chapter expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 36. IC 20-20 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Programs Administered by the State).
SECTION 37. IC 20-20.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
ARTICLE 20.5. PROGRAMS ADMINISTERED BY THE
STATE
Chapter 1. Educational Service Centers
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "applicable nonpublic school"
refers to a nonpublic school that has one (1) or more employees.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "board" refers to the board of an
educational service center described in section 8 of this chapter.
Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "educational service center"
means an extended agency of school corporations, charter schools,
and applicable nonpublic schools that:
(1) operates under rules established by the state board;
(2) is the administrative and operational unit that serves a
definitive geographical boundary, which, to the extent
possible, must be aligned with the boundary of a regional
works council's region established under IC 20-19-6 (before
its expiration); and
(3) allows school corporations, charter schools, and applicable
nonpublic schools to voluntarily cooperate and share
programs and services that the school corporations, charter
schools, and applicable nonpublic schools cannot individually
provide but collectively may implement.
(b) Programs and services collectively implemented through an
educational service center may include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(1) Curriculum development.
(2) Pupil personnel and special education services.
(3) In-service education.
(4) State-federal liaison services.
HEA 1004 — Concur

44
(5) Instructional materials and multimedia services.
(6) Career and technical education.
(7) Purchasing and financial management.
(8) Needs assessment.
(9) Computer use.
(10) Research and development.
Sec. 4. The state board may provide for the establishment of and
procedures for the operation of educational service centers.
Sec. 5. (a) The state board shall do the following:
(1) Adopt a comprehensive plan to implement this chapter.
(2) Determine the areas in Indiana that will be served by an
educational service center.
(b) In determining the geographic area to be served by an
educational service center, the state board shall consider the
following:
(1) Physical factors.
(2) Socio-economic factors.
(3) Educational factors.
(4) Existing cooperative efforts and agreements.
Sec. 6. An educational service center must be established under
rules adopted by the state board to develop, provide, and make
available to participating schools, including participating charter
schools and applicable nonpublic schools, those services requested
by the participating school corporations, participating charter
schools, and applicable nonpublic schools and approved by the
state board.
Sec. 7. Educational service centers shall be located throughout
Indiana to allow each school corporation, charter school, and
applicable nonpublic school to have an opportunity to:
(1) be served by; and
(2) participate in;
an approved center on a voluntary basis by resolution of the
governing body of the school corporation, by the approval of an
organizer of a charter school, or by the approval of the governing
board or entity of an applicable nonpublic school.
Sec. 8. An educational service center shall be governed in its
local administration by a board selected by an assembly comprised
of the:
(1) superintendent or the superintendent's designee from each
participating school corporation;
(2) organizer of a charter school or the organizer's designee
from each participating charter school; and
HEA 1004 — Concur

45
(3) chief administrative officer of an applicable nonpublic
school or the chief administrative officer's designee.
Sec. 9. (a) The state board shall adopt uniform rules to provide
for the local selection, appointment, and continuity of membership
for boards.
(b) Vacancies on a board shall be filled by appointment by the
remaining members of the board.
(c) Members of a board serve without compensation.
Sec. 10. A board may employ the following:
(1) An executive director for the educational service center.
(2) Other personnel the board considers necessary to:
(A) carry out the functions of the educational service
center; and
(B) do and perform all things the board considers proper
for successful operation of the center.
Sec. 11. (a) Any funds, including donated funds and funds from
federal or other local sources, shall be used to pay for the costs of
establishing or operating an educational service center.
(b) An educational service center may administer programs and
funds from any of the sources described in subsection (a). All
activities funded from federal sources must follow all applicable
federal guidelines, rules, and regulations.
Sec. 12. This chapter does not prohibit an educational service
center from receiving and using matching funds from federal
sources in any amount for which the educational service center
may be eligible.
Chapter 2. Teacher Referral System
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "referral system" refers to the
teacher employment opportunities referral system established by
section 2 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. The department shall establish and keep current a
computerized teacher employment opportunities referral system.
Sec. 3. The referral system must:
(1) be capable of identifying the available public school
teaching positions within Indiana;
(2) provide the pertinent information on individuals who are
seeking employment as teachers; and
(3) be accessible to school corporations, teachers, prospective
teachers, and state educational institutions.
Chapter 3. Teacher of the Year
Sec. 1. A teacher of the year may be invited to serve one (1) year
of professional leave with:
HEA 1004 — Concur

46
(1) an Indiana postsecondary educational institution; or
(2) the department.
Sec. 2. (a) The school where a teacher of the year is regularly
employed shall do the following:
(1) Grant the teacher a one (1) year professional leave to
provide service as described in section 1 of this chapter.
(2) Allow the teacher to return to the school from the
professional leave:
(A) to the same or a comparable position as the teacher
held before the professional leave; and
(B) without loss of accrued benefits or seniority.
(3) Continue to provide the teacher all benefits of employment
with the school other than salary.
(b) The department shall reimburse a school for the cost of
benefits provided by the school to a teacher under subsection
(a)(3).
Sec. 3. If a teacher of the year provides service for the
department or an Indiana postsecondary educational institution
under this chapter, the department or the Indiana postsecondary
educational institution shall pay the teacher's salary for the term
of the service and shall reimburse the teacher's regular employer
for the teacher's benefits during the term of service.
Chapter 4. Curricular Materials
Sec. 1. (a) Not later than July 1, 2027, and each July 1
thereafter, the department shall evaluate, approve, and publish a
list of high quality curricular materials for use in the following
subjects:
(1) Science.
(2) Technology.
(3) Engineering.
(4) Math.
(5) English/language arts.
The department shall post the list approved under this subsection
on the department's website.
(b) Subject to subsection (g), the department shall:
(1) determine the:
(A) process for evaluating and approving curricular
materials under subsection (a); and
(B) requirements for curricular materials to be approved
and included on the list described in subsection (a); and
(2) collaborate with teachers in evaluating and approving high
quality curricular materials in English/language arts under
HEA 1004 — Concur

47
subsection (a).
(c) The department shall publish an annual report that
describes the method used to conduct the evaluation required
under subsection (a) and that contains the results of the evaluation.
The report must do the following:
(1) Provide a list of each curricular material evaluated and a
summary of the evaluation for each curricular material.
(2) Provide a listing and summary review for the high quality
curricular materials approved by the department.
(3) Include any clarification or response from the publisher of
a curricular material related to the department's summary
review provided under subdivision (2).
(4) Include the written, exact, and standard statewide price
provided by the publisher of the curricular material under
subsection (e) for each high quality curricular material
approved by the department under this section.
(d) A governing body and superintendent may use the list
approved under subsection (a) in complying with IC 20-26-12-24.
(e) Before the department may approve curricular material for
inclusion on the list under subsection (a), the publisher of the
curricular material must:
(1) provide the department a written, exact, and standard
statewide price for each curricular material; and
(2) enter into a data share agreement with the department in
the manner prescribed by the department.
(f) A publisher may request that an update to the publisher's
curricular materials and corresponding prices replace the
information on the curricular materials set forth in the report
under subsection (c).
(g) At a minimum, the process for evaluating curricular
materials and the requirements for curricular materials to be
approved and included on the list described in subsection (a) must
include the following:
(1) The availability and use of benchmark, formative, interim,
or similar assessments to identify students that require
remediation or enrichment and provide individualized
instruction.
(2) The incorporation of experiential learning opportunities.
(3) An evaluation of the benchmark, formative, interim, or
similar assessment data provided by the publisher of the
curricular material pursuant to the data share agreement
described in subsection (e).
HEA 1004 — Concur

48
(4) The alignment of the curricular material to Indiana's
academic standards developed by the department under
IC 20-31-3-2.
(5) The age appropriateness of the content.
Sec. 2. (a) The secretary of education shall notify the governing
bodies of each school corporation, charter school, and state
accredited nonpublic school immediately of:
(1) the initial publication and annual update on the
department's website of the report described in section 1(c) of
this chapter, including the website address where the report
is published; and
(2) updates of the following types of information in the report
described in section 1(c) of this chapter:
(A) The addition of materials.
(B) The removal of materials.
(C) Changes in the per unit price of curricular materials
that exceed five percent (5%).
(b) A notification under this section must state that:
(1) the reviews of curricular materials included in the report
described in section 1(c) of this chapter are departmental
reviews only; and
(2) each governing body has authority to adopt curricular
materials for a school corporation.
Chapter 5. High School Diploma Program for Eligible Veterans
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "department of veterans' affairs"
refers to the Indiana department of veterans' affairs established by
IC 10-17-1-2.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "diploma" refers to a high school
diploma.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "eligible veteran" refers to an
individual who has the following qualifications:
(1) Served as a member of the armed forces of the United
States at any time during at least one (1) of the following
periods:
(A) Beginning April 6, 1917, and ending November 11,
1918 (World War I).
(B) Beginning December 7, 1941, and ending December 31,
1946 (World War II).
(C) Beginning June 27, 1950, and ending January 31, 1955
(Korean Conflict).
(D) Beginning August 5, 1964, and ending May 7, 1975
(Vietnam Conflict).
HEA 1004 — Concur

49
(2) Before the military service described in subdivision (1):
(A) attended a public or nonpublic high school in Indiana;
and
(B) was a student in good standing at the high school
described in clause (A), to the satisfaction of the
department of veterans' affairs.
(3) Did not graduate or receive a diploma because of leaving
the high school described in subdivision (2) for the military
service described in subdivision (1).
(4) Was discharged from the armed forces of the United
States under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the high
school diploma program for eligible veterans established by section
6 of this chapter.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "school corporation" includes a
successor school corporation serving the area where a high school
that no longer exists was once located.
Sec. 6. The high school diploma program for eligible veterans is
established to provide for the issuance of high school diplomas to
certain veterans.
Sec. 7. (a) The department and the department of veterans'
affairs shall jointly design a form for the application for issuance
of a diploma under the program.
(b) The application form must require at least the following
information about an eligible veteran:
(1) Personal identification information.
(2) Military service information, including a copy of the
eligible veteran's discharge from military service under
conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
(3) High school information, including the following:
(A) Name and address, including county, of the last high
school attended.
(B) Whether the high school was a public or nonpublic
school.
(C) Years attended.
(D) Year of leaving high school to begin military service.
(E) Year in which the veteran would have graduated if the
veteran had not left high school to begin military service.
(4) If the high school attended was a public school, whether
the veteran prefers receiving a diploma issued by:
HEA 1004 — Concur

50
(A) the state board; or
(B) the governing body of the school corporation governing
the high school.
Sec. 8. The department of veterans' affairs shall do the following
for individuals that the department of veterans' affairs has reason
to believe may be eligible to apply for a diploma under the
program:
(1) Give notice of the program.
(2) Describe the application procedure.
(3) Furnish an application form.
Sec. 9. The following individuals may apply for the issuance of
a diploma to an eligible veteran under the program:
(1) An eligible veteran, including an eligible veteran who has
received a general educational development (GED) diploma
issued under IC 20-20-6 (before its repeal) or IC 22-4.1-18, or
a similar diploma.
(2) An individual who is:
(A) the surviving spouse of; or
(B) otherwise related to;
an eligible veteran who is deceased.
Sec. 10. An applicant for a diploma under the program must
submit a completed application form to the department of
veterans' affairs.
Sec. 11. Upon receipt of an application, the department of
veterans' affairs shall do the following:
(1) Verify the accuracy of the information in the application,
in consultation with the department, if necessary.
(2) Forward the verified application to the department.
Sec. 12. Upon receipt of a verified application, the department
shall do the following:
(1) If the applicant:
(A) expresses a preference in the application to receive a
diploma issued by the state board; or
(B) attended a nonpublic high school before leaving high
school for military service;
the department shall present a diploma issued by the state
board.
(2) If the applicant expresses a preference for receiving a
diploma from the governing body of the school corporation
containing the public high school that the eligible veteran left
for military service, the department shall direct the governing
body of the affected school corporation to issue and present
HEA 1004 — Concur

51
the diploma.
Sec. 13. (a) The department and governing bodies are
encouraged but are not required to hold a ceremony to present a
diploma that is issued under the program.
(b) Upon request of a governing body, the department, in
cooperation with the department of veterans' affairs, shall assist
the governing body to develop a variety of formats for appropriate
ceremonies at which to award diplomas under the program.
Sec. 14. (a) The state board shall design a unique
commemorative diploma for the board to issue to eligible veterans
who:
(1) attended a public high school and express in the
application a preference for receiving a diploma that the state
board issues; or
(2) attended a nonpublic high school.
(b) The state board shall design a unique commemorative
diploma that a governing body may choose to issue under the
program.
Sec. 15. (a) A governing body may design a unique
commemorative diploma for the governing body to issue under the
program.
(b) A governing body that issues a diploma under the program
shall issue one (1) of the following types of diplomas:
(1) The diploma described in subsection (a).
(2) The diploma designed by the state board under section
14(b) of this chapter.
(3) The same diploma that the governing body issues to
current graduates.
Sec. 16. The department and the department of veterans' affairs
shall work cooperatively to jointly administer this chapter.
Sec. 17. A fee may not be charged to process an application or
to award a diploma under this chapter.
Sec. 18. The department and the department of veterans' affairs
may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter.
Chapter 6. Educational Technology Program and Grants
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "fund" refers to the Senator
David C. Ford educational technology fund established under
section 3 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "technology equipment" means
computer hardware, computer software, related teacher training
services, related instructional manuals and materials, and
equipment servicing.
HEA 1004 — Concur

52
Sec. 3. (a) The Senator David C. Ford educational technology
fund is established to extend educational technologies to
elementary and secondary schools. The fund may be used for:
(1) a school technology program developed by the
department. The program may include grants to school
corporations for the purchase of:
(A) equipment, hardware, and software;
(B) learning and teaching systems; and
(C) other materials;
that promote student learning, as determined by the
department;
(2) conducting educational technology training for teachers;
(3) other innovative educational technology programs; and
(4) providing professional learning opportunities for
educators regarding digital learning.
(b) The department may also use money in the fund under
contracts entered into with the office of technology established by
IC 4-13.1-2-1 to study the feasibility of establishing an information
telecommunications gateway that provides access to information
on employment opportunities, career development, and
instructional services from data bases operated by the state among
the following:
(1) Elementary and secondary schools.
(2) Postsecondary educational institutions.
(3) Career and technical educational centers and institutions
that are not postsecondary educational institutions.
(4) Libraries.
(5) Any other agencies offering education and training
programs.
(c) The fund consists of:
(1) state appropriations;
(2) private donations to the fund; or
(3) any combination of the amounts described in subdivisions
(1) and (2).
(d) The fund shall be administered by the department.
(e) Unexpended money appropriated to or otherwise available
in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert to the
state general fund but remains available to the department for use
under this chapter.
Sec. 4. Upon the approval of the governor and the budget
agency, the department may use funds available under this chapter
to provide or extend education technology to any school
HEA 1004 — Concur

53
corporation for purposes described in this chapter.
Sec. 5. The department shall develop guidelines necessary to
implement this chapter, including guidelines that require the
school corporation to use the laboratories to the fullest extent
possible.
Sec. 6. To be eligible to receive money under this chapter, a
school corporation must apply to the department on forms
provided by the department.
Sec. 7. A school corporation that receives a grant under this
chapter must deposit the grant in the school corporation's
education fund.
Chapter 7. School Intervention and Career Counseling
Development Program and Fund
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "fund" refers to the school
intervention and career counseling development fund established
by section 4 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "grant" refers to a grant from
the fund.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "school intervention and career
counseling development program" refers to a program carried out
under this chapter:
(1) for kindergarten through grade 6; and
(2) by a licensed school counselor.
Sec. 4. (a) As a result of a comprehensive study conducted by the
department on the role of school counselors, including the
expanding role of school counselors in career development under
workforce development programs that affect public schools, the
school intervention and career counseling development fund is
established. The money in the fund shall be used to develop
counseling models in a limited number of school corporations as
determined by the department under this chapter.
(b) If a school corporation is awarded a grant under this
chapter, the school corporation must:
(1) agree to evaluate the impact and results of the school
corporation's program; and
(2) submit the school corporation's findings to the
department.
(c) The department shall administer the fund.
(d) The fund consists of:
(1) gifts to the fund;
(2) appropriations from the general assembly;
(3) grants, including grants from private entities; and
HEA 1004 — Concur

54
(4) a combination of the resources described in subdivisions
(1), (2), and (3).
Sec. 5. Subject to section 6 of this chapter, for a school
corporation to be eligible to receive a grant under this chapter, the
following must occur:
(1) The superintendent of the school corporation must apply
to the department for a grant on forms provided by the
department.
(2) The application for a grant must include the following
information:
(A) A detailed description of a proposal for initiating or
expanding a school intervention or career counseling
program.
(B) Evidence supporting the school corporation's need to
implement the school intervention or career counseling
program.
(C) The number of elementary school counselors employed
by the school corporation.
(D) The elementary school counselor/student ratio for the
school corporation.
(E) Any other pertinent information required by the
department, including evidence guaranteeing that if the
school corporation receives a grant under this chapter, the
school corporation has developed a plan to evaluate the
impact and results of the school corporation's program.
Sec. 6. The department may award grants to school
corporations:
(1) upon review of the applications received under section 5 of
this chapter;
(2) subject to available money; and
(3) in accordance with the following priorities:
(A) To the extent possible, to achieve geographic balance
throughout Indiana and to include urban, suburban, and
rural school corporations.
(B) To address a documented need for new or expanded
school intervention or career counseling programs,
including considering the percentage of students within the
school corporation who are designated as at risk students.
(C) To promote innovative methods for initiating or
expanding school intervention or career counseling
programs.
(D) To reward school corporations that propose school
HEA 1004 — Concur

55
intervention or career counseling programs that
demonstrate the greatest potential for replication and
implementation in Indiana.
(E) To lower school counselor/student ratios where the
ratios are excessively high.
Sec. 7. (a) Subject to subsection (b), the department shall
determine the amount of each grant that is awarded under this
chapter.
(b) A grant to a particular school corporation may not exceed:
(1) fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each full-time
counselor for each academic year, or seven thousand five
hundred dollars ($7,500) for each full-time counselor for each
semester; and
(2) the following total grant awards as each relates to the
ADM of the school corporation at the time the school
corporation applies for the grant:
(A) For a school corporation with an ADM of not more
than five thousand (5,000), seventy-five thousand dollars
($75,000).
(B) For a school corporation with an ADM of at least five
thousand one (5,001) and not more than nine thousand
nine hundred ninety-nine (9,999), one hundred twenty
thousand dollars ($120,000).
(C) For a school corporation with an ADM of at least ten
thousand (10,000), one hundred eighty thousand dollars
($180,000).
Sec. 8. A grant received by a school corporation may be
expended by the school corporation for a twenty-four (24) month
period.
Sec. 9. The department shall develop guidelines necessary to
implement this chapter.
Chapter 8. Early Childhood Programs
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "early childhood program"
refers to a voluntary parental education program for parents of
children from birth to less than three (3) years of age that provides
these parents with information and activities to help the parents
better prepare children for school.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "latch key program" means a
voluntary school age child care program for children who attend
kindergarten through grade 6 and that at a minimum, operates
after the school day and may include periods before school is in
session or during periods when school is not in session.
HEA 1004 — Concur

56
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "preschool program" refers to
a voluntary school readiness program for children who are at least
three (3) years of age and not enrolled in at least kindergarten.
Sec. 4. A school corporation may enter into an agreement with
a private or nonprofit corporation to provide early childhood
education programs, preschool programs, or latch key programs.
However, if a school corporation enters into a contract for a
preschool program, the private or nonprofit corporation must
operate a federally approved preschool program.
Sec. 5. The department shall develop guidelines necessary to
implement this chapter.
Chapter 9. Alternative Education Program Grants
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "alternative education program"
means an alternative education program (as defined in
IC 20-30-8-1).
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "full-time equivalent students"
means the number of students determined under IC 20-30-8-16.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "qualifying school corporation"
means a school corporation, including a charter school, that has
been approved under IC 20-30-8-8 to receive a grant under this
chapter.
Sec. 4. A qualifying school corporation is eligible to receive a
grant from the state for each full-time equivalent student who is
enrolled in an alternative education program conducted for the
school corporation.
Sec. 5. The maximum amount that may be granted to a
qualifying school corporation in a school year is seven hundred
fifty dollars ($750) per full-time equivalent student.
Sec. 6. To receive a grant under this chapter, a school
corporation must expend on alternative education programs in the
school year a matching amount of at least one-third (1/3) of the
amount of the state grant per full-time equivalent student, as
determined under the rules adopted by the state board.
Sec. 7. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the department
shall distribute a grant under this chapter to a qualifying school
corporation not later than September 1. The grant must be for the
number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in and attending
an alternative education program from July 1 through June 30 of
the immediately preceding school year and reported to the
department under IC 20-30-8-15.
(b) The department may authorize additional distributions for
approved programs if the total amount of the distributions to a
HEA 1004 — Concur

57
school corporation during a school year under this subsection does
not exceed a maximum amount of seven hundred fifty dollars
($750) per full-time equivalent student reported under
IC 20-30-8-15.
Chapter 10. Career and Technical Education
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "career and technical education"
means any secondary level vocational, agricultural, occupational,
manpower, employment, or technical training or retraining that:
(1) enhances an individual's career potential and further
education; and
(2) is accessible to individuals who desire to explore and learn
for economic and personal growth leading to employment
opportunities.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "commission" refers to the
commission for higher education established by IC 21-18-2-1.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "employment training" means all
programs administered by the following:
(1) The commission.
(2) The Indiana jobs training program.
(3) The department.
Sec. 4. (a) The state board shall develop and implement a long
range state plan for a comprehensive secondary level career and
technical education program in Indiana.
(b) The plan developed under this section must be updated as
changes occur. The state board shall make the plan and any
revisions made to the plan available to:
(1) the governor;
(2) the general assembly;
(3) the department of workforce development;
(4) the commission for higher education;
(5) the board for proprietary education; and
(6) any other appropriate state or federal agency.
A plan or revised plan submitted under this section to the general
assembly must be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(c) The plan developed under this section must set forth specific
goals for secondary level public career and technical education and
must include the following:
(1) The preparation of each graduate for both employment
and further education.
(2) Accessibility of career and technical education to
individuals of all ages who desire to explore and learn for
economic and personal growth.
HEA 1004 — Concur

58
(3) Projected employment opportunities in various career and
technical education fields.
(4) A study of the supply of and the demand for a labor force
skilled in particular career and technical education areas.
(5) A study of technological and economic change affecting
Indiana.
(6) An analysis of the private career and education sector in
Indiana.
(7) Recommendations for improvement in the state career and
technical education program.
(8) The educational levels expected of career and technical
education programs proposed to meet the projected
employment needs.
(d) When making any revisions to the plan, the state board shall
consider the workforce needs and training and education needs
identified in the occupational demand report prepared by the
department of workforce development under IC 22-4.1-4-10
(before its expiration).
(e) The state board shall use data from the department of
workforce development to develop and implement a plan or make
revisions to a plan under this section.
Sec. 5. (a) The state board shall do the following:
(1) Prepare biennially a plan for implementing career and
technical education.
(2) Implement, to the best of its ability, the career and
technical education plan prepared under subdivision (1).
(3) Investigate the funding of career and technical education
on a cost basis.
(4) Establish and monitor the operation of secondary level
career and technical education in Indiana in accordance with
the comprehensive long range state plan developed under
section 4 of this chapter.
(5) In consultation with the Indiana professional licensing
agency, adopt rules concerning secondary level career and
technical education programs, courses, and classes in the
areas of cosmetology, electrology, esthetics, barbering, and
manicuring.
(6) To comply with this section and any federal law or
regulation:
(A) adopt rules under IC 4-22-2; and
(B) develop policies and administrative procedures.
(b) The state board shall use data from the department of
HEA 1004 — Concur

59
workforce development to carry out the state board's duties under
this section.
Sec. 6. (a) The state board shall do the following:
(1) Make recommendations to the general assembly
concerning the development, duplication, and accessibility of
employment training and career and technical education on
a regional and statewide basis.
(2) Consult with any state agency, commission, or
organization that supervises or administers programs of
career and technical education concerning the coordination of
career and technical education, including the following:
(A) The Indiana economic development corporation.
(B) A private industry council (as defined in 29 U.S.C. 1501
et seq.).
(C) The department of labor.
(D) The commission for higher education.
(E) The department of workforce development.
(F) The board for proprietary education.
(G) The department of veterans' affairs.
(3) Review and make recommendations concerning plans
submitted by the commission for higher education. The state
board may request the resubmission of plans or parts of plans
that:
(A) are not consistent with the long range state plan of the
state board;
(B) are incompatible with other plans within the system; or
(C) duplicate existing services.
(4) Report to the general assembly on the state board's
conclusions and recommendations concerning interagency
cooperation, coordination, and articulation of career and
technical education and employment training. A report under
this subdivision must be in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
(5) Study and develop a plan concerning the transition
between secondary level career and technical education and
postsecondary level career and technical education.
(b) The state board shall use data from the department of
workforce development in carrying out the state board's duties
under this section.
Sec. 7. (a) The state board may do the following:
(1) Make recommendations, including recommendations for
policies to encourage involvement of minority groups in the
HEA 1004 — Concur

60
career and technical education system in Indiana, to:
(A) the governor;
(B) the general assembly, in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6; and
(C) the various agencies, commissions, or organizations
that administer career and technical education programs
concerning all facets of career and technical education
programming.
(2) Establish a regional planning and coordination system for
career and technical education and employment training that
will, either in whole or in part, serve career and technical
education and employment training in Indiana.
(3) Appoint advisory committees whenever necessary.
(4) Contract for services necessary to carry out this chapter.
(5) Provide information and advice on career and technical
education to a business, an industry, or a labor organization
operating a job training program in the private sector.
(b) The state board shall use data from the department of
workforce development in making recommendations, establishing
a regional planning and coordination system, or providing
information and advice under subsection (a).
Sec. 8. (a) The state board shall adopt statewide systems or
policies concerning the following as the systems or policies relate
to the implementation of career and technical education programs:
(1) Student records.
(2) Data processing at the secondary level.
(3) An evaluation system that must be conducted by the state
board at least annually and that evaluates the following as
each relates to the career and technical education programs
and courses offered at the secondary level:
(A) Graduation rates.
(B) Student placement rates.
(C) Retention rates.
(D) Enrollment.
(E) Student transfer rates to postsecondary educational
institutions.
(F) When applicable, student performance on state
licensing examinations or other external certification
examinations.
(G) Cost data study.
(4) A system of financial audits to be conducted at least
biennially at the secondary level.
HEA 1004 — Concur

61
(b) The state board shall use data from the department of
workforce development in adopting statewide systems or policies
under subsection (a).
Sec. 9. (a) The state board shall establish career and technical
education evaluation criteria.
(b) Using the criteria established under subsection (a), the state
board shall evaluate the effectiveness of career and technical
education relative to the goals of the long range plan developed
under section 4 of this chapter.
(c) The state board shall use data from the department of
workforce development in establishing career and technical
education evaluation criteria under subsection (a).
Sec. 10. (a) The state board shall develop a definition for and
report biennially to:
(1) the general assembly; and
(2) the governor;
on attrition and persistence rates by students enrolled in secondary
career and technical education. A biennial report under this section
to the general assembly must be in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
(b) The state board shall use data from the department of
workforce development in developing a definition and a report
under subsection (a).
Sec. 11. Upon request of the budget director, the state board
shall prepare a legislative budget request for state funds for
secondary and postsecondary career and technical education. The
budget director shall determine the period to be covered by the
budget request. This budget request must be made available to the
commission for higher education before the request's review by the
budget committee.
Sec. 12. (a) The state board shall review the legislative budget
requests for secondary and postsecondary career and technical
education prepared by the state educational institutions.
(b) After the review under subsection (a) and a review of any
recommendations from the commission for higher education, the
state board shall make recommendations to the budget committee
concerning the appropriation of state funds for secondary and
postsecondary career and technical education. The state board's
recommendations concerning appropriations and allocations for
secondary and postsecondary career and technical education by
secondary schools and state educational institutions must specify:
(1) the categories of expenditures and the distribution plan or
HEA 1004 — Concur

62
formula for secondary schools; and
(2) the categories of expenditures for each state educational
institution.
(c) After reviewing the state board's recommendations, and
each agency's budget request, the budget committee shall make
recommendations to the general assembly for funding to
implement secondary and postsecondary career and technical
education. The general assembly shall biennially appropriate state
funds for secondary and postsecondary career and technical
education and allocate federal funds available under 20 U.S.C.
2301 et seq. for secondary and postsecondary career and technical
education. At least sixty percent (60%) of the federal funds
available under 20 U.S.C. 2301 et seq. must be allocated to
secondary level career and technical education to implement the
long range state plan developed under section 4 of this chapter.
(d) The budget agency, with the advice of the state board, and
the budget committee, may augment or proportionately reduce an
allocation of federal funds made under subsection (c).
(e) The state board shall use data from the department of
workforce development in making a recommendation under this
section.
Sec. 13. The state board shall distribute state funds made
available for secondary and postsecondary career and technical
education that have been appropriated by the general assembly
and in accordance with the plan prepared by:
(1) the state board under section 5 of this chapter; and
(2) the commission for higher education.
Sec. 14. (a) The state board may employ any staff necessary to
perform the duties imposed by this chapter and fix the
compensation and terms of that employment, subject to approval
by the budget agency.
(b) The state board may authorize the department, whenever
practical or necessary, to assist the state board in carrying out the
duties prescribed by this chapter.
Sec. 15. (a) An emancipated student or the parent of a student
enrolled in a career or technical education course may voluntarily
release information, on a form prescribed by the department,
pertaining to the student's enrollment in the career and technical
education course to potential employers that contact the school to
recruit students with particular career and technical skills. A
school must provide a copy of the form described in this subsection
to the emancipated student or the parent of the student when the
HEA 1004 — Concur

63
student enrolls in the career and technical education course.
(b) If an emancipated student or the parent of a student
described in subsection (a) voluntarily releases information under
subsection (a), the school shall also provide the department of
workforce development a copy of the student's voluntarily released
enrollment information. The department of workforce
development may provide the student's voluntarily released
enrollment information to potential employers that contact the
department of workforce development to recruit students with
particular career and technical skills.
(c) The form prescribed in subsection (a) must comply with the
federal Family Education Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. 1232g
et seq.).
Sec. 16. The state board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 as
necessary to carry out the duties imposed by this chapter.
Chapter 11. Insurance Coverage for Work Based Learning
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "work based learning course"
has the meaning set forth in IC 20-43-8-0.7.
Sec. 2. (a) The department shall maintain a:
(1) contract with a company to provide; or
(2) memorandum of understanding:
(A) with a statewide entity that represents business
interests in multiple industries; and
(B) that provides that the entity agrees to facilitate the
procurement of;
adequate employer liability and worker's compensation insurance
coverage for an employer described in section 3 of this chapter.
(b) The total amount of funds that the department may expend
to implement this section must be less than one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000).
Sec. 3. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an employer that employs
a student in a work based learning course may purchase employer
liability and worker's compensation insurance coverage described
in section 2 of this chapter for the student.
(b) An employer is responsible for any costs associated with the
purchase of employer liability and worker's compensation
insurance coverage under this chapter.
Sec. 4. If the department is unable to maintain a contract or
memorandum of understanding under section 2(a) of this chapter,
the department is not required to maintain a contract with a
company or a memorandum of understanding as provided under
section 2 of this chapter.
HEA 1004 — Concur

64
Sec. 5. The employer liability and worker's compensation
insurance coverage provided under this chapter must be approved
by the department of insurance.
Sec. 6. The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
Chapter 12. Operational Efficiency Reviews
Sec. 1. A school corporation shall submit to the department any
information the department determines is necessary to:
(1) evaluate the school corporation's current operations; and
(2) recommend operational efficiencies and financial savings
for the school corporation.
Chapter 13. Restraint and Seclusion Commission
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "behavioral intervention plan"
means a plan that is agreed upon by the case conference committee
(as defined in IC 20-35-9-3) and incorporated into a student's
individualized education program (as defined in IC 20-18-2-9) and
that describes the following:
(1) The pattern of behavior that impedes the student's
learning or the learning of others.
(2) The purpose or function of the behavior as identified in a
functional behavioral assessment.
(3) The positive interventions and supports, and other
strategies, to:
(A) address the behavior; and
(B) maximize consistency of implementation across people
and settings in which the student is involved.
(4) If applicable, the skills that will be taught and monitored
in an effort to change a specific pattern of behavior of the
student.
The behavioral intervention plan seeks to maximize consistency of
implementation across people and settings in which the student is
involved.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "chemical restraint" means the
administration of a drug or medication to manage a student's
behavior or restrict a student's freedom of movement that is not a
standard treatment and dosage for the student's medical or
psychiatric condition.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "commission" refers to the
commission on seclusion and restraint in schools established by
section 11 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) As used in this chapter, "mechanical restraint" means
the use of:
HEA 1004 — Concur

65
(1) a mechanical device;
(2) a material; or
(3) equipment;
attached or adjacent to a student's body that the student cannot
remove and that restricts the freedom of movement of all or part
of the student's body or restricts normal access to the student's
body.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) mechanical devices;
(2) a material; or
(3) equipment;
used as prescribed by a doctor.
Sec. 5. (a) As used in this chapter, "physical restraint" means
physical contact between a school employee and a student:
(1) in which the student unwillingly participates; and
(2) that involves the use of a manual hold to restrict freedom
of movement of all or part of a student's body or to restrict
normal access to the student's body.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) briefly holding a student without undue force in order to
calm or comfort the student, or to prevent unsafe behavior,
such as running into traffic or engaging in a physical
altercation;
(2) physical escort; or
(3) physical contact intended to gently assist or prompt a
student in performing a task or to guide or assist a student
from one (1) area to another.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "positive behavior intervention
and support" means a systematic approach that:
(1) uses evidence based practices and data driven decision
making to improve school climate and culture; and
(2) includes a range of systematic and individualized
strategies to reinforce desired behavior and diminish
reoccurrence of problem behavior;
to achieve improved academic and social outcomes and increase
learning for all students.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "school corporation" includes a
charter school that is not a virtual charter school.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "school employee" means an
individual employed by a school corporation or a state accredited
nonpublic school.
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "seclusion" means the
HEA 1004 — Concur

66
confinement of a student alone in a room or area from which the
student physically is prevented from leaving. The term does not
include a supervised time-out or scheduled break, as described in
a student's individualized education program, in which an adult is
continuously present in the room with the student.
Sec. 10. As used in this chapter, "time-out" means a behavior
reduction procedure in which access to reinforcement is withdrawn
for a certain period of time. Time-out occurs when the ability of a
student to receive normal reinforcement in the school environment
is restricted. The term does not include a supervised time-out or
scheduled break, as described in a student's individualized
education program.
Sec. 11. (a) The commission on seclusion and restraint in schools
is established.
(b) The commission has the following ten (10) members:
(1) The designee of the secretary of education, who serves at
the pleasure of the secretary of education.
(2) A representative of the Autism Society of Indiana, chosen
by the organization, who serves a two (2) year term.
(3) A representative of the Arc of Indiana, chosen by the
organization, who serves a two (2) year term.
(4) A representative of the Indiana Council of Administrators
of Special Education, chosen by the organization, who serves
a two (2) year term.
(5) A representative of Mental Health America of Indiana,
chosen by the organization, who serves a two (2) year term.
(6) A parent of a student with a disability, nominated by a
member described in subdivisions (2), (3), and (5) and
approved by a majority of the members described in
subdivisions (1) through (5) and (8) through (10), who serves
a two (2) year term.
(7) A parent of a student who does not have a disability,
nominated by a member described in subdivisions (2), (3), and
(5) and approved by a majority of the members described in
subdivisions (1) through (5) and (8) through (10), who serves
a two (2) year term.
(8) One (1) state accredited nonpublic school administrator
nominated by the Indiana Non-public Education Association,
who serves a two (2) year term.
(9) One (1) public school superintendent nominated by the
Indiana Association of Public School Superintendents, who
serves a two (2) year term.
HEA 1004 — Concur

67
(10) One (1) member of the Indiana School Resource Officers
Association chosen by the organization, who serves a two (2)
year term.
(c) Each member of the commission who is not a state employee
is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). A member who is not a state employee is also
entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses and other
expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's duties,
as provided in the state travel policies and procedures established
by the Indiana department of administration and approved by the
budget agency.
Sec. 12. (a) The designee of the secretary of education under
section 11(b)(1) of this chapter serves as chairperson of the
commission.
(b) The commission shall meet at least biannually on the call of
the chairperson, and may meet as often as is necessary. The
chairperson shall provide not less than fourteen (14) days notice of
a meeting to the members of the commission and to the public.
(c) The affirmative votes of at least five (5) members of the
commission are necessary for the commission to take action. The
votes of the commission must be recorded.
(d) All commission meetings shall be open to the public, and
each meeting must include opportunities for public comment.
(e) The department shall provide staff support for the
commission.
Sec. 13. (a) The commission has the following duties:
(1) To adopt rules concerning the following:
(A) The use of restraint and seclusion in a school
corporation or a state accredited nonpublic school, with an
emphasis on eliminating or minimizing the use of restraint
and seclusion.
(B) The prevention of the use of types of restraint or
seclusion that may harm a student, a school employee, a
school volunteer, or the educational environment of the
school.
(C) Requirements for notifying parents.
(D) Training regarding the use of restraint and seclusion,
including the frequency of training and what employees
must be trained.
(E) The distribution of the seclusion and restraint policy to
parents and the public.
(F) Requirements for the reporting of incidents of restraint
HEA 1004 — Concur

68
and seclusion in the annual school performance report,
including incidents of restraint and seclusion involving
school resource officers (as defined in IC 20-26-18.2-1).
(G) Circumstances that may require more timely incident
reporting and the requirements for such reporting.
(2) To develop, maintain, and revise a model restraint and
seclusion plan for schools that includes the following
elements:
(A) A statement on how students will be treated with
dignity and respect and how appropriate student behavior
will be promoted and taught.
(B) A statement ensuring that the school will use
prevention, positive behavior intervention and support,
and conflict de-escalation to eliminate or minimize the
need for use of any of the following:
(i) Seclusion.
(ii) Chemical restraint.
(iii) Mechanical restraint.
(iv) Physical restraint.
(v) Time-out.
(C) A statement ensuring that any behavioral intervention
used will be consistent with the student's most current
behavioral intervention plan, or individualized education
program, if applicable.
(D) Definitions for restraint and seclusion, as defined in
this chapter.
(E) A statement ensuring that if a procedure listed in
clause (B) is used, the procedure will be used:
(i) as a last resort safety procedure, employed only after
another, less restrictive procedure has been implemented
without success; and
(ii) in a situation in which there is an imminent risk of
injury to the student, other students, school employees,
or visitors to the school.
(F) An indication that restraint or seclusion may be used
only for a short time period, or until the imminent risk of
injury has passed.
(G) A documentation and recording requirement
governing instances in which procedures listed in clause
(B) are used, including:
(i) how every incident will be documented and debriefed;
(ii) how responsibilities will be assigned to designated
HEA 1004 — Concur

69
employees for evaluation and oversight; and
(iii) designation of a school employee to be the keeper of
such documents.
(H) A requirement that the student's parent must be
notified as soon as possible when an incident involving the
student occurs that includes use of procedures listed in
clause (B).
(I) A requirement that a copy of an incident report must be
sent to the student's parent after the student is subject to
a procedure listed in clause (B).
(J) Required recurrent training for appropriate school
employees on the appropriate use of effective alternatives
to physical restraint and seclusion, including the use of
positive behavioral intervention and support and conflict
de-escalation. The training must include the safe use of
physical restraint and seclusion in incidents involving
imminent danger or serious harm to the student, school
employees, or others. Consideration must be given to
available school resources and the time commitments of
school employees.
(3) To accept and review reports from the public and make
nonbinding recommendations to the department of any
suggested action to be taken.
(4) To biannually provide a report to the state advisory
council on the education of children with disabilities
appointed under IC 20-35-3-1 regarding the:
(A) execution of the commission's duties under this section;
and
(B) review of incident reports under section 15 of this
chapter.
(b) The model policy developed by the commission must take
into consideration that implementation and reporting
requirements for state accredited nonpublic schools may vary, and
the model plan must provide state accredited nonpublic schools
flexibility with regards to accountability under and implementation
of the plan adopted by a state accredited nonpublic school under
section 16 of this chapter.
Sec. 14. If the department has been advised of a discrepancy in
a report under section 13(a)(3) of this chapter, the department
shall require the school to provide a written explanation of the
discrepancy to the department which must comply with the federal
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. 1232g and
HEA 1004 — Concur

70
34 CFR Part 99).
Sec. 15. (a) The department shall biannually review incident
reports under rules established by the commission under IC 4-22-2
and submit summary findings to the commission in compliance
with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20
U.S.C. 1232g and 34 CFR Part 99).
(b) The commission shall biannually review summary findings
submitted by the department under subsection (a) and may make
nonbinding recommendations to the department or other entities.
(c) If the department receives a recommendation from the
commission under subsection (b), the department shall provide the
commission a response with regard to the commission's
recommendation in a manner prescribed by the department within
a reasonable time after the department receives the
recommendation from the commission.
Sec. 16. (a) A school corporation or state accredited nonpublic
school shall adopt a restraint and seclusion plan that incorporates,
at a minimum, the elements of the model plan developed under
section 13 of this chapter. The school corporation's or state
accredited nonpublic school's plan must become effective not later
than July 1, 2014.
(b) The department has the authority to require schools to
submit plans developed in accordance with section 13 of this
chapter.
Sec. 17. (a) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prevent
a school employee from stopping a physical altercation, acting to
prevent physical harm to a student or another individual, or acting
to address an emergency until the emergency is over, whether or
not the school employee has received training under this chapter.
(b) This chapter may not be construed to give rise to a cause of
action, either civil or criminal, against the state, the department, a
school corporation, a state accredited nonpublic school, the
commission, or a member of the commission.
(c) In all matters relating to the plan adopted under section 16
of this chapter, school corporation or state accredited nonpublic
school personnel have qualified immunity with respect to an action
taken to promote student conduct under a plan adopted under
section 16 of this chapter if the action is taken in good faith and is
reasonable.
Sec. 18. The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
carry out the purposes of this chapter.
Chapter 14. Dual Language Pilot Program
HEA 1004 — Concur

71
Sec. 1. The department, with the approval of the state board,
shall establish and maintain a dual language immersion program
to provide grants, in an amount not to exceed fifty thousand dollars
($50,000), to school corporations and charter schools that establish
dual language immersion programs in:
(1) Chinese;
(2) Spanish;
(3) French; or
(4) any other language approved by the department.
Sec. 2. A school corporation or charter school may be eligible to
receive a grant under this chapter if:
(1) the school corporation or charter school uses an
instructional model that provides at least fifty percent (50%)
of its instruction in English and fifty percent (50%) of its
instruction in a language described in section 1 of this
chapter;
(2) the program that uses an instructional model described in
subdivision (1) begins either in kindergarten or in grade 1;
and
(3) the program described in subdivision (2) meets any other
requirements established by the department, with the
approval of the state board.
Sec. 3. A school corporation or charter school desiring to receive
a grant under this chapter shall apply to the department for a
grant in the manner and on a form prescribed by the department.
Sec. 4. (a) The dual language immersion program fund is
established to be used to provide grants under this chapter.
(b) The fund consists of:
(1) appropriations made by the general assembly; and
(2) gifts and donations to the fund.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the department.
(d) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
(f) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested.
Sec. 5. The state board may establish rules necessary to
administer this chapter.
Chapter 15. System for Teacher and Student Advancement
Grant Fund and Program
HEA 1004 — Concur

72
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "fund" refers to the system for
teacher and student advancement grant fund established by section
3 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to a teacher
performance model program described in section 4 of this chapter.
Sec. 3. (a) The system for teacher and student advancement
grant fund is established for the purpose of providing grants to
school corporations and charter schools to implement programs
described in section 4 of this chapter.
(b) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations made by the general assembly.
(2) Gifts, grants, devises, or bequests made to the commission
for higher education to achieve the purposes of the fund.
(c) The state board, in consultation with the department, shall
administer the fund.
(d) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 4. (a) As used in this section, "literacy coach" has the
meaning set forth in IC 20-20.5-20-4.
(b) A school corporation or charter school may receive a grant
to implement the following:
(1) The System for Teacher and Student Advancement (TAP)
teacher performance model program.
(2) The Opportunity Culture teacher performance model.
(3) A model teacher performance program approved by a
national school employee organization.
(4) A teacher performance model program that includes the
implementation of all the following elements:
(A) A comprehensive pay progression for teacher leaders
based on demonstrated skill development, escalating levels
of responsibility and duties, and demonstrated academic
leadership.
(B) A quality teacher assessment system that measures the
effectiveness of teachers' practice.
(C) A pay system that supports early career educators by
incentivizing the following:
HEA 1004 — Concur

73
(i) Mentoring and coaching.
(ii) Reducing teaching loads or providing release time for
teacher leaders to support professional learning.
(iii) Reviewing professional portfolios and student
performance.
(D) Eligibility for all teachers rated effective and highly
effective.
(E) Connection to high quality professional development,
including release time for teacher leaders providing
professional development and instructional coaching, that
provides teachers with the knowledge and skills needed to
advance student learning.
(F) A rigorous and transparent advancement criterion that
is locally developed and implemented with teacher
involvement.
(G) A pay system providing competitive base pay.
(H) Evidence of teacher support for the proposed teacher
leadership and pay system, including support from the
local school employee organization (if applicable).
(I) Plans for ongoing evaluation of the pay system.
(J) A sustainable pay system.
(K) A plan for how teacher leadership positions and
ongoing training for teacher leaders will improve student
achievement.
(5) A literacy coaching model program that includes and
implements the following elements:
(A) A system that supports literacy coaches by
incentivizing the following:
(i) Mentoring and training of literacy coaches.
(ii) Reducing literacy coaching loads or providing release
time for literacy coaches to support professional
learning.
(iii) Reviewing professional portfolios and student
performance.
(B) Connection to high quality professional development,
including release time for literacy coaches providing
professional development and instructional coaching, that
provides literacy coaches with the knowledge and skills
needed to advance the learning of teachers, administrators,
and students.
(c) To receive a grant, a:
(1) school corporation, in consultation with the school
HEA 1004 — Concur

74
corporation's school employee organization; or
(2) charter school, in consultation with the charter school's
school employee organization (if applicable);
shall apply for the grant in a manner prescribed by the
department. The department shall establish eligibility
requirements. However, the department may not award grants to
more than thirty (30) school corporations or charter schools during
any school year. When awarding grants under this chapter, the
department shall select a geographically diverse set of school
corporations and charter schools, including school corporations
and charter schools located in urban, suburban, and rural areas.
(d) A school corporation or charter school that is awarded a
grant under this chapter shall receive a grant for three (3)
consecutive school years. The amount of the grant may not exceed
the costs incurred by the school corporation or charter school to
implement the program. A school corporation or charter school
may receive a matching grant from a corporation, foundation, or
any other entity in addition to a grant awarded under this chapter.
Chapter 16. Next Level Computer Science Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "eligible entity" means:
(1) a postsecondary educational institution; or
(2) any organization that provides a nationally recognized and
high quality professional development training program in
computer science education.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "fund" refers to the next level
computer science fund established by section 7 of this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "postsecondary educational
institution" refers to any state educational institution (as defined
in IC 21-7-13-32) or private postsecondary educational institution
that receives state or federal funds.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the next
level computer science grant program established by section 5 of
this chapter.
Sec. 5. The next level computer science grant program is
established to provide grants to:
(1) eligible entities to develop and implement high quality
teacher professional development programs in computer
science; and
(2) state accredited schools to:
(A) provide teachers with high quality teacher professional
development programs in computer science; and
(B) develop and implement sustainable computer science
HEA 1004 — Concur

75
curricular programs.
Sec. 6. The department, in consultation with the governor's
office, shall develop guidelines to award grants to eligible entities
and state accredited schools. The guidelines developed by the
department must include:
(1) the ability of an eligible entity to provide effective training
for a teacher who does not have previous exposure to teaching
computer science;
(2) the ability of an eligible entity to implement effective
practices for providing professional development in computer
science that include:
(A) the eligible entity's ability to provide a teacher with
practical training in teaching computer science that is
founded on evidence based research; and
(B) the eligible entity's ability to tailor the professional
development program to the needs of the teacher and the
students the teacher serves; and
(3) any other criteria the department considers relevant.
Sec. 7. The next level computer science fund is established. The
department must use money in the fund to provide grants from the
fund to:
(1) eligible entities to develop and implement high quality
teacher professional development programs in computer
science; and
(2) state accredited schools for the purposes described in
section 5(2) of this chapter.
Sec. 8. (a) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations from the general assembly.
(2) Gifts to the fund.
(3) Grants, including grants from private entities.
(4) Other state funds that are transferred to the fund.
(b) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited into the fund.
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 9. The department shall administer the program and fund.
Sec. 10. Notwithstanding any other law or policy to the
contrary, the secretary of education shall enter into and maintain
HEA 1004 — Concur

76
a contract for professional development services with an
organization that provides a nationally recognized training
program for professional development in computer science
education from early learning through postsecondary education.
Sec. 11. An eligible entity or state accredited school may apply
to the department to receive a grant from the fund on a form
provided by the department.
Sec. 12. The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
Chapter 17. Robotics Competition Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "allowable expenses" means:
(1) payment of a stipend for a robotics team mentor;
(2) fees, kits, and supplies required to:
(A) establish or maintain a robotics team; or
(B) participate in a robotics competition; and
(3) event registrations, materials, transportation costs, travel
costs, and other expenses associated with a robotics
competition.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "eligible school" means a:
(1) public school, including a charter school (as defined in
IC 20-24-1-4);
(2) state accredited nonpublic school; or
(3) nonpublic school accredited by a national or regional
accreditation agency that is recognized by the state board.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "eligible team" means a robotics
competition team consisting of:
(1) students in kindergarten through grade 12 who are:
(A) enrolled in an eligible school; or
(B) on a community based robotics competition team; and
(2) at least one (1) adult who is a team mentor and team
coach.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "fund" refers to the robotics
competition program fund established by section 8 of this chapter.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the robotics
competition program established by section 7 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "robotics competition" means a
competition that:
(1) requires participating teams to design, construct,
program, and operate robots; and
(2) is sponsored by a nonstock, nonprofit corporation,
described under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code and exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the
HEA 1004 — Concur

77
Internal Revenue Code, that has as one (1) of its
organizational purposes the goal of encouraging young people
to develop an interest in science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics (STEM).
Sec. 7. The robotics competition program is established to
provide grants to eligible teams to expand opportunities to increase
interest and improve skills in science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics (STEM) through participation in competitive robotics
programs that:
(1) provide hands on learning experiences;
(2) establish community partnerships to increase awareness
of local workforce and postsecondary opportunities;
(3) highlight career opportunities through adult mentors; and
(4) prioritize a connection to manufacturing, machining, and
fabrication skills for students in grades 9 through 12.
Sec. 8. The robotics competition program fund is established.
The department shall use money in the fund to provide grants to
eligible teams to develop and implement competitive robotics
programs.
Sec. 9. (a) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations from the general assembly.
(2) Gifts to the fund.
(3) Grants, including grants from private entities.
(4) Other state funds that are transferred to the fund.
(b) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited into the fund.
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 10. Subject to appropriation by the general assembly, the
department shall administer the program and fund.
Sec. 11. (a) An eligible team may apply to the department to
receive a grant from the fund on a form provided by the
department.
(b) To receive a grant, an eligible team must show proof of the
following in its application:
(1) A partnership for the purposes of a robotics competition
with at least one (1) sponsor, business entity, higher education
institution, or technical school.
HEA 1004 — Concur

78
(2) An adult robotics team mentor.
(3) A spending plan.
(4) A commitment to compete in a robotics competition.
(5) For grades 9 through 12, a commitment to creating an
original, iteratively designed robot.
(6) A local in kind or cash match from other private or local
funds in an amount equal to at least twenty-five percent
(25%) of the amount of the awarded grant.
Sec. 12. (a) The department shall develop guidelines to award
grants to eligible teams for allowable expenses. The guidelines
developed by the department must include a maximum grant
award allotment for each eligible team based on the:
(1) level of programming;
(2) level of competition; and
(3) number of participants;
of various robotics competitions as determined by the department.
(b) The department shall award grants in a manner that
maximizes the number of eligible teams that will be able to receive
funds, with an emphasis on increasing the number of high school
teams, and that expands the geographical distribution of eligible
teams.
(c) The department shall award grants under this chapter for
each school year not later than August 1 of the applicable school
year.
Sec. 13. The department shall establish guidelines to
accommodate the participation of students with disabilities on an
eligible team or in a robotics competition.
Sec. 14. The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
Sec. 15. The program and any participation by a team mentor
and team coach in the program is not subject to collective
bargaining.
Chapter 18. Connecting Students With Careers Fund
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "career fair" means an event at
which employers and labor organizations can meet with high
school students to discuss future career opportunities.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "fund" means the connecting
students with careers fund established by section 6 of this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "intermediary" has the meaning
set forth in IC 21-18-1-3.5.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "labor organization" has the
meaning set forth in IC 22-6-6-5.
HEA 1004 — Concur

79
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "school" means the following:
(1) A school maintained by a school corporation.
(2) A charter school.
Sec. 6. The connecting students with careers fund is established.
The department must use money in the fund to provide grants to
schools for the purpose of hosting career fairs in accordance with
IC 20-30-5.6.
Sec. 7. (a) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Gifts to the fund.
(2) Grants, including grants from private entities.
(b) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited into the fund.
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 8. The department shall develop guidelines to award grants
to schools under section 6 of this chapter.
Sec. 9. The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
Chapter 19. Teacher Higher Education and Industry
Collaboration Grant Program and Fund
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "approved postsecondary
educational institution" has the meaning set forth in
IC 21-7-13-6(a).
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "approved teacher education
course or program" means a teacher education course or program
that has been approved by the department under section 8 of this
chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "eligible applicant" means any
of the following:
(1) A school corporation.
(2) A public school, including a charter school.
(3) A state accredited nonpublic school.
(4) A teacher employed by a:
(A) school corporation; or
(B) school listed in subdivision (2) or (3).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "fund" refers to the teacher
higher education and industry collaboration grant program fund
established by section 7 of this chapter.
HEA 1004 — Concur

80
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the teacher
higher education and industry collaboration grant program
established by section 6 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. (a) There is established a teacher higher education and
industry collaboration grant program for the purpose of funding
through grants teacher participation in approved teacher
education courses or programs.
(b) The department shall administer the program.
Sec. 7. (a) The teacher higher education and industry
collaboration grant program fund is established for the purposes
of implementing the program described in section 6 of this chapter.
(b) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations by the general assembly.
(2) Interest deposited in the fund under subsection (e).
(c) The department shall administer the fund.
(d) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year reverts to
the state general fund.
Sec. 8. (a) The department, in consultation with the commission
for higher education, shall approve teacher education courses or
programs that meet the criteria established under subsection (b).
(b) The department may only approve a teacher education
course or program under subsection (a) that:
(1) is designed to:
(A) engage teachers with approved postsecondary
educational institutions and employers for the purpose of
connecting daily classroom lessons with innovations in
workplace practices and postsecondary education
research; and
(B) improve a teacher's:
(i) content area knowledge; and
(ii) familiarity with the application of the content area in
postsecondary education research and the workplace;
(2) is offered:
(A) by an approved postsecondary educational institution;
(B) by an employer; or
(C) jointly, by an approved postsecondary educational
HEA 1004 — Concur

81
institution and employer; and
(3) meets any other requirements established by the
department.
Sec. 9. (a) To be eligible for a grant under the program, an
eligible applicant must do the following:
(1) Apply to the department in the manner and on a form
prescribed by the department.
(2) If the eligible applicant is a school corporation or school
described in section 3(1) through 3(3) of this chapter, include
in the eligible applicant's application the following:
(A) The number of teachers employed by the eligible
applicant who intend to voluntarily participate in an
approved teacher education course or program.
(B) The amount of funding that the eligible applicant is
requesting for each teacher who intends to voluntarily
participate in an approved teacher education course or
program.
(C) The timeline by which teachers will complete the
approved teacher education course or program.
(3) Agree to use the grant funds for teacher participation in
an approved teacher education course or program.
(4) Meet any other requirements established by the
department.
(b) Subject to available funding, the department may award a
grant under this chapter to an eligible applicant that meets the
requirements under subsection (a) in an amount that does not
exceed:
(1) the cost for one (1) or more teachers, as applicable, to
enroll in and complete an approved teacher education course
or program; plus
(2) a stipend for one (1) or more teachers described in
subdivision (1) in an amount determined by the department.
Sec. 10. The successful completion of an approved teacher
course or program may count towards professional growth
experience points required to renew a practitioner license or an
accomplished practitioner license, as determined by the
department.
Sec. 11. The department shall establish and maintain an online
platform that allows teachers to access and share information
regarding connecting daily classroom lessons with innovations in
workplace practices and postsecondary education research.
Sec. 12. Not later than July 1 of each year, the department shall:
HEA 1004 — Concur

82
(1) collect and compile information concerning the program
under this chapter; and
(2) submit the report described in subdivision (1) to the
following:
(A) The governor.
(B) The legislative council, in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 13. The state board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
necessary to implement this chapter.
Chapter 20. Science of Reading Grant
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "charter school" has the meaning
set forth in IC 20-24-1-4.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "elementary school" means a
public elementary school, including a charter school.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "grant" refers to a grant
awarded under section 7 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) This subsection applies before July 1, 2027. As used
in this chapter, "literacy coach" refers to an individual whose
primary responsibility is to provide literacy training and support
to administrators and teachers. This subsection expires July 1,
2027.
(b) This subsection applies after June 30, 2027. As used in this
chapter, "literacy coach" means an individual:
(1) whose primary responsibility is to provide literacy
training and support to administrators and teachers; and
(2) who has received the literacy endorsement described in
IC 20-28-5-19.7.
Sec. 5. A literacy coach shall prioritize the following:
(1) Modeling effective instructional strategies for teachers.
(2) Facilitating study groups.
(3) Training teachers in:
(A) data analysis; and
(B) using data to differentiate instruction.
(4) Coaching and mentoring colleagues.
(5) Working with teachers to ensure that evidence based
reading programs, which include:
(A) comprehensive core reading programs;
(B) supplemental reading programs; and
(C) comprehensive intervention reading programs;
are implemented with fidelity.
(6) Training teachers to diagnose and address a reading
deficiency.
HEA 1004 — Concur

83
(7) Working with teachers in applying evidence based reading
strategies in other content areas, including:
(A) prioritizing time spent on those teachers;
(B) activities and roles that will have the greatest impact
on student achievement; and
(C) prioritizing coaching and mentoring in classrooms.
(8) Helping to increase instructional density to meet the needs
of all students.
(9) Working with students through:
(A) whole and small group instruction; or
(B) tutoring;
in the context of modeling and coaching in or outside of a
teacher's classroom.
Sec. 6. Money allocated for grants under this chapter must be
used for the following:
(1) Placing literacy coaches in elementary schools for the
purposes of training and supporting teachers and
administrators in order to improve instruction related to the
science of reading.
(2) Training teachers and school principals in instructional
practices aligned with the science of reading.
(3) Increasing instructional time, including summer literacy
programs or high-dosage tutoring, for students who have been
identified as struggling readers based on a diagnostic
screening authorized by the department under IC 20-35.5-2-2.
(4) Elementary schools and school corporations purchasing
curricular materials that:
(A) align with science of reading; and
(B) receive approval by the department.
(5) Covering costs for teachers to obtain a literacy
endorsement described in IC 20-28-5-19.7.
Sec. 7. (a) Subject to section 8 of this chapter, the department
may award a grant under this chapter to a school corporation or
charter school that does the following:
(1) Applies for a grant on a form provided by the department.
(2) Submits a detailed description of a plan that:
(A) must include:
(i) placing literacy coaches in elementary schools for the
purposes of training and supporting teachers and
administrators in order to improve instruction related to
the science of reading; and
(ii) training teachers and school principals in
HEA 1004 — Concur

84
instructional practices aligned with the science of
reading; and
(B) may include, if the school corporation or charter school
is requesting grant funds for the purpose described in
section 6(3) or 6(4) of this chapter the following, as
applicable:
(i) Increasing instructional time, including summer
literacy programs or high-dosage tutoring, for students
who have been identified as struggling readers based on
a diagnostic screening authorized by the department
under IC 20-35.5-2-2.
(ii) Elementary schools and school corporations
purchasing curricular materials that align with the
science of reading and receive approval by the
department.
(3) Submits the following information:
(A) Evidence supporting the school corporation's or
charter school's plan under subdivision (2).
(B) The number of elementary school teachers and literacy
coaches employed by the school corporation or charter
school.
(C) Any other pertinent information required by the
department.
(b) Any instruction under a plan that includes increasing
instructional time as described in subsection (a)(2)(B)(i) must align
with the science of reading.
Sec. 8. Upon review of applications received under section 7 of
this chapter, the department may award grants to school
corporations and charter schools subject to available money and
in accordance with the following priorities:
(1) To the extent possible, to achieve geographic balance
throughout Indiana and to include urban, suburban, and
rural school corporations.
(2) To address a documented need for literacy coaches,
additional science of reading training, or compliance with
IC 20-26-12-24.5.
(3) To provide targeted support for Indiana students
experiencing the greatest reading challenges.
Sec. 9. The department:
(1) may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this
chapter; and
(2) shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 regarding the following:
HEA 1004 — Concur

85
(A) Distribution of award amounts under this chapter.
(B) Prioritizing grants for the purposes described in
section 6(1) and 6(2) of this chapter.
Chapter 21. Indiana Teacher Recruitment Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the Indiana
teacher recruitment program established by section 2 of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) The Indiana teacher recruitment program is
established. The purpose of the program is to provide grants to
training and recruitment programs for teachers in critical shortage
areas, as determined by the department, based on data contained
in the educator supply and demand marketplace maintained on the
department's website.
(b) The department shall administer the program.
Sec. 3. The department shall do the following:
(1) Create an application and approval process for training
and recruitment programs.
(2) Determine guidelines for awarding grants under the
program.
Sec. 4. This chapter expires June 30, 2027.
Chapter 22. Centralized School Facilities Pilot Program and
Local Boards
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "local board" refers to a:
(1) local centralized school facilities board established under
section 6(a) of this chapter; or
(2) if applicable, local centralized school facilities and
transportation board established under section 6(e) of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "pilot program" means the
centralized school facilities pilot program established by section 4
of this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "school" means a:
(1) charter school; or
(2) nonpublic school with at least one (1) employee.
Sec. 4. (a) The centralized school facilities pilot program is
established to provide innovative approaches concerning the use,
operation, and management of school facilities to promote:
(1) enhanced learning environments;
(2) unique learning opportunities; and
(3) improved student academic and health outcomes;
in accordance with the plan submitted to the general assembly by
the secretary of education under IC 20-19-3-32 (before its repeal).
HEA 1004 — Concur

86
(b) The pilot program is established for a three (3) year period
consisting of the 2026-2027, 2027-2028, and 2028-2029 school
years.
Sec. 5. (a) A school corporation or school, in partnership with
other school corporations, schools, or both other school
corporations and schools, may apply to the department to
participate in the pilot program.
(b) The department:
(1) may approve not more than a total of three (3)
applications under this section to participate in the pilot
program; and
(2) shall establish the application process and criteria to
participate in the pilot program.
(c) The criteria established under subsection (b)(2) must require
that school corporations and schools include information
concerning the geographic boundaries of the area to which the
application to participate in the pilot program applies.
Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided under subsection (e), not later
than October 31, 2025, a local centralized school facilities board is
established for participating school corporations and schools.
(b) Each local board must be independent from any school
corporation and school.
(c) The local board consists of seven (7) members who:
(1) are proportionately appointed as either representatives of
participating school corporations, charter schools, or
nonpublic schools described in section 3(2) of this chapter
based on:
(A) the total pupil enrollment of the participating school
corporations;
(B) the total pupil enrollment of participating charter
schools; and
(C) the total pupil enrollment of participating nonpublic
schools;
that are partnering under the pilot program; and
(2) are members of the:
(A) governing body of a participating school corporation;
(B) charter school board of a participating charter school;
or
(C) equivalent of a governing body for a participating
nonpublic school;
described in subdivision (1).
(d) Each local board must collaborate with individuals or
HEA 1004 — Concur

87
entities that have expertise in the following:
(1) Facility management, construction, or real estate.
(2) Public finance or public debt issuance.
(3) Demographic analysis and urban planning.
(4) Organizational effectiveness, operations management, and
implementing best practices.
(5) Government contracts.
(6) Budget development and oversight.
(e) If a school corporation or school, in partnership with other
school corporations, schools, or both other school corporations and
schools, receives approval to participate in the:
(1) pilot program; and
(2) student transportation pilot program under IC 20-20.5-23;
the school corporation or schools may elect to establish, not later
than October 31, 2025, one (1) local centralized school facilities and
transportation board consisting of the members described in
subsection (c) that has the powers and duties and is subject to the
requirements of a local centralized school facilities board under
this chapter and local student transportation board under
IC 20-20.5-23.
Sec. 7. Notwithstanding any other state law or rule, each local
board shall, during the pilot program, provide oversight and
management of school facilities with a focus on best use and
upkeep of assets funded by taxpayers.
Sec. 8. (a) Each local board shall create and implement a pilot
program plan that includes measures to:
(1) determine the:
(A) term lengths of the members; and
(B) member replacement processes;
for the local board;
(2) conduct school facility assessments for all applicable
school facilities;
(3) establish a process for the transfer to and receipt of funds,
as applicable, by the local board from the participating school
corporations and schools;
(4) accept and use donations, gifts, or bequests for the
purposes of this chapter;
(5) improve the health and safety of students and teachers;
(6) allow for additional flexibility and creativity in terms of
what is considered a school facility, including considerations
surrounding colocation with other schools, governmental
entities, or community organizations;
HEA 1004 — Concur

88
(7) enter into revenue sharing agreements and asset use
agreements for all school facilities within the geographic
boundaries described in the application under section 5(c) of
this chapter for the three (3) year period of the pilot program;
(8) address any existing excess capacity in school facilities;
(9) inspire opportunities for partnership with other
governmental entities or local nonprofit organizations to
transform school facilities into broader community assets for
residents;
(10) implement best practices in facilities management and
operations;
(11) track qualitative and quantitative data to gauge the
success of the pilot program;
(12) collect and report data in a manner prescribed by the
department regarding school facilities included in the pilot
program; and
(13) implement a maintenance plan and contract with
vendors, as needed, for the duration of the pilot program.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2028, each local board shall develop
and submit to the department an implementation plan that
includes the following:
(1) Whether at the conclusion of the pilot program the:
(A) participating school corporations and schools, as
applicable, elect to continue operating with a local board;
and
(B) local board established under section 6 of this chapter
should be maintained or a new local board should be
established.
(2) If a new local board should be established, the following
components:
(A) The appointment of members to the new local board,
including the appointing authority for the members.
(B) The term lengths of the members.
(C) The member replacement process.
(3) A process to ensure that the powers and duties under this
chapter are maintained by the local board or transferred to
the new local board after completion of the pilot program.
(4) The transfer of all assets and related funding regarding
school facilities to the local board or new local board.
(5) The development and implementation of a long term asset
management and sustainability plan.
Sec. 9. Notwithstanding any other state law or rule, beginning
HEA 1004 — Concur

89
with the 2026-2027 school year, each local board established under
section 6 of this chapter:
(1) shall exercise the full powers and duties provided under
the pilot program plan created under section 8(a) of this
chapter; and
(2) shall make recommendations regarding property tax levies
approved by the governing bodies of the applicable
participating school corporations.
Sec. 10. Each local board may contract with outside individuals
and entities to create and implement the pilot program plan
described in section 8(a) of this chapter.
Sec. 11. Subject to any agreement entered into by a school
corporation or school, a school corporation or school may at any
time opt out of participating in the pilot program if the school
corporation or school provides notice to all school corporations
and schools that the school corporation or school partnered with
under this chapter at least one (1) year before the school
corporation or school intends to terminate the partnership and its
participation under this chapter.
Sec. 12. Not later than November 1, 2027, the department of
local government finance, in consultation with the department,
shall do the following:
(1) Prepare a report that includes recommendations
regarding legislation and procedures to transfer the duties
and powers of a participating school corporation to a local
board or new local board as described in section 8(b) of this
chapter.
(2) Submit the report to the legislative council in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 13. Not later than November 1, 2028, the department shall
do the following:
(1) Prepare a report that includes the following:
(A) A summary regarding the:
(i) school corporations and schools participating in the
pilot program;
(ii) implementation of the pilot program by each local
board;
(iii) results and outcomes regarding the pilot program;
and
(iv) implementation plans submitted by the local boards
under section 8(b) of this chapter.
(B) Any recommendations regarding:
HEA 1004 — Concur

90
(i) legislation or procedures to further carry out the
purposes of this chapter and an implementation plan
submitted under section 8(b) of this chapter; and
(ii) whether to extend the pilot program to additional
applicants.
(C) A plan to adopt best practices from the pilot program
statewide.
(2) Submit the report to the legislative council in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 14. The department shall waive any state law or rule
requirement necessary to exempt participating school corporations
and schools from requirements for purposes of participation in the
pilot program under this chapter.
Sec. 15. This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the
purposes of this chapter.
Sec. 16. Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, to the
extent the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the
provisions of any other general, special, or local law, the provisions
of this chapter are controlling, and compliance with this chapter
shall be treated as compliance with the conflicting law.
Chapter 23. Student Transportation Pilot Program and Local
Boards
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "local board" refers to a:
(1) local student transportation board established under
section 6(a) of this chapter; or
(2) if applicable, local centralized school facilities and
transportation board established under section 6(e) of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "pilot program" refers to the
student transportation pilot program established by section 4 of
this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "school" means a:
(1) charter school; or
(2) nonpublic school with at least one (1) employee.
Sec. 4. (a) The student transportation pilot program is
established to provide transportation to all students attending:
(1) school corporations;
(2) charter schools; and
(3) nonpublic schools with at least one (1) employee;
within the geographic boundaries described in the application
under section 5(c) of this chapter.
(b) The pilot program is established for a three (3) year period
HEA 1004 — Concur

91
consisting of the 2026-2027, 2027-2028, and 2028-2029 school
years.
Sec. 5. (a) A school corporation or school, in partnership with
other school corporations, schools, or both school corporations and
schools, may apply to the department to participate in the pilot
program.
(b) The department:
(1) may approve not more than a total of three (3)
applications under this section to participate in the pilot
program; and
(2) shall establish the application process and criteria to
participate in the pilot program.
(c) The criteria established under subsection (b)(2) must require
that school corporations and schools include information
concerning the geographic boundaries of the area to which the
application to participate in the pilot program applies.
Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided under subsection (e), not later
than October 31, 2025, a local student transportation board is
established for participating school corporations and schools.
(b) Each local board must be independent from any school
corporation and school.
(c) The local board consists of seven (7) members who:
(1) are proportionately appointed as either representatives of
participating school corporations, charter schools, or
nonpublic schools described in section 3(2) of this chapter
based on:
(A) the total pupil enrollment of the participating school
corporations;
(B) the total pupil enrollment of participating charter
schools; and
(C) the total pupil enrollment of participating nonpublic
schools;
that are partnering under the pilot program; and
(2) are members of the:
(A) governing body of a participating school corporation;
(B) charter school board of a participating charter school;
or
(C) equivalent of a governing body for a participating
nonpublic school;
described in subdivision (1).
(d) Each local board must collaborate with individuals or
entities that have expertise in the following:
HEA 1004 — Concur

92
(1) Transportation logistics, particularly involving movement
of passengers.
(2) Finance and business.
(3) Organizational effectiveness, operations management, and
implementing best practices.
(4) Government contracts.
(5) Budget development and oversight.
(e) If a school corporation or school, in partnership with other
school corporations, schools, or both other school corporations and
schools, receives approval to participate in the:
(1) pilot program; and
(2) centralized school facilities pilot program under
IC 20-20.5-22;
the school corporation or schools may elect to establish, not later
than October 31, 2025, one (1) local centralized school facilities and
transportation board that has the powers and duties and is subject
to the requirements of a local centralized school facilities board
under IC 20-20.5-22 and local student transportation board under
this chapter.
Sec. 7. Notwithstanding any other state law or rule, each local
board shall be responsible for the oversight and management of the
transportation of students described in section 4 of this chapter in
a safe and efficient manner in accordance with the plan submitted
to the general assembly by the secretary of education under
IC 20-19-3-33 (before its repeal).
Sec. 8. (a) Each local board shall create and implement a pilot
program plan that includes measures to:
(1) determine the:
(A) term lengths of the members; and
(B) member replacement processes;
for the local board;
(2) allow for additional flexibility and creativity to
accommodate student needs throughout the school day,
including transportation:
(A) to and from school;
(B) for before and after school opportunities;
(C) for work based learning experiences;
(D) for extracurricular activities; and
(E) for specialized educational opportunities;
(3) improve safety and efficiency for students;
(4) increase collaboration between school corporations,
schools, governmental entities, and community organizations;
HEA 1004 — Concur

93
(5) track qualitative and quantitative data to gauge the
success of the pilot program;
(6) collect and report data in a manner prescribed by the
department regarding the pilot program;
(7) provide uninterrupted transportation services for
homeless students or students in foster care as provided by
the McKinney-Vento Homeless Education Assistance
Improvements Act (42 U.S.C. 11431 et seq.);
(8) inspire opportunities for public-private partnerships or
partnerships with other governmental entities or local
nonprofit organizations;
(9) enter into revenue sharing agreements and asset use
agreements with participating school corporations and
schools for the duration of the three (3) year period of the
pilot program;
(10) establish a process for the transfer to and receipt of
funds, as applicable, by the local board from the participating
school corporations and schools;
(11) accept and use donations, gifts, or bequests for the
purposes of this chapter; and
(12) implement purchasing and maintenance plans and
contracts with vendors, as needed, for the three (3) year
period of the pilot program.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2028, each local board shall develop
and submit to the department an implementation plan that
includes the following:
(1) Whether at the conclusion of the pilot program the:
(A) participating school corporations and schools, as
applicable, elect to continue operating with a local board;
and
(B) local board established under section 6 of this chapter
should be maintained or a new local board should be
established.
(2) If a new local board should be established, the following
components:
(A) The appointment of members to the new local board,
including the appointing authority for the members.
(B) The term lengths of the members.
(C) The member replacement process.
(3) A process to ensure that the powers and duties under this
chapter are maintained by the local board or transferred to
the new local board after completion of the pilot program.
HEA 1004 — Concur

94
(4) The transfer of all assets and related funding regarding
school transportation to the local board or new local board.
(5) The development and implementation of a long term asset
management and sustainability plan.
Sec. 9. Notwithstanding any other state law or rule, beginning
with the 2026-2027 school year, each local board established under
section 6 of this chapter:
(1) shall exercise the full powers and duties provided under
the pilot program plan created under section 8(a) of this
chapter; and
(2) shall make recommendations regarding property tax levies
approved by the governing bodies of the applicable
participating school corporations.
Sec. 10. Each local board may contract with outside entities to
create and implement the pilot program plan described in section
8(a) of this chapter.
Sec. 11. Subject to any agreement entered into by a school
corporation or school, a school corporation or school may at any
time opt out of participating in the pilot program if the school
corporation or school provides notice to all school corporations
and schools that the school corporation or school partnered with
under this chapter at least one (1) year before the school
corporation or school intends to terminate the partnership and its
participation under this chapter.
Sec. 12. Not later than November 1, 2027, the department of
local government finance, in consultation with the department,
shall do the following:
(1) Prepare a report that includes recommendations
regarding legislation and procedures to transfer the duties
and powers of a participating school corporation to a local
board or new local board as described in section 8(b) of this
chapter.
(2) Submit the report to the legislative council in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 13. Not later than November 1, 2028, the department shall
do the following:
(1) Prepare a report that includes the following:
(A) A summary regarding the:
(i) school corporations and schools participating in the
pilot program;
(ii) implementation of the pilot program by each local
board;
HEA 1004 — Concur

95
(iii) results and outcomes regarding the pilot program;
and
(iv) implementation plans submitted by the local boards
under section 8(b) of this chapter.
(B) Any recommendations regarding:
(i) legislation or procedures to further carry out the
purposes of this chapter and an implementation plan
submitted under section 8(b) of this chapter; and
(ii) whether to extend the pilot program to additional
applicants.
(C) A plan to adopt best practices from the pilot program
statewide.
(2) Submit the report to the legislative council in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 14. The department shall waive any state law or rule
requirement necessary to exempt participating school corporations
and schools from requirements for purposes of participation in the
pilot program under this chapter.
Sec. 15. This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the
purposes of this chapter.
Sec. 16. Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, to the
extent the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the
provisions of any other general, special, or local law, the provisions
of this chapter are controlling, and compliance with this chapter
shall be treated as compliance with the conflicting law.
Chapter 24. Mastery Based Education Pilot Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "mastery" means evidenced
attainment of predefined, rigorous learning objectives that:
(1) are transferable; and
(2) qualify a student for advancement to subsequent
educational levels or competencies.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "mastery based education"
means an innovative, learner centered approach to teaching and
learning that focuses on the mastery of specific skills or knowledge
areas rather than the amount of time spent in a classroom.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "pilot program" refers to the
mastery based education pilot program established by section 4 of
this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) The mastery based education pilot program is
established to support a school corporation or charter school that
is selected by the department under subsection (b) in implementing
mastery based education.
HEA 1004 — Concur

96
(b) The department:
(1) shall administer the pilot program; and
(2) may select school corporations and charter schools that
meet the requirements under this chapter to participate in the
pilot program.
Sec. 5. (a) To apply for participation in the pilot program, a
school corporation or charter school shall do the following:
(1) Apply on a form and in a manner established by the
department.
(2) Develop and submit a plan to the department that includes
the following:
(A) A description of the following:
(i) The educational programming the school corporation
or charter school intends to offer, including specific goals
and the measurable student outcomes to be obtained by
the school corporation or charter school.
(ii) How mastery based student performance will be
used, measured, evaluated, and reported by the school
corporation or charter school.
(iii) Any business, postsecondary educational institutions,
or community partners with which the school
corporation or charter school intends to work.
(B) If the school corporation or charter school intends to
suspend any requirements under IC 20-28 as listed in
section 8(a)(2) of this chapter, the school corporation's or
charter school's criteria and goals for teacher quality,
training, and compensation.
(b) The department shall do the following:
(1) Subject to subdivision (2), approve or deny an application
and plan submitted by a school corporation or charter school
under this section.
(2) Approve an application and plan only if the department
determines that the plan:
(A) will promote innovative educational approaches to
student learning; and
(B) is likely to improve student performance and outcomes.
Sec. 6. If a school corporation or charter school participates in
the pilot program, the school corporation or charter school shall
post the school corporation's or charter school's plan approved by
the department under section 5 of this chapter on the school
corporation's or charter school's website.
Sec. 7. (a) The department may make reasonable requests for
HEA 1004 — Concur

97
information from a school corporation or charter school
participating in the pilot program for the purpose of assessing the
effectiveness of the plan.
(b) A school corporation or charter school shall respond to a
request for information under subsection (a) in a form, manner,
and frequency determined by the department.
Sec. 8. (a) Any of the following may be suspended for a school
corporation or charter school in accordance with the school
corporation's or charter school's plan approved under section 5 of
this chapter:
(1) Any statute or rule that may be suspended under
IC 20-26.5-2-3.
(2) Any provision under the following:
(A) IC 20-28-4.
(B) IC 20-28-11.5.
(C) IC 20-30-2-2.
(D) IC 20-30-4.
(3) Subject to subsection (b), any provisions under the
statewide assessment program under IC 20-32-5.1.
(b) A statewide assessment program test requirement may not
be suspended under subsection (a)(3) unless a school corporation
or charter school agrees to administer an assessment that can be
used to compare the performance of students who attend the school
corporation or charter school with the performance of students
who take the statewide summative assessment.
(c) After a school corporation or charter school has participated
for at least three (3) years in the pilot program, the department
may:
(1) revoke the suspension of any statute or rule under
subsection (a) for the school corporation or charter school; or
(2) terminate the participation of the school corporation or
charter school in the pilot program;
if the department determines that the school corporation or
charter school has not met the specific goals and the measurable
student outcomes in the school corporation's or charter school's
plan approved under section 5 of this chapter.
Sec. 9. This chapter expires June 30, 2035.
SECTION 38. IC 20-24-13-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.244-2017,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) An annual grant program is established to
provide funding to a school for the following:
(1) Capital improvements for the school, including the renovation
HEA 1004 — Concur

98
or expansion of a facility, or for debt or lease payments owed on
a facility, including advances from the common school fund under
IC 20-49-9.
(2) The purposes for which the school corporation's operations
fund may be used by a school corporation under IC 20-40-18.
(3) The purposes for which a technology grant from the Senator
David C. Ford educational technology fund may be used by a
school corporation under IC 20-20-13-6. IC 20-20.5-6-3.
(b) The program shall be administered by the state board.
(c) The state board shall establish a written application and
procedure for providing grants under this chapter to a school described
in section 5 of this chapter.
SECTION 39. IC 20-24.2-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as specifically provided in this
article and section 4 of this chapter, the following provisions of this
title and a rule or guideline adopted by the state board under one (1) of
the following provisions of this title do not apply to a qualified district
or qualified high school:
(1) Provisions that do not apply to school corporations in general.
(2) IC 20-20 IC 20-20.5 (programs administered by the state),
except for IC 20-20-1 IC 20-20.5-1 (educational service centers).
(3) IC 20-28 (school teachers), except for IC 20-28-3-4 (teacher
continuing education), IC 20-28-4-8 (hiring of transition to
teaching participants; restrictions), IC 20-28-4-11 (transition to
teaching participants; school corporation or subject area;
transition to teaching permit), IC 20-28-5-8 (conviction of certain
felonies or misdemeanors; notice and hearing; permanent
revocation of license; data base of school employees who have
been reported), IC 20-28-6 (teacher contracts), IC 20-28-7.5
(cancellation of teacher contracts), IC 20-28-8 (contracts with
school administrators), IC 20-28-9 (teacher salary and related
payments), IC 20-28-10 (conditions of employment), and
IC 20-28-11.5 (staff performance evaluations).
(4) IC 20-30 (curriculum), except for IC 20-30-3-2 and
IC 20-30-3-4 (patriotic commemorative observances),
IC 20-30-5-13 (human sexuality instructional requirements), and
IC 20-30-5-19 (personal financial responsibility instruction).
(5) IC 20-32 (student standards, assessments, and performance),
except for IC 20-32-4 (graduation requirements), IC 20-32-5
(Indiana statewide testing for educational progress for a school
year ending before July 1, 2018), IC 20-32-5.1 (statewide
HEA 1004 — Concur

99
assessment program for a school year beginning after June 30,
2018), and IC 20-32-8.5 (reading improvement and remediation
plans).
(6) IC 20-37 (career and technical education).
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a school corporation may not
receive a decrease in state funding based upon the school corporation's
status as a qualified district or the status of a high school within the
school corporation as a qualified high school, or because of the
implementation of a waiver of a statute or rule that is allowed to be
waived by a qualified district or qualified high school.
SECTION 40. IC 20-24.2-4-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The following provisions of this title and rules
and guidelines adopted under the following provisions of this title
apply to a qualified district or qualified high school:
IC 20-20-1 IC 20-20.5-1 (educational service centers).
IC 20-23 (organization of school corporations).
IC 20-26 (school corporation general administrative provisions).
IC 20-27 (school transportation).
IC 20-28-3-4 (teacher continuing education).
IC 20-28-4-8 (hiring of transition to teaching participants;
restrictions).
IC 20-28-4-11 (transition to teaching participants; school
corporation or subject area; transition to teaching permit).
IC 20-28-5-8 (conviction of certain felonies or misdemeanors;
notice and hearing; permanent revocation of license; data base of
school employees who have been reported).
IC 20-28-6 (teacher contracts).
IC 20-28-7.5 (cancellation of teacher contracts).
IC 20-28-8 (contracts with school administrators).
IC 20-28-9 (teacher salary and related payments).
IC 20-28-10 (conditions of employment).
IC 20-28-11.5 (staff performance evaluations).
IC 20-29 (collective bargaining for teachers).
IC 20-30-3-2 and IC 20-30-3-4 (patriotic commemorative
observances).
IC 20-30-5-13 (human sexuality instructional requirements).
IC 20-30-5-19 (personal financial responsibility instruction).
IC 20-30-18 (middle school advanced math course automatic
enrollment).
IC 20-31 (accountability for school performance and
improvement).
HEA 1004 — Concur

100
IC 20-32-4, IC 20-32-5 (for a school year beginning before July
1, 2018), IC 20-32-5.1 (assessment), or any other statute, rule, or
guideline related to standardized assessments.
IC 20-32-8.5 (reading improvement and remediation plans).
IC 20-33 (students: general provisions).
IC 20-34-3 (health and safety measures).
IC 20-35 (special education).
IC 20-35.5 (dyslexia screening and intervention).
IC 20-36 (high ability students).
IC 20-39 (accounting and financial reporting procedures).
IC 20-40 (government funds and accounts).
IC 20-41 (extracurricular funds and accounts).
IC 20-42.5 (allocation of expenditures to student instruction and
learning).
IC 20-43 (state tuition support).
IC 20-44 (property tax levies).
IC 20-46 (levies other than general fund levies).
IC 20-47 (related entities; holding companies; lease agreements).
IC 20-48 (borrowing and bonds).
IC 20-49 (state management of common school funds; state
advances and loans).
IC 20-50 (homeless children and foster care children).
SECTION 41. IC 20-24.2-4-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 5. (a) A qualified district may display the words "Indiana
Performance Qualified School District" on the qualified district's
correspondence, Internet web site, and any other communications
representing the qualified district.
(b) A qualified high school may display the words "Indiana
Performance Qualified High School" on the high school's
correspondence, Internet web site, and any other communications
representing the high school.
SECTION 42. IC 20-24.5-2-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.205-2013,
SECTION 237, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. A laboratory school that:
(1) is operated without an agreement; and
(2) has an ADM in the fall count of a school year of not more than
seven hundred fifty (750);
must be treated as a charter school for purposes of funding under
IC 20-20-33 IC 20-20.5-9 and IC 20-43.
SECTION 43. IC 20-25-4-20, AS AMENDED BY P.L.155-2020,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) The general school laws of Indiana and all
HEA 1004 — Concur

101
laws and parts of laws applicable to the general system of common
schools in school cities, so far as not inconsistent with this chapter and
other provisions of this article, and unless made inapplicable by this
article, are in full force and effect in a school city to which this chapter
applies.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 20-25-13, Staff performance evaluation
plans in a school city shall be developed and implemented as provided
in IC 20-28-11.5-4.
SECTION 44. IC 20-25-9-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The board shall use the student performance
improvement levels established under IC 20-25-11 to:
(1) implement the board's plan;
(2) evaluate school performance; and
(3) publish annual reports. and
(4) determine academic receivership under IC 20-25-15.
SECTION 45. IC 20-25-9-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 4. The board shall use student performance improvement
levels to determine whether to place a school in academic receivership
under IC 20-25-15.
SECTION 46. IC 20-25-13 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Staff Performance Evaluations).
SECTION 47. IC 20-25-15 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Academic Receivership).
SECTION 48. IC 20-26-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.233-2015,
SECTION 93, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Regular meetings must be held by each
governing body at a time and place established by resolution of the
board or may be incorporated in the rules provided in IC 20-26-5-4. A
notice need not be given to a member for holding or taking any action
at a regular meeting.
(b) If a meeting is held according to a procedure set forth by statute
or rule and if publication of notice of the meeting is required, notice of
the meeting is not required and need not be given to a member for
holding or taking any action at the meeting contemplated by the notice.
The meeting must be held at the time and place specified in the
published notice.
(c) Special meetings of a governing body must be held on call by the
governing body's president or by the superintendent of the school
corporation. The call must be evidenced by a written notice specifying
the date, time, and place of the meeting, delivered to each member
personally or sent by mail or telegram so that each member has at least
HEA 1004 — Concur

102
seventy-two (72) hours notice of the special meeting. Special meetings
must be held at the regular meeting place of the board.
(d) All meetings of a governing body must be open to the public to
the extent required by IC 5-14-1.5. The governing body shall comply
with IC 5-14-1.5.
(e) If notice of a meeting is required and each member of a
governing body has waived notice of the meeting, as provided in this
subsection, notice of the meeting is not necessary. Waiver of notice of
a meeting by a member consists of the following:
(1) The member's presence at the meeting.
(2) The member's execution of a written notice waiving the date,
time, and place of the meeting, executed either before or after the
meeting. If a waiver specifies that the waiver was executed before
the meeting, third persons are entitled to rely on the statement.
(f) At a meeting of the governing body, a majority of the members
constitutes a quorum. Action may not be taken unless a quorum is
present. Except where a larger vote is required by statute or rule with
respect to any matter, a majority of the members present may adopt a
resolution or take any action.
(g) All meetings of the governing body for the conduct of business
must be held within the school corporation, except as follows:
(1) Meetings may be held at the administrative offices of the
school corporation if the offices are outside the geographic limits
of the school corporation but are within a county where all or a
part of the school corporation is located.
(2) Meetings may be held at a place where the statute or rule
according to which a statutory meeting is held permits meeting
outside the school corporation. as may occur when the meeting is
held jointly with another governing body.
(3) Meetings held jointly with another governing body must
be held within the boundaries of one (1) of the school
corporations.
(h) A governing body may hold up to two (2) training sessions each
year outside the school corporation. The sessions may be conducted as
executive sessions under IC 5-14-1.5.
SECTION 49. IC 20-26-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) In carrying out the school purposes of a
school corporation, the governing body acting on the school
corporation's behalf has the following specific powers:
(1) In the name of the school corporation, to sue and be sued and
to enter into contracts in matters permitted by applicable law.
HEA 1004 — Concur

103
However, a governing body may not use funds received from the
state to bring or join in an action against the state, unless the
governing body is challenging an adverse decision by a state
agency, board, or commission.
(2) To take charge of, manage, and conduct the educational affairs
of the school corporation and to establish, locate, and provide the
necessary schools, school libraries, other libraries where
permitted by law, other buildings, facilities, property, and
equipment.
(3) To appropriate from the school corporation's general fund
(before January 1, 2019) or the school corporation's operations
fund (after December 31, 2018) an amount, not to exceed the
greater of three thousand dollars ($3,000) per budget year or one
dollar ($1) per pupil, not to exceed twelve thousand five hundred
dollars ($12,500), based on the school corporation's ADM of the
previous year (as defined in IC 20-43-1-7) to promote the best
interests of the school corporation through:
(A) the purchase of meals, decorations, memorabilia, or
awards;
(B) provision for expenses incurred in interviewing job
applicants; or
(C) developing relations with other governmental units.
(4) To do the following:
(A) Acquire, construct, erect, maintain, hold, and contract for
construction, erection, or maintenance of real estate, real estate
improvements, or an interest in real estate or real estate
improvements, as the governing body considers necessary for
school purposes, including buildings, parts of buildings,
additions to buildings, rooms, gymnasiums, auditoriums,
playgrounds, playing and athletic fields, facilities for physical
training, buildings for administrative, office, warehouse, repair
activities, or housing school owned buses, landscaping, walks,
drives, parking areas, roadways, easements and facilities for
power, sewer, water, roadway, access, storm and surface
water, drinking water, gas, electricity, other utilities and
similar purposes, by purchase, either outright for cash (or
under conditional sales or purchase money contracts providing
for a retention of a security interest by the seller until payment
is made or by notes where the contract, security retention, or
note is permitted by applicable law), by exchange, by gift, by
devise, by eminent domain, by lease with or without option to
purchase, or by lease under IC 20-47-2, IC 20-47-3, or
HEA 1004 — Concur

104
IC 20-47-5.
(B) Repair, remodel, remove, or demolish, or to contract for
the repair, remodeling, removal, or demolition of the real
estate, real estate improvements, or interest in the real estate
or real estate improvements, as the governing body considers
necessary for school purposes.
(C) Provide for conservation measures through utility
efficiency programs or under a guaranteed savings contract as
described in IC 36-1-12.5.
(5) To acquire personal property or an interest in personal
property as the governing body considers necessary for school
purposes, including buses, motor vehicles, equipment, apparatus,
appliances, books, furniture, and supplies, either by cash purchase
or under conditional sales or purchase money contracts providing
for a security interest by the seller until payment is made or by
notes where the contract, security, retention, or note is permitted
by applicable law, by gift, by devise, by loan, or by lease with or
without option to purchase and to repair, remodel, remove,
relocate, and demolish the personal property. All purchases and
contracts specified under the powers authorized under subdivision
(4) and this subdivision are subject solely to applicable law
relating to purchases and contracting by municipal corporations
in general and to the supervisory control of state agencies as
provided in section 6 of this chapter.
(6) To sell or exchange real or personal property or interest in real
or personal property that, in the opinion of the governing body, is
not necessary for school purposes, in accordance with IC 20-26-7
and IC 20-26-7.1, to demolish or otherwise dispose of the
property if, in the opinion of the governing body, the property is
not necessary for school purposes and is worthless, and to pay the
expenses for the demolition or disposition.
(7) Except as provided under subsections (c) and (d), to lease any
school property for a rental that the governing body considers
reasonable or to permit the free use of school property for:
(A) civic or public purposes; or
(B) the operation of a school age child care program for
children who are at least five (5) years of age and less than
fifteen (15) years of age that operates before or after the school
day, or both, and during periods when school is not in session;
if the school property continues to be used primarily for
classroom instruction by the school corporation, is not subject to
closure under IC 20-26-7-47, and is not a covered school building
HEA 1004 — Concur

105
that must be made available for lease or purchase under
IC 20-26-7.1. Under this subdivision, the governing body may
enter into a lease or use agreement with a nonprofit corporation,
community service organization, or other governmental entity, if
the corporation, organization, or other governmental entity will
use the property to be leased for civic or public purposes or for a
school age child care program. However, if payment for the
property subject to a lease or use agreement is made from money
in the school corporation's debt service fund, all proceeds from
the lease or use agreement must be deposited in the school
corporation's debt service fund so long as payment for the
property has not been made. The governing body may, at the
governing body's option, use the procedure specified in
IC 36-1-11-10 in leasing property under this subdivision. If the
school property is not being used primarily for classroom
instruction or is subject to closure under IC 20-26-7-47, the
governing body must first comply with IC 20-26-7 and
IC 20-26-7.1 before leasing the school property under this
subdivision.
(8) To do the following:
(A) Employ, contract for, and discharge superintendents,
supervisors, principals, teachers, librarians, athletic coaches
(whether or not they are otherwise employed by the school
corporation and whether or not they are licensed under
IC 20-28-5), business managers, superintendents of buildings
and grounds, janitors, engineers, architects, physicians,
dentists, nurses, accountants, teacher aides performing
noninstructional duties, educational and other professional
consultants, data processing and computer service for school
purposes, including the making of schedules, the keeping and
analyzing of grades and other student data, the keeping and
preparing of warrants, payroll, and similar data where
approved by the state board of accounts as provided below,
and other personnel or services as the governing body
considers necessary for school purposes.
(B) Fix and pay the salaries and compensation of persons and
services described in this subdivision that are consistent with
IC 20-28-9-1.5.
(C) Classify persons or services described in this subdivision
and to adopt a compensation plan with a salary range that is
consistent with IC 20-28-9-1.5.
(D) Determine the number of the persons or the amount of the
HEA 1004 — Concur

106
services employed or contracted for as provided in this
subdivision.
(E) Determine the nature and extent of the duties of the
persons described in this subdivision.
The compensation, terms of employment, and discharge of
teachers are, however, subject to and governed by the laws
relating to employment, contracting, compensation, and discharge
of teachers. The compensation, terms of employment, and
discharge of bus drivers are subject to and governed by laws
relating to employment, contracting, compensation, and discharge
of bus drivers.
(9) Notwithstanding the appropriation limitation in subdivision
(3), when the governing body by resolution considers a trip by an
employee of the school corporation or by a member of the
governing body to be in the interest of the school corporation,
including attending meetings, conferences, or examining
equipment, buildings, and installation in other areas, to permit the
employee to be absent in connection with the trip without any loss
in pay and to reimburse the employee or the member the
employee's or member's reasonable lodging and meal expenses
and necessary transportation expenses. To pay teaching personnel
for time spent in sponsoring and working with school related trips
or activities.
(10) Subject to IC 20-27-13, to transport children to and from
school, when in the opinion of the governing body the
transportation is necessary, including considerations for the safety
of the children. The transportation must be otherwise in
accordance with applicable law.
(11) To provide a lunch program for a part or all of the students
attending the schools of the school corporation, including the
establishment of kitchens, kitchen facilities, kitchen equipment,
lunch rooms, the hiring of the necessary personnel to operate the
lunch program, and the purchase of material and supplies for the
lunch program, charging students for the operational costs of the
lunch program, fixing the price per meal or per food item. To
operate the lunch program as an extracurricular activity, subject
to the supervision of the governing body. To participate in a
surplus commodity or lunch aid program.
(12) To:
(A) purchase curricular materials and to furnish curricular
materials without cost; and
(B) assess and collect a reasonable fee for lost or significantly
HEA 1004 — Concur

107
damaged curricular materials.
(13) To accept students transferred from other school corporations
and to transfer students to other school corporations in accordance
with applicable law.
(14) To make budgets, to appropriate funds, and to disburse the
money of the school corporation in accordance with applicable
law. To borrow money against current tax collections and
otherwise to borrow money, in accordance with IC 20-48-1.
(15) To purchase insurance or to establish and maintain a
program of self-insurance relating to the liability of the school
corporation or the school corporation's employees in connection
with motor vehicles or property and for additional coverage to the
extent permitted and in accordance with IC 34-13-3-20. To
purchase additional insurance or to establish and maintain a
program of self-insurance protecting the school corporation and
members of the governing body, employees, contractors, or agents
of the school corporation from liability, risk, accident, or loss
related to school property, school contract, school or school
related activity, including the purchase of insurance or the
establishment and maintenance of a self-insurance program
protecting persons described in this subdivision against false
imprisonment, false arrest, libel, or slander for acts committed in
the course of the persons' employment, protecting the school
corporation for fire and extended coverage and other casualty
risks to the extent of replacement cost, loss of use, and other
insurable risks relating to property owned, leased, or held by the
school corporation. In accordance with IC 20-26-17, to:
(A) participate in a state employee health plan under
IC 5-10-8-6.7;
(B) purchase insurance; or
(C) establish and maintain a program of self-insurance;
to benefit school corporation employees, including accident,
sickness, health, or dental coverage, provided that a plan of
self-insurance must include an aggregate stop-loss provision.
(16) Enter into agreements with one (1) or more other school
corporations for a cooperative program of self-insurance
protecting the school corporations and members of the
governing bodies, employees, contractors, or agents of the
school corporations from liability, risk, accident, or loss
related to school property, school contract, school or school
related activity, including maintenance of a cooperative
self-insurance program protecting persons described in this
HEA 1004 — Concur

108
subdivision against false imprisonment, false arrest, libel, or
slander for acts committed in the course of the persons'
employment, protecting the school corporation for fire and
extended coverage and other casualty risks to the extent of
replacement cost, loss of use, and other insurable risks
relating to property owned, leased, or held by the school
corporations. This subdivision does not authorize a governing
body to enter into agreements with one (1) or more school
corporations for the provision of health insurance coverage.
(16) (17) To make all applications, to enter into all contracts, and
to sign all documents necessary for the receipt of aid, money, or
property from the state, the federal government, or from any other
source.
(17) (18) To defend a member of the governing body or any
employee of the school corporation in any suit arising out of the
performance of the member's or employee's duties for or
employment with, the school corporation, if the governing body
by resolution determined that the action was taken in good faith.
To save any member or employee harmless from any liability,
cost, or damage in connection with the performance, including the
payment of legal fees, except where the liability, cost, or damage
is predicated on or arises out of the bad faith of the member or
employee, or is a claim or judgment based on the member's or
employee's malfeasance in office or employment.
(18) (19) To prepare, make, enforce, amend, or repeal rules,
regulations, and procedures:
(A) for the government and management of the schools,
property, facilities, and activities of the school corporation, the
school corporation's agents, employees, and pupils and for the
operation of the governing body; and
(B) that may be designated by an appropriate title such as
"policy handbook", "bylaws", or "rules and regulations".
(19) (20) To ratify and approve any action taken by a member of
the governing body, an officer of the governing body, or an
employee of the school corporation after the action is taken, if the
action could have been approved in advance, and in connection
with the action to pay the expense or compensation permitted
under IC 20-26-1 through IC 20-26-5, IC 20-26-7, IC 20-26-12-1,
IC 20-40-12, and IC 20-48-1 or any other law.
(20) (21) To exercise any other power and make any expenditure
in carrying out the governing body's general powers and purposes
provided in this chapter or in carrying out the powers delineated
HEA 1004 — Concur

109
in this section which is reasonable from a business or educational
standpoint in carrying out school purposes of the school
corporation, including the acquisition of property or the
employment or contracting for services, even though the power or
expenditure is not specifically set out in this chapter. The specific
powers set out in this section do not limit the general grant of
powers provided in this chapter except where a limitation is set
out in IC 20-26-1 through IC 20-26-5, IC 20-26-7, IC 20-40-12,
IC 20-40-18 (after December 31, 2018), and IC 20-48-1 by
specific language or by reference to other law.
(b) A superintendent hired under subsection (a)(8):
(1) is not required to hold a teacher's license under IC 20-28-5;
and
(2) is preferred to have obtained at least a master's degree from an
accredited postsecondary institution.
(c) The governing body acting on the school corporation's behalf
may renew a lease or memorandum of understanding described in
IC 20-26-7.1-3(d) with a nonprofit organization as described in
IC 20-26-7.1-3(d).
(d) The governing body acting on the school corporation's behalf
may lease any school property for a rental to one (1) or both of the
following:
(1) The Indiana School for the Blind and Visually Impaired
established by IC 20-21-2-1.
(2) The Indiana School for the Deaf established by IC 20-22-2-1.
This subsection expires June 30, 2030.
SECTION 50. IC 20-26-5-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 389, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) This section applies to a:
(1) school corporation;
(2) charter school; or
(3) nonpublic school that employs one (1) or more employees.
(b) A school corporation, a charter school, and a nonpublic school
shall adopt a policy concerning criminal history information for
individuals who:
(1) apply for:
(A) employment with the school corporation, charter school,
or nonpublic school; or
(B) employment with an entity with which the school
corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school contracts for
services;
(2) seek to enter into a contract to provide services to the school
HEA 1004 — Concur

110
corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school; or
(3) are employed by an entity that seeks to enter into a contract to
provide services to the school corporation, charter school, or
nonpublic school;
if the individuals are likely to have direct, ongoing contact with
children within the scope of the individuals' employment.
(c) Except as provided in subsections (f) and (g), a school
corporation, a charter school, and a nonpublic school shall administer
a policy adopted under this section uniformly for all individuals to
whom the policy applies.
(d) A policy adopted under this section must require that the school
corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school conduct an expanded
criminal history check concerning each applicant for employment who
is likely to have direct, ongoing contact with children within the scope
of the individual's employment before or not later than thirty (30) days
after the start date of the applicant's employment by the school
corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school. If a vendor providing
an expanded criminal history check offers more than one (1) type of
expanded criminal history check, the policy shall require that the
school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school evaluate all
available types of criminal history checks and determine whether a
more comprehensive expanded criminal history check would better
protect the students.
(e) A policy adopted under this section:
(1) must require that the school corporation, charter school, or
nonpublic school conduct an Indiana expanded child protection
index check; and
(2) may require that the school corporation, charter school, or
nonpublic school conduct an expanded child protection index
check in other states;
concerning each applicant for employment who is likely to have direct,
ongoing contact with children within the scope of the individual's
employment. An Indiana expanded child protection index check must
be completed before or not later than sixty (60) days after the start date
of the applicant's employment by the school corporation, charter
school, or nonpublic school.
(f) A policy adopted under this section must state that the school
corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school requires an expanded
criminal history check concerning an employee of the school
corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school who is likely to have
direct, ongoing contact with children within the scope of the
employee's employment. The checks must be conducted every five (5)
HEA 1004 — Concur

111
years. A school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school may
adopt a policy to require an employee to obtain an expanded child
protection index check every five (5) years.
(g) In implementing subsection (f), and subject to subsection (j), a
school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school may update the
checks required under subsection (f) for employees who are employed
by the school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school as of
July 1, 2017, over a period not to exceed five (5) years by annually
conducting updated expanded criminal history checks and expanded
child protection index checks for at least one-fifth (1/5) of the number
of employees who are employed by the school corporation, charter
school, or nonpublic school on July 1, 2017.
(h) An applicant or employee may be required to provide a written
consent for the school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school
to request an expanded criminal history check and an expanded child
protection index check concerning the individual before the
individual's employment by the school corporation, charter school, or
nonpublic school. The school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic
school may require the individual to provide a set of fingerprints and
pay any fees required for the expanded criminal history check and
expanded child protection index check. Each applicant for employment
or employee described in subsection (f) may be required:
(1) at the time the individual applies or updates an expanded
criminal history check under subsection (f); or
(2) while an expanded criminal history check or expanded child
protection index check is being conducted;
to answer questions concerning the individual's expanded criminal
history check and expanded child protection index check. The failure
to answer honestly questions asked under this subsection is grounds for
termination of the employee's employment.
(i) An applicant is responsible for all costs associated with obtaining
the expanded criminal history check and expanded child protection
index check unless the school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic
school agrees to pay the costs. A school corporation, charter school, or
nonpublic school may agree to pay the costs associated with obtaining
an expanded criminal history background check for an employee. An
employee of a school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school
may not be required to pay the costs of an expanded child protection
index check.
(j) An applicant or employee may not be required by a school
corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school to obtain an expanded
criminal history check more than one (1) time during a five (5) year
HEA 1004 — Concur

112
period. However, a school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic
school may obtain an expanded criminal history check or an expanded
child protection index check at any time if the school corporation,
charter school, or nonpublic school has reason to believe that the
applicant or employee:
(1) is the subject of a substantiated report of child abuse or
neglect; or
(2) has been charged with or convicted of a crime listed in section
11.2(b) of this chapter or IC 20-28-5-8(c). IC 20-28-5-8(b).
(k) As used in this subsection, "offense requiring license revocation"
means an offense listed in IC 20-28-5-8(c). IC 20-28-5-8(b). A policy
adopted under this section must prohibit a school corporation, charter
school, or nonpublic school from:
(1) hiring;
(2) continuing the employment of;
(3) contracting with; or
(4) continuing to contract with;
a person who has been convicted of an offense requiring license
revocation, unless the conviction has been reversed, vacated, or set
aside on appeal.
(l) Information obtained under this section must be used in
accordance with law.
SECTION 51. IC 20-26-5-18 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 18. For purposes of section 1 of this chapter and under
the powers of section 4(a)(20) of this chapter, the governing body of
any school corporation may join and associate with groups of other
school corporations within Indiana in regional school study councils to
examine common school problems and exchange educational
information of mutual benefit, and dues to the study councils shall be
paid by the school corporation from the operations fund.
SECTION 52. IC 20-26-5-19 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 19. A governing body under its powers to fix and pay the
salaries and compensation of employees of the school corporation and
to contract for services under section 4(a)(8) of this chapter may
distribute payroll based on contractual and compensation plan
commitments instead of payroll estimates approved in advance by the
governing body.
SECTION 53. IC 20-26-5-23 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 23. Public school corporations may enter into agreements
with postsecondary educational institutions to provide teaching
experience for students of the institutions preparing for the educational
profession and for the services of persons working jointly for the school
HEA 1004 — Concur

113
corporation and an institution.
SECTION 54. IC 20-26-5-24 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 24. (a) An agreement under section 23 of this chapter
must set out the responsibilities and rights of the public school
corporations, the institutions, and the students or persons who
supervise the students and who are working jointly for a school
corporation and an institution.
(b) An agreement must contain:
(1) a provision for the payment of an honorarium for consulting
services by the postsecondary educational institution directly to
the supervisor;
(2) a provision that, if the sum paid by the institution to the
supervisor should ever be lawfully determined to be a wage rather
than an honorarium by an instrumentality of the United States,
then the postsecondary educational institution shall be considered
under the agreement to be the supervisor's part-time employer;
and
(3) a provision requiring a student to be supervised by a
certificated employee.
(c) The provision required by subsection (b)(3) must be included in
an agreement entered into or renewed under this chapter after June 30,
2015. Public school corporations and postsecondary educational
institutions shall revise agreements in effect on July 1, 2015, to include
the provisions required by subsection (b).
SECTION 55. IC 20-26-5-29 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 29. A school corporation may establish and maintain
nursery schools from the same revenue in the same manner as other
grades and departments in the common schools of the school
corporation are provided for and may apply for and receive from any
state or federal governmental agency any funds as may be made
available through the agencies for that purpose.
SECTION 56. IC 20-26-5-30 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 30. A school corporation may use funds under
IC 36-12-15-4 for the aid, maintenance, and support of nursery schools
conducted by an association incorporated to operate a nursery school.
SECTION 57. IC 20-26-5-32 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 32. The department shall:
(1) create a list of best practices to reduce student discipline; and
(2) post the list on the department's website.
SECTION 58. IC 20-26-5-32.4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 32.4. The Department of Education shall create a
document explaining aspects of autism including behaviors that
HEA 1004 — Concur

114
students with autism may exhibit. Said document is to be distributed to
school corporations for distribution to noncertificated employees (as
defined in IC 20-29-2-11).
SECTION 59. IC 20-26-5-33 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 33. A school corporation may offer classes, instruction,
or programs regarding the potential risks and consequences of creating
and sharing sexually suggestive or explicit materials through cellular
telephones, social networking web sites, computer networks, and other
digital media.
SECTION 60. IC 20-26-5-36, AS ADDED BY P.L.213-2015,
SECTION 167, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 36. (a) Each school year, the
governing body of a school corporation may spend an amount for
remediation programs for students enrolled in kindergarten through
grade 12 not to exceed one percent (1%) of the state tuition support that
the school corporation receives for the school year.
(b) (a) A remediation program for any subset of students enrolled
in kindergarten through grade 12 must be in writing and adopted at a
public hearing of the governing body of the school corporation before
the governing body may spend money for the remediation program.
(c) (b) After the governing body of a school corporation adopts a
remediation program under subsection (b), (a), the school corporation
shall promptly file the adopted plan with the department. The
department shall review a plan for a remediation program adopted by
the governing body of a school corporation and may comment on the
plan.
SECTION 61. IC 20-26-5-40.5, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 40.5. (a) Not later than January 1, 2022, Each
school corporation and charter school shall adopt and implement an
Internet use policy that:
(1) prohibits the sending, receiving, viewing, or downloading of
materials that are harmful to minors (as described in
IC 35-49-2-2) on computers and other technology related devices
owned by the school corporation or charter school;
(2) provides for the use of hardware or installation of software on
computers and other technology related devices described in
subdivision (1) to filter or block Internet access to materials that
are harmful to minors; and
(3) establishes appropriate disciplinary measures to be taken
against persons violating the policy established under this section.
HEA 1004 — Concur

115
(b) Not later than January 1, 2022, Each school corporation and
charter school shall use hardware or install software on computers and
other technology related devices described in subsection (a)(1) to filter
or block Internet access to materials that are harmful to minors.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (e), not later than January
1, 2027, each school corporation and charter school shall adopt and
implement a policy that enables the parent of a student to:
(1) increase the strength of the filter described in subsection
(b);
(2) block access to websites or content accessible on a device
described in subsection (a)(1); and
(3) limit the amount of time a device described in subsection
(a)(1) may be used by the student;
while the student is not in school or engaged in virtual instruction
or remote learning. A school to which this subsection applies must
inform each parent of a student enrolled in the school of the policy
described in this subsection.
(c) (d) Each school corporation and charter school shall post on the
school corporation's or charter school's Internet web site website the
Internet use policy established under subsection (a).
(e) A school to which this section applies that, as of June 30,
2026, has a contract with a vendor that:
(1) provides for the implementation of the requirements of
subsection (b); and
(2) cannot provide for the implementation of the requirements
of subsection (c);
is exempt from the requirements of subsection (c) until the
expiration or renewal of the contract. This subsection expires July
1, 2030.
SECTION 62. IC 20-26-5-40.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.24-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 40.7. (a) As used in this section, "instructional
time" has the meaning set forth in IC 20-30-2-1.
(b) As used in this section, "wireless communication device" means
any portable wireless device that has the capability to provide voice,
messaging, or other data communication between two (2) or more
parties, including a:
(1) cellular telephone;
(2) tablet computer;
(3) laptop computer; or
(4) gaming device.
(c) Each school corporation and charter school shall adopt and
HEA 1004 — Concur

116
implement a wireless communication device policy that:
(1) except as provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) and subsection
(d), prohibits a student from using a:
(A) wireless communication device during instructional time;
and
(B) school supplied wireless communication device for a
noneducational purpose during the school day;
(2) authorizes a teacher to allow a student to use a wireless
communication device for educational purposes during
instructional time; and
(3) permits a student to use a wireless communication device in
the event of an emergency or to manage the student's health care.
(d) The policy adopted and implemented under subsection (c) may
not prohibit a student from using a wireless communication device
during instructional time if the use of the wireless communication
device is included in the student's:
(1) individualized education program; or
(2) plan developed under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation
Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794.
(e) Each school corporation and charter school shall publish on its
website the wireless communication device policy established under
subsection (c).
SECTION 63. IC 20-26-5-41, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2025,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 41. The governing body of a school corporation
or the equivalent for a charter school may enter into a public-private
agreement for the construction or renovation of school buildings under
IC 5-23.
SECTION 64. IC 20-26-5-42.1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 42.1. (a) Not later than April 15 of each year, each
school corporation and charter school shall report to the department the
number of students who meet the following conditions during the
student's expected graduation year (as defined in IC 20-26-13-4):
(1) The student was enrolled in the school corporation on the fall
count day of ADM established under IC 20-43-4-3.
(2) The student successfully completed Indiana high school
graduation requirements before the day in February fixed by the
state board for the spring count of students under IC 20-43-4-3.
(3) The student was not enrolled in the school corporation on the
day in February fixed by the state board for the spring count of
students under IC 20-43-4-3.
(b) In addition to the number provided under subsection (a), each
HEA 1004 — Concur

117
school corporation and charter school shall submit information
prescribed by the department that is necessary to verify the number
reported under subsection (a).
SECTION 65. IC 20-26-5-43 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 43. Each school corporation shall publish on the school
corporation's website the graduation rate for each high school in the
school corporation.
SECTION 66. IC 20-26-5-46, AS ADDED BY P.L.165-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 46. (a) Not later than January 1, 2026, each school
corporation shall ensure at least one (1) employee in each school
building that is used for classroom instruction:
(1) has obtained nonviolent crisis intervention training; and
(2) is present in the school building during the school year while
school is in session.
(b) An employee described in subsection (a) shall be available:
(1) for de-escalation and to respond to instances where
de-escalation is needed; and
(2) to respond to any use of:
(A) a chemical restraint (as defined in IC 20-20-40-2);
IC 20-20.5-13-2);
(B) a mechanical restraint (as defined in IC 20-20-40-4);
IC 20-20.5-13-4);
(C) physical restraint (as defined in IC 20-20-40-5);
IC 20-20.5-13-5);
(D) seclusion (as defined in IC 20-20-40-9); IC 20-20.5-13-9);
or
(E) time-out (as defined in IC 20-20-40-10).
IC 20-20.5-13-10).
SECTION 67. IC 20-26-7-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.233-2015,
SECTION 109, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. If a common school corporation
has acquired or acquires any personal property or real estate by gift,
devise, or bequest concerning which the donor or testator, at the time
of making the gift, bequest, or devise, does not include conditions or
directions concerning the gift, bequest, or devise inconsistent with this
section, the principal of the gifts, devises, and bequests is inviolate, but
the interest, rents, incomes, issues, and profits thereof may be expended
by the school corporation.
SECTION 68. IC 20-26-7-13, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. If:
HEA 1004 — Concur

118
(1) the trustees of school corporations of a city or town believe;
or
(2) the township trustee of a township believes;
it is necessary to purchase any real estate on which to build a
schoolhouse, school, or for any other purpose connected with the real
estate, the township trustee or school trustees, or a majority of them,
may file a petition in the circuit court of the county asking for the
appointment of appraisers to appraise and assess the value of the real
estate.
SECTION 69. IC 20-26-7-26, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26. (a) A common school corporation:
(1) has the same powers; and
(2) is subject to the same duties and liabilities;
concerning municipal assessments for the cost of public improvements
affecting the common school corporation's real estate that private
owners of real estate possess or to which private owners of real estate
are subject.
(b) The real estate of a common school corporation is subject to
liens for municipal assessments for public improvements if the real
estate:
(1) had been owned by a private owner; and
(2) would have been subject to a lien at the time the lien was
attached.
(c) A penalty or an attorney's fee concerning a municipal assessment
may not be collected from a school corporation.
SECTION 70. IC 20-26-7-36 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 36. Before the governing body exercises power granted
by any law to spend more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) to
build, repair, or alter school buildings that would be financed by:
(1) entering into a lease agreement under IC 20-47-2-11 through
IC 20-47-2-14 or IC 20-47-3-9 through IC 20-47-3-12;
(2) issuing bonds under IC 20-48-1; or
(3) any other available method;
the governing body may order the preparation and pay the costs of a
feasibility study.
SECTION 71. IC 20-26-9-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 11. The secretary of education may, to the extent that
funds are available and in cooperation with other appropriate agencies
and organizations, do the following:
(1) Conduct studies of methods of improving and expending
school lunch programs and promoting nutritional education in the
HEA 1004 — Concur

119
schools.
(2) Conduct appraisals of the nutritive benefits of school lunch
programs.
(3) Report the findings and recommendations periodically to the
governor.
SECTION 72. IC 20-26-10-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.234-2007,
SECTION 104, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. As used in sections 2 through 9
of this chapter, "joint program" means the joint employment of
personnel, joint purchase of supplies or other material, or joint
purchase or lease of equipment, joint lease of land or buildings, or
both, or joint construction of, remodeling of, or additions to school
buildings, by two (2) or more school corporations, for a particular
program or purpose. The term includes the joint investment of money
under IC 5-13, data processing operations, career and technical
education, psychological services, audiovisual services, guidance
services, special education, and joint purchasing related to the
acquisition of supplies or equipment that are not to be used jointly.
SECTION 73. IC 20-26-10-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in sections 3 through 9 of this chapter,
"participating school corporations" means all school corporations
engaging in a joint program.
SECTION 74. IC 20-26-10-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 5. (a) A teacher employed in a joint program who does
not have existing years of service in one (1) of the member
corporations of the joint program is considered to have been employed
as a teacher by the governing body that is administering the joint
program at the time that the teacher is first employed by the joint
program.
(b) The teacher is entitled to the same rights and privileges as set
forth in IC 20-28-6 through IC 20-28-10 as if employed as a regular
teacher by the governing body that is administering the joint program
at the time that the teacher is first employed by the joint program.
SECTION 75. IC 20-26-10-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 6. A teacher who has existing years of service in one (1)
of the member school corporations of the joint program shall retain the
same rights and privileges as set forth in IC 20-28-6 through
IC 20-28-10 as if still employed as a teacher in the school corporation
in which the teacher has already acquired years of service.
SECTION 76. IC 20-26-10-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 7. (a) A teacher who loses the teacher's job in a joint
HEA 1004 — Concur

120
program because of:
(1) a reduction in services;
(2) a reorganization;
(3) the discontinuance of the joint program; or
(4) a withdrawal in whole or in part of a participating school from
the joint program;
shall be accorded the same rights that are provided under
IC 20-35-5-11 for teachers from special education cooperatives.
(b) A teacher who:
(1) is employed in a joint program under this chapter;
(2) loses the teacher's job in the joint program as described in
subsection (a); and
(3) subsequently is employed by a participating school
corporation as described in subsection (a);
retains the rights and privileges under IC 20-28-6 through IC 20-28-10
that the teacher held at the time the teacher lost the job in the joint
program as described in subdivision (2).
SECTION 77. IC 20-26-10-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 9. (a) The governing bodies of participating school
corporations may pay into a joint fund, to be known as the joint
investment fund, all or part of the money the governing bodies may
otherwise invest under IC 5-13-9. The fund shall be administered by
the governing body of the school corporation designated in the written
agreement under section 3 of this chapter. The designated governing
body shall receive, invest, maintain an account for, and disburse the
fund in the same manner as prescribed for other funds for the
governing body representing money available for investment and in
accordance with the written agreement.
(b) With respect to an investment described in IC 5-13-9, quotes
may be solicited and received orally, and the investment shall be made
with the designated depository that submitted the highest quote. If two
(2) or more designated depositories submit the highest quote, the
investment shall be made either:
(1) by dividing the investment among the depositories so as not
to lose the benefits of the quotes received; or
(2) if division is not practicable, by lot.
(c) The designated depository holding the investment shall remit to
the governing body administering the joint program any money due
under the investment on the date the investment matures and in the
manner directed by the governing body. A designated depository
participating in an agreement for joint investment of money under
IC 5-13 shall provide a detailed accounting of the transactions as
HEA 1004 — Concur

121
required for audit purposes by the state board of accounts.
SECTION 78. IC 20-26-10-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 12. The purchasing of equipment, supplies, and materials
shall be under the same laws and regulations as the purchasing would
be if it were by a single school corporation. However, the bids shall be
submitted by the superintendent of county schools to the participating
corporations for approval.
SECTION 79. IC 20-26-11-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 212, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A student who is the child
of a state employee who resides on state owned property, resides on
state owned property, or is the child of a full-time employee of a state
educational institution, who resides on property owned or operated by
the state educational institution and used for educational, research, or
public service programs is considered a transferred student if:
(1) the student attends a public school in the school corporation
located nearest to the student's residence within the county in
which all or a part of either the state owned property, or the
property owned or operated by the state supported postsecondary
institution, is located; or
(2) the state owned property is the Soldiers' and Sailors' Children's
Home and the student attends a public school in the county in
which the home is located or in an adjacent county.
Transfer tuition for a student transferred under this subsection shall be
paid by the state. However, this subsection does not apply to children
of state employees residing in student housing on property owned by
any state educational institution.
(b) A foreign student visiting in Indiana under any student exchange
program approved by the state board is considered a resident student
with legal settlement in the school corporation where the foreign
exchange student resides. The student may attend a school in the school
corporation in which the family with whom the student is living
resides. A school corporation that receives a foreign student may not
be paid any transfer tuition. The school corporation shall include the
foreign student in computations to determine the amount of state aid
that it is entitled to receive.
SECTION 80. IC 20-26-11-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The state board shall hear the following:
(1) All appeals from an order expelling a child under
IC 20-33-8-17.
(2) (1) All appeals provided in this chapter.
HEA 1004 — Concur

122
(3) (2) All disputes on the following:
(A) Legal settlement.
(B) Right to transfer.
(C) Right to attend school in any school corporation.
(D) Amount of transfer tuition.
(E) Any other matter arising under this chapter.
The board shall hold a hearing on the timely written application of any
interested party.
(b) The state board shall make its determination under the following
procedure:
(1) A hearing shall be held on each matter presented.
(2) Each interested party, including where appropriate, the
parents, the student, the transferor corporation, the transferee
corporation, or the state, shall be given at least ten (10) days
notice of the hearing by certified mail or by personal delivery.
(3) The date of giving the notice is the date of mailing or delivery.
(4) Any interested party may appear at the hearing in person or by
counsel, present evidence, cross-examine witnesses, and present
in writing or orally summary statements of position.
(5) A written or recorded transcript of the hearing shall be made.
(6) The hearing may be held by the state board or by a hearing
examiner appointed by it who must be a state employee.
(7) The hearing, at the option of the state board or hearing
examiner, may be held at any place in Indiana.
(8) The hearing examiner shall make written findings of fact and
recommendations.
(9) The determination of the state board must be made on the
basis of the record, summaries, and findings, but it is required to
examine only those parts of the entire record as it considers
necessary.
(c) The hearing and proceedings are not governed by IC 4-21.5.
(d) The determination of the state board is final and binding on the
parties to the proceeding.
(e) A notice of the state board's determination shall be mailed to
each party by certified mail. An action to contest the validity of the
decision may not be instituted more than thirty (30) days after the
mailing of the notice.
SECTION 81. IC 20-26-12-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 94, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) but
notwithstanding any other law, each governing body of a school
corporation and each organizer of a charter school shall purchase from
HEA 1004 — Concur

123
a publisher, either individually or through a purchasing cooperative of
school corporations, as applicable, the curricular materials selected by
the proper local officials, and shall provide at no cost the curricular
materials to each student enrolled in the school corporation or charter
school. Curricular materials provided to a student under this section
remain the property of the governing body of the school corporation or
organizer of the charter school.
(b) This section does not prohibit a governing body of a school
corporation or an organizer of a charter school from assessing and
collecting a reasonable fee for lost or significantly damaged curricular
materials. in accordance with rules established by the state board under
subsection (d). Fees collected under this subsection must be deposited
in the:
(1) education fund of the school corporation; or
(2) education fund of the charter school, or, if the charter school
does not have an education fund, the same fund into which state
tuition support is deposited for the charter school;
in which the student was enrolled at the time the fee was imposed.
(c) This section does not prohibit a governing body of a school
corporation or an organizer of a charter school from assessing and
collecting a reasonable fee for supplies and materials that:
(1) are not curricular materials; and
(2) supplement the instruction in a particular course of study.
(d) The state board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section.
SECTION 82. IC 20-26-12-23, AS AMENDED BY P.L.244-2017,
SECTION 52, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. A school corporation may:
(1) borrow money to buy curricular materials; student issued
hardware, including laptop computers, that may be necessary
for accessing curriculum; and
(2) issue notes, maturing serially in not more than four (4) years
and payable from its education fund, to secure the loan.
SECTION 83. IC 20-26-12-24, AS AMENDED BY P.L.243-2023,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) Except as provided in section 24.5 of this
chapter, the superintendent, after approval from the governing body,
shall establish procedures for adoption of curricular materials.
(b) Except as provided in section 24.5 of this chapter, the governing
body, after reviewing any recommendations from the superintendent,
shall adopt curricular materials for use in teaching each subject in the
school corporation.
HEA 1004 — Concur

124
(c) A special committee of teachers and parents may also be
appointed to review books, magazines, and audiovisual material used
or proposed for use in the classroom to supplement state adopted
curricular materials and may make recommendations to the
superintendent and the governing body concerning the use of these
materials.
(d) The governing body may, if the governing body considers it
appropriate, retain curricular materials adopted under this section and
authorize the purchase of supplemental materials to ensure continued
alignment with academic standards adopted by the state board.
(e) The superintendent, advisory committee, and governing body
may consider using the list of curricular materials provided by the
department under IC 20-20-5.5. IC 20-20.5-4.
(f) A governing body may not purchase curricular materials from a
publisher unless the publisher agrees, in accordance with Sections
612(a)(23)(A) and 674(e)(4) of the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Improvement Act 2004 (20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.), to provide
or grant a license to the school corporation to allow for the
reproduction of adopted curricular materials in:
(1) large type;
(2) Braille; and
(3) audio format.
SECTION 84. IC 20-26-14-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2020,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The department shall notify the association
of any license revocation or suspension involving a licensed teacher (as
defined in IC 20-18-2-22) under IC 20-28-5-8 who:
(1) has:
(A) been convicted of an offense described in IC 20-28-5-8(c);
IC 20-28-5-8(b); or
(B) committed misconduct described in IC 20-28-5-7(1) or
IC 20-28-5-7(2); and
(2) is also a coach accredited by the association.
(b) A school corporation, charter high school, or nonpublic high
school with at least one (1) employee must report to the association, in
a manner prescribed by the association, when a nonteaching or
volunteer coach accredited by the association has been convicted of an
offense described in IC 20-28-5-8(c). IC 20-28-5-8(b).
(c) The association shall develop a rule, as soon as practicable, to
suspend or revoke the coaching accreditation of a teacher who has been
reported to the association under subsection (a) for committing
misconduct described in IC 20-28-5-7(1) or IC 20-28-5-7(2).
HEA 1004 — Concur

125
(d) The association shall revoke the accreditation of any coach who
has been convicted of an offense described in IC 20-28-5-8. The
association may, after holding a hearing on the matter, reinstate the
accreditation of an individual whose accreditation has been revoked by
the association if the individual's conviction has been reversed,
vacated, or set aside on appeal.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the
association from revoking a coaching accreditation or otherwise
imposing any other form of discipline for misconduct not described in
IC 20-28-5-7(1), IC 20-28-5-7(2), or IC 20-28-5-8.
(f) The:
(1) association or its employees;
(2) department or its employees; or
(3) school corporation, charter high school, or nonpublic high
school with at least one (1) employee or its employees;
are immune from civil liability for any act done or omitted under this
section or section 9 of this chapter unless the action constitutes gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
SECTION 85. IC 20-26-17-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2016,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The following apply with respect to a school
corporation's employee health coverage program:
(1) If the school corporation pays a commission, a bonus, an
override, a contingency fee, or any other compensation to an
insurance producer or other adviser in connection with the health
coverage, the school corporation shall:
(A) specify the commission, bonus, override, contingency fee,
or other compensation in the school corporation's annual
budget fixed under IC 6-1.1-17; and
(B) make the information specified under clause (A) available
to the public upon request.
(2) The school corporation may allow:
(A) members of the school corporation's governing body; or
(B) an attorney of the school corporation's governing body;
to be covered under the school corporation's employee health
coverage program.
(3) (2) Except as provided in subsection (b), all individuals
insured under the school corporation's employee health coverage
program:
(A) are eligible for the same coverage as all other individuals
insured under the program; and
(B) to the extent allowed by federal law, may pay different
HEA 1004 — Concur

126
amounts for the coverage.
(b) Except as provided in IC 5-10-8-6.7(b), a school corporation:
(1) may:
(A) make an assignment of wages upon the request of a school
corporation employee in accordance with IC 22-2-6-2 to pay
the school corporation employee's share of premiums for
health insurance that is available to the school corporation
employee as a result of a collective bargaining agreement:
(i) negotiated with the school corporation by a labor
organization; and
(ii) under which the school corporation employee is covered;
and
(B) pay the school corporation's share of premiums for the
bargained health insurance; and
(2) is not required to make the bargained health insurance
available to all school corporation employees.
SECTION 86. IC 20-26-18.2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2020,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. A school corporation, a state accredited
nonpublic school, or a charter school shall report all instances of:
(1) seclusion (as defined in IC 20-20-40-9); IC 20-20.5-13-9);
(2) chemical restraint (as defined in IC 20-20-40-2);
IC 20-20.5-13-2);
(3) mechanical restraint (as defined in IC 20-20-40-4);
IC 20-20.5-13-4); and
(4) physical restraint (as defined in IC 20-20-40-5);
IC 20-20.5-13-5);
involving a school resource officer in accordance with the restraint and
seclusion plan adopted by the school corporation, state accredited
nonpublic school, or charter school under IC 20-20-40-14.
IC 20-20.5-13-16.
SECTION 87. IC 20-26-20-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.125-2022,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A public school shall conduct an expanded
criminal history check of a representative of an organization before the
representative may provide information to students at a public school
as described in section 4 of this chapter. The representative may be
required to provide a written consent for the public school to conduct
the expanded criminal history check. The representative of the
organization is responsible for all costs associated with obtaining the
expanded criminal history check.
(b) A public school may refuse to allow a representative to provide
HEA 1004 — Concur

127
information as described in section 4 of this chapter if the
representative has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor listed in
IC 20-28-5-8(b) or IC 20-28-5-8(c). or IC 20-28-5-8(d).
SECTION 88. IC 20-27-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.140-2012,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The governing body of a school corporation
may provide transportation for students to and from school.
(b) If the governing body of a school corporation:
(1) provides transportation; or
(2) contracts with an educational service center (as defined by
IC 20-20-1-2) IC 20-20.5-1-3) to provide transportation;
no fee may be charged to a parent or student for transportation to and
from school. However, a fee may be charged for transportation to and
from an athletic, a social, or another school sponsored function.
SECTION 89. IC 20-27-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.140-2012,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to:
(1) a nonpublic school or to a nonpublic school bus driver
contract executed for a nonpublic school; or
(2) an educational service center (as defined by IC 20-20-1-2)
IC 20-20.5-1-3) or a school bus driver contract executed for an
educational service center.
SECTION 90. IC 20-27-12.1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.162-2024,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "career and technical
education" refers to:
(1) an apprenticeship program (as defined in IC 20-43-8-0.3);
(2) a career and technical education (as defined in IC 20-20-38-1)
IC 20-20.5-10-1) program;
(3) a modern youth apprenticeship (as defined in
IC 20-51.4-2-9.5); and
(4) a work based learning course (as defined in IC 20-43-8-0.7).
SECTION 91. IC 20-28-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 142, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Subject to subsection (c) and
in addition to the powers and duties set forth in this article, the state
board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to do the following:
(1) Set standards for teacher licensing and for the administration
of a professional licensing and certification process by the
department.
(2) Approve or disapprove teacher preparation programs.
(3) Set fees to be charged in connection with teacher licensing.
HEA 1004 — Concur

128
(4) Suspend, revoke, or reinstate teacher licenses.
(5) Enter into agreements with other states to acquire reciprocal
approval of teacher preparation programs.
(6) Set standards for teacher licensing concerning new subjects of
study.
(7) Evaluate work experience and military service concerning
postsecondary education and experience equivalency.
(8) Perform any other action that
(A) relates to the improvement of instruction in the public
schools through teacher education and professional
development through continuing education. and
(B) attracts qualified candidates for teacher education from
among the high school graduates of Indiana.
(9) Set standards for endorsement of school psychologists as
independent practice school psychologists under IC 20-28-12.
(10) Before July 1, 2011, set standards for sign language
interpreters who provide services to children with disabilities in
an educational setting and an enforcement mechanism for the
interpreter standards.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(1), an individual is entitled to
one (1) year of occupational experience for purposes of obtaining an
occupational specialist certificate under this article for each year the
individual holds a license under IC 25-8-6.
(c) (b) The state board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish
procedures to expedite the issuance, renewal, or reinstatement under
this article of a license or certificate of a:
(1) person who; or
(2) person whose spouse;
serves on active duty (as defined in IC 25-1-12-2) and is assigned to a
duty station in Indiana.
SECTION 92. IC 20-28-2-11, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. The department shall collaborate with
nonprofit entities, the commission for higher education, and state
educational institutions to develop and implement initiatives focusing
on the recruitment and retention of qualified educators from
underrepresented populations. The initiatives should include, but are
not limited to, the following activities:
(1) Development of a recruitment plan for underrepresented and
teacher shortage areas.
(2) Production of a web site as a communication tool that
HEA 1004 — Concur

129
provides resource information and scholarship opportunities.
(3) Development of a research agenda and network support
system at each state educational institution to remove barriers and
address challenges faced by students of underrepresented
populations in order to recruit, retain, and graduate these students.
SECTION 93. IC 20-28-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.37-2015,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) An accredited school or department may use
the word "accredited" in advertising approved courses and the types of
teachers the school or department is accredited to prepare. An
accredited school or department may enter into the student teaching
agreements specified in IC 20-26-5-23.
(b) The department shall revoke the right to use the word
"accredited" when an accredited school or department refuses to abide
by the advisory board's rules.
SECTION 94. IC 20-28-5-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 117, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This section applies when a
prosecuting attorney knows that a licensed employee of a public school
or a nonpublic school has been convicted of an offense listed in
subsection (c). (b). The prosecuting attorney shall immediately give
written notice of the conviction to the following:
(1) The secretary of education.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3), the superintendent of
the school corporation that employs the licensed employee or the
equivalent authority if a nonpublic school employs the licensed
employee.
(3) The presiding officer of the governing body of the school
corporation that employs the licensed employee, if the convicted
licensed employee is the superintendent of the school corporation.
(b) The superintendent of a school corporation, presiding officer of
the governing body, or equivalent authority for a nonpublic school shall
immediately notify the secretary of education when the individual
knows that a current or former licensed employee of the public school
or nonpublic school has been convicted of an offense listed in
subsection (c), or when the governing body or equivalent authority for
a nonpublic school takes any final action in relation to an employee
who engaged in any offense listed in subsection (c).
(c) (b) Except as provided in section 8.5 of this chapter, the
department shall permanently revoke the license of a person who is
known by the department to have been convicted of any of the
following:
HEA 1004 — Concur

130
(1) The following felonies:
(A) A sex crime under IC 35-42-4 (including criminal deviate
conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its repeal)).
(B) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2).
(C) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3).
(D) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(E) Dealing in or manufacturing cocaine or a narcotic drug
(IC 35-48-4-1).
(F) Dealing in methamphetamine (IC 35-48-4-1.1).
(G) Manufacturing methamphetamine (IC 35-48-4-1.2).
(H) Dealing in a schedule I, II, or III controlled substance
(IC 35-48-4-2).
(I) Dealing in a schedule IV controlled substance
(IC 35-48-4-3).
(J) Dealing in a schedule V controlled substance
(IC 35-48-4-4).
(K) Dealing in a counterfeit substance (IC 35-48-4-5).
(L) Dealing in marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia as a
felony (IC 35-48-4-10).
(M) An offense under IC 35-48-4 involving the manufacture
or sale of a synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), a
synthetic drug lookalike substance (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-321.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019)) under
IC 35-48-4-10.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019), a
controlled substance analog (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or
a substance represented to be a controlled substance (as
described in IC 35-48-4-4.6).
(N) Homicide (IC 35-42-1).
(O) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(P) Reckless homicide (IC 35-42-1-5).
(Q) Battery as any of the following:
(i) A Class A felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 2 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014).
(ii) A Class B felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 3 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014).
(iii) A Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014).
(R) Aggravated battery (IC 35-42-2-1.5).
(S) Robbery (IC 35-42-5-1).
HEA 1004 — Concur

131
(T) Carjacking (IC 35-42-5-2) (before its repeal).
(U) Arson as a Class A felony or Class B felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or as a Level 2, Level 3, or
Level 4 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014)
(IC 35-43-1-1(a)).
(V) Burglary as a Class A felony or Class B felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or as a Level 1, Level 2, Level
3, or Level 4 felony (for a crime committed after June 30,
2014) (IC 35-43-2-1).
(W) Human trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5).
(X) Dealing in a controlled substance resulting in death
(IC 35-42-1-1.5).
(Y) Attempt under IC 35-41-5-1 to commit an offense listed in
this subsection.
(Z) Conspiracy under IC 35-41-5-2 to commit an offense listed
in this subsection.
(2) Public indecency (IC 35-45-4-1) committed:
(A) after June 30, 2003; or
(B) before July 1, 2003, if the person committed the offense
by, in a public place:
(i) engaging in sexual intercourse or other sexual conduct
(as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5);
(ii) appearing in a state of nudity with the intent to arouse
the sexual desires of the person or another person, or being
at least eighteen (18) years of age, with the intent to be seen
by a child less than sixteen (16) years of age; or
(iii) fondling the person's genitals or the genitals of another
person.
(d) (c) The department shall permanently revoke the license of a
person who is known by the department to have been convicted of a
federal offense or an offense in another state that is comparable to a
felony or misdemeanor listed in subsection (c). (b).
(e) (d) A license may be suspended by the secretary of education as
specified in IC 20-28-7.5.
(f) (e) The department shall develop a data base of information on
school corporation employees who have been reported to the
department under this section.
(g) (f) Upon receipt of information from the office of judicial
administration in accordance with IC 33-24-6-3 concerning persons
convicted of an offense listed in subsection (c), (b), the department
shall:
(1) cross check the information received from the office of
HEA 1004 — Concur

132
judicial administration with information concerning licensed
teachers (as defined in IC 20-18-2-22(b)) maintained by the
department; and
(2) if a licensed teacher (as defined in IC 20-18-2-22(b)) has been
convicted of an offense described in subsection (c), (b), revoke
the licensed teacher's license.
SECTION 95. IC 20-28-5-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.90-2011,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) This section applies to an examination
required for teacher licensure under this chapter.
(b) If an individual does not demonstrate the level of proficiency
required to receive a license on all or a part of an examination, the
examination's scorer must provide the individual with the individual's
test scores, including subscores for each area tested.
SECTION 96. IC 20-28-5-27, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 118, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) In an effort to fill a vacant
teaching position, offer a new program or class, or supplement a
program currently being offered, the governing body of a school
corporation or the equivalent authority for a charter school or
nonpublic school may issue an adjunct teacher permit to an individual
if the following minimum requirements are met:
(1) The individual has at least four (4) years of experience in the
content area in which the individual intends to teach.
(2) The school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school
conducts an expanded criminal history check and expanded child
protection index check concerning the individual as required
under IC 20-26-5-10.
(3) The individual has not been convicted of a felony listed in
section 8(c) 8(b) of this chapter or described in section 8(d) 8(c)
of this chapter or the individual's conviction has been reversed,
vacated, or set aside on appeal.
However, the governing body or equivalent authority may establish
stricter requirements than the requirements prescribed by this
subsection.
(b) If a governing body of a school corporation or the equivalent
authority for a charter school or nonpublic school issues an adjunct
teacher permit to an individual under subsection (a):
(1) the school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school
may enter into an employment agreement for employment with
the individual as a part-time or full-time teacher of the school
corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school;
HEA 1004 — Concur

133
(2) the individual who holds the adjunct permit may teach in any
content area, including a career and technical education content
area, in which the school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic
school allows the individual to teach based on the individual's
experience described in subsection (a);
(3) the individual must be assigned a teacher mentor for support
in pedagogy; and
(4) the individual must complete the following training within the
first ninety (90) days of employment:
(A) Bullying prevention.
(B) Child abuse and neglect.
(C) Youth suicide awareness and prevention.
(D) Human trafficking.
The training described in subdivision (4)(D) may be completed through
the online platform described in IC 20-19-3-29.
(c) An adjunct teacher may not provide special education
instruction.
(d) The salary of an adjunct teacher under an employment
agreement described in IC 20-28-6-7.3 is not subject to the
requirements under IC 20-28-9-1.5 or a local compensation plan
established by a school corporation as described in IC 20-28-9-1.5.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in a collective bargaining
agreement entered into or renewed before July 1, 2022, an employment
agreement entered into under this section is not subject to a collective
bargaining agreement entered into under IC 20-29.
(f) It is not an unfair practice for a school corporation to enter into
an employment agreement under this section.
(g) Each school corporation or charter school that hires an adjunct
teacher under this section shall report to the department the following
information:
(1) The number of adjunct teachers who hold a permit issued
under this section that the school corporation or charter school
has hired each school year, disaggregated by the grade level and
subject area taught by the adjunct teacher.
(2) The following information for each adjunct teacher described
in subdivision (1):
(A) The name of the adjunct teacher.
(B) The subject matter the adjunct teacher is permitted to
teach.
(C) A description of the adjunct teacher's experience described
in subsection (a)(1).
(D) The adjunct teacher's total salary and any other
HEA 1004 — Concur

134
compensation paid to the adjunct teacher during the school
year.
(E) The number of previous adjunct teaching employment
agreements the adjunct teacher has entered into with the
school corporation or charter school or any other school
corporation or charter school.
(h) (g) A school corporation or charter school shall post a vacant
adjunct teacher position on the department's online adjunct teacher
portal established under IC 20-19-3-25.
(i) (h) A school corporation may notify the parents of students
enrolled in the school corporation of a vacant adjunct teacher position.
(j) (i) The governing body of a school corporation shall announce
any vacant adjunct teacher positions at meetings of the governing body.
SECTION 97. IC 20-28-5.5-1.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 1.5. After June 30, 2024, if an online platform is
established or licensed for use under IC 20-19-3-29, the training
described in any of the following statutes must be provided through the
online platform:
IC 20-26-5-34.4.
IC 20-26-9-8.
IC 20-28-3-4.5.
IC 20-28-5.5-1.
IC 20-34-7-6.
IC 20-34-7-7.
IC 20-34-8-9.
IC 20-35.5.
SECTION 98. IC 20-28-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.200-2023,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided under section 7.3 of this
chapter, a contract entered into by a teacher and a school corporation
must:
(1) be in writing;
(2) be signed by both parties; and
(3) contain the:
(A) beginning date of the school term as determined annually
by the school corporation;
(B) number of days in the school term as determined annually
by the school corporation;
(C) total salary to be paid to the teacher during the school year;
and
(D) number of salary payments to be made to the teacher
during the school year. and
HEA 1004 — Concur

135
(E) number of hours per day the teacher is expected to work.
(b) The contract may provide for the annual determination of the
teacher's annual compensation based on a local compensation plan
specifying a salary range, which is part of the contract. The
compensation plan may be changed by the school corporation before
the later of May 1 of a year, with the changes effective the next school
year, or the date specified in a collective bargaining agreement
applicable to the next school year. A teacher affected by the changes
shall be furnished with printed copies of the changed compensation
plan not later than thirty (30) days after the adoption of the
compensation plan.
(c) A contract under this section is also governed by the following
statutes:
(1) IC 20-28-9-5 through IC 20-28-9-6.
(2) IC 20-28-9-9 through IC 20-28-9-11.
(3) IC 20-28-9-13.
(4) IC 20-28-9-14.
(d) A governing body shall provide the blank contract forms,
carefully worded by the secretary of education, and have them signed.
The contracts are public records open to inspection by the residents of
each school corporation.
(e) An action may be brought on a contract that conforms with
subsections (a)(1), (a)(2), and (d).
SECTION 99. IC 20-28-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.233-2015,
SECTION 206, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A temporary teacher's
contract shall be used only for employing:
(1) a teacher to serve in the absence of a teacher who has been
granted a leave of absence by the school corporation for:
(A) engaging in defense service or in service auxiliary to
defense service;
(B) professional study or advancement;
(C) exchange teaching;
(D) extended disability to which a licensed physician has
attested; or
(E) serving in the general assembly; or
(2) a new teacher for a position:
(A) that is funded by a grant outside the school funding
formula for which funding is available only for a specified
period or purpose; or
(B) vacated by a teacher who is under a regular contract and
who temporarily accepts a teacher position that is funded by a
HEA 1004 — Concur

136
grant outside the school funding formula for which funding is
available only for a specified period or purpose; or
(3) a teacher who has been issued an emergency permit by the
department.
(b) The temporary teacher's contract must contain:
(1) the provisions of the regular teacher's contract except those
providing for continued tenure of position;
(2) a blank space for the name of the teacher granted the leave,
which may not be used on another temporary teacher's contract
for the same leave of absence; and
(3) an expiration date that:
(A) is the date of the return of the teacher on leave; and
(B) is not later than the end of the school year.
(c) If a teacher is employed on the temporary teacher's contract for
at least sixty (60) days in a school year, the teacher may, on request,
receive the service credit that the teacher would otherwise receive with
regard to the Indiana state teachers' retirement fund.
(d) A school corporation is not required to use a temporary teacher's
contract for employing a teacher to serve in the absence of a teacher
who has been granted a leave of absence.
SECTION 100. IC 20-28-6-7.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 122, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) A teacher who is subject to
section 8 of this chapter is not subject to this section.
(b) A teacher who:
(1) serves under contract as a teacher in a public school
corporation;
(2) is in the teacher's first or second year of full-time teaching in
a classroom; and
(3) has not at any time before July 1, 2012, entered into a teaching
contract for further service with the school corporation;
shall be considered a probationary teacher.
(c) A teacher who:
(1) is not a probationary teacher under subsection (b); and
(2) enters into a contract described in section 2 of this chapter;
becomes a professional teacher.
SECTION 101. IC 20-28-7.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.200-2023,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This chapter applies to a teacher in a school
corporation (as defined in IC 20-18-2-16(a)).
(b) A contract with a teacher may be canceled immediately in the
manner set forth in sections 2 through 4 of this chapter for any of the
HEA 1004 — Concur

137
following reasons:
(1) Immorality.
(2) Insubordination, which means a willful refusal to obey the
state school laws or reasonable rules adopted for the governance
of the school building or the school corporation.
(3) Repeated ineffective performance, as determined by the
school corporation.
(4) Neglect of duty.
(5) A conviction of an offense listed in IC 20-28-5-8(c).
IC 20-28-5-8(b).
(6) Other good or just cause.
(c) In addition to the reasons set forth in subsection (b), a
probationary teacher's contract may be canceled for any reason relevant
to the school corporation's interest in the manner set forth in sections
2 through 4 of this chapter.
(d) After June 30, 2012, The cancellation of teacher's contracts due
to a justifiable decrease in the number of teaching positions shall be
determined on the basis of performance rather than seniority. In cases
where teachers are placed in the same performance category, any of the
items in IC 20-28-9-1.5(b) may be considered.
(e) Only the governing body may terminate, cancel, or otherwise
refuse to renew a contract of a superintendent or assistant
superintendent. Notice of the contract cancellation or the refusal to
renew the individual's contract must be provided in the manner
provided in IC 20-28-8-3(a).
SECTION 102. IC 20-28-7.5-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 8. (a) This section does not apply to an individual who
works at a conversion charter school (as defined in IC 20-24-1-5) for
purposes of the individual's employment with the school corporation
that sponsored the conversion charter school.
(b) A contract between a school corporation and a teacher is void if
the teacher, at the time of signing the contract, is bound by a previous
contract to teach in a public school and the contract is entered into at
any time during the school year or less than fourteen (14) days before
the day on which the teacher must report for work at that school.
However, another contract may be signed by the teacher that will be
effective if the teacher:
(1) furnishes the principal a release by the first employer; or
(2) shows proof that thirty (30) days written notice was delivered
by the teacher to the first employer.
(c) A principal may request from a teacher, at the time of
contracting, a written statement as to whether the teacher has signed
HEA 1004 — Concur

138
another teaching contract. However, the teacher's failure to provide the
statement is not a cause for subsequently voiding the contract.
SECTION 103. IC 20-28-8-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.43-2021,
SECTION 92, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. A contract of employment shall be entered into
between the governing body of the school corporation and a principal
or assistant principal subject to the following conditions:
(1) The basic contract must be the regular teacher's contract as
prescribed by the secretary of education unless the parties agree
to an alternative employment contract.
(2) This subdivision applies to contracts entered into or renewed
after June 30, 2019. The initial contract must be for a term of at
least one (1) year and not more than three (3) years. However, a
contract may be extended for not more than an additional three (3)
years beyond the term of the original contract.
(3) The contract may be altered, modified, or rescinded in favor
of a new contract at any time by mutual consent of the governing
body of the school corporation and the principal or assistant
principal, if the contract, when reduced to writing, is consistent
with this chapter.
SECTION 104. IC 20-28-8-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.43-2021,
SECTION 93, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. A contract of employment shall be entered
into between the managing body and a local director subject to the
following conditions:
(1) The basic contract must be the regular teacher's contract as
prescribed by the secretary of education.
(2) (1) The minimum term of the initial contract must be the
equivalent of two (2) school years.
(3) (2) The contract may be altered, modified, or rescinded in
favor of a new contract at any time by mutual consent of the
managing body and the local director if the written contract is
consistent with this chapter.
SECTION 105. IC 20-28-9-24 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 24. (a) This section applies to an examination that is
required for teacher licensure under this chapter.
(b) If an individual does not demonstrate the level of proficiency
required to receive a license on all or a part of an examination, the
examination's scorer must provide the individual with the individual's
test scores, including subscores for each area tested.
SECTION 106. IC 20-28-9-25 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 25. For purposes of the federal teacher loan forgiveness
HEA 1004 — Concur

139
program provided under 34 CFR 682.216(a)(4), "secondary school"
includes any eligible elementary or secondary school at which a highly
qualified teacher in a high needs area (as defined in 34 CFR
682.216(b)) is employed.
SECTION 107. IC 20-29-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.75-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. "Deficit financing" for a budget year
(1) means except as provided in subdivision (2), actual
expenditures exceeding the employer's current year actual
education fund revenue and, for a school employer for which the
voters have passed an operating referendum tax levy under
IC 20-46-1 or a school safety referendum tax levy under
IC 20-46-9, the amount of revenue certified by the department of
local government finance, excluding money distributed to a
charter school under IC 20-46-1-21 or IC 20-46-9-22. or
(2) means, in the case of any distressed school corporation, the
Gary Community School Corporation, or the Muncie Community
school corporation, actual expenditures plus additional payments
against any outstanding debt obligations exceeding the employer's
current year actual education fund revenue, and, for a school
employer for which the voters have passed an operating
referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-1 or a school safety
referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9, excluding money
distributed to a charter school under IC 20-46-1-21 or
IC 20-46-9-22, the amount of revenue certified by the department
of local government finance.
Except as provided in IC 20-29-6-3(c), revenue does not include money
estimated to be or actually transferred from the school corporation's
operations fund to its education fund. Revenue does not include money
allocated for supplemental payments in a resolution passed under
IC 20-29-6-3(d).
SECTION 108. IC 20-29-6-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 174, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) For a contract entered into
after June 30, 2011, a school employer may not bargain collectively
with the exclusive representative on the following:
(1) The school calendar.
(2) Teacher dismissal procedures and criteria.
(3) Restructuring options available to a school employer under
federal or state statutes, regulations, or rules because of the failure
of the school corporation or a school to meet federal or state
accountability standards.
HEA 1004 — Concur

140
(4) The ability of a school employer to contract, partner, or
operate jointly with an educational entity that provides
postsecondary credits to students of the school employer or dual
credits from the school employer and the educational entity.
(5) Contract costs for curricular materials (as defined in
IC 20-18-2-2.7).
(6) Teacher evaluation procedures and criteria.
(6) (7) Any subject not expressly listed in section 4 of this
chapter.
(b) For a contract entered into after January 1, 2015, for a school
year beginning after June 30, 2015, a school employer may not bargain
collectively with the exclusive representative for the following:
(1) A matter described in subsection (a).
(2) A matter that another statute specifies is not subject to
collective bargaining, including IC 20-28-9-1.5 and IC 20-43-16.
(c) A subject set forth in subsection (a) or (b) that may not be
bargained collectively may not be included in an agreement entered
into under this article.
SECTION 109. IC 20-29-6-4.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.48-2011,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.7. (a) A school employer may not bargain
collectively with the exclusive representative on teacher evaluation
procedures and criteria after this section has been enacted into law.
(b) A contract entered into between a school employer and an
exclusive representative after this section has been enacted into law
may not extend past the end of a state budget biennium.
SECTION 110. IC 20-30-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2021,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) In consultation with the student's school
counselor, after seeking consultation with each student's parents, and
not later than the date on which the student completes grade 8, each
student shall develop a graduation plan that is a part of the student's
permanent school record and accessible to a parent of the student in
accordance with the Family Education Rights and Privacy Act (20
U.S.C. 1232g et seq.).
(b) The graduation plan developed under subsection (a) must
include the following:
(1) A statement of intent to graduate from high school.
(2) An acknowledgment of the importance of:
(A) good citizenship;
(B) school attendance; and
(C) diligent study habits.
HEA 1004 — Concur

141
(3) The subject and skill areas of interest to the student.
(4) The postsecondary goals of the student aligned with the
graduation pathway requirements under IC 20-32-4-1.5.
(5) A program of study under the college/technology preparation
curriculum adopted by the state board under IC 20-30-10-2 for
grades 10, 11, and 12 that meets the interests, aptitude, and
postsecondary goals of the student.
(6) Assurances that, upon satisfactory fulfillment of the plan, the
student:
(A) is entitled to graduate; and
(B) will have taken at least the minimum variety and number
of courses necessary to gain admittance to a state educational
institution.
(7) An indication of assessments (other than the statewide
assessment program and the graduation examination (before July
1, 2018)) that the student plans to take voluntarily during grade 10
through grade 12 and which may include any of the following:
(A) The SAT Reasoning Test.
(B) The ACT test.
(C) Advanced placement exams.
(D) College readiness exams approved by the department.
(E) Workforce readiness exams approved by the department of
workforce development established under IC 22-4.1-2.
(F) Cambridge International examinations.
(c) A school corporation shall:
(1) provide a copy of a student's graduation plan developed
under this section to a parent of the student; and
(2) provide the parent described in subdivision (1) an
opportunity to consult with the school corporation on the
student's graduation plan.
SECTION 111. IC 20-30-5-5.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 139, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) Each public school shall
include in the public school's curriculum age appropriate, research
based instruction as provided under IC 10-21-1-14(d) IC 10-21-1-14(e)
focusing on bullying prevention for all students in grades 1 through 12.
(b) The department, in consultation with school safety specialists
and school counselors, shall prepare outlines or materials for the
instruction described in subsection (a). and incorporate the instruction
in grades 1 through 12.
(c) Instruction on bullying prevention may be delivered by a teacher,
school safety specialist, school counselor, or any other person with
HEA 1004 — Concur

142
training and expertise in the area of bullying prevention and
intervention.
SECTION 112. IC 20-30-5-5.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 140, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.7. (a) Each public school,
including a charter school, and state accredited nonpublic school shall
include in the school's curriculum age appropriate:
(1) research and evidence based; or
(2) research or evidence based;
instruction on child abuse and child sexual abuse to students in
kindergarten through grade 12.
(b) The department, in consultation with school safety specialists,
school counselors, school social workers, or school psychologists, shall
identify outlines or materials for the instruction described in subsection
(a). and incorporate the instruction in kindergarten through grade 12.
(c) Any outlines and materials identified under subsection (b) must
be demonstrated to be effective and promising.
(d) Instruction on child abuse and child sexual abuse may be
delivered by a teacher, school safety specialist, school counselor, or any
other person with training and expertise in the area of child abuse and
child sexual abuse.
SECTION 113. IC 20-30-5-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) For kindergarten through grade 12, The
governing body of each school corporation shall provide at least two
(2) times in kindergarten through grade 8 and one (1) time in
grades 9 through 12 instruction concerning the effects that:
(1) alcoholic beverages;
(2) tobacco, including tobacco alternatives and nicotine
products;
(3) prescription drugs; and
(4) controlled substances;
have on the human body and society at large.
(b) The state board shall make available to all school corporations
a list of appropriate available instructional material on the matters
described in subsection (a).
(c) The department shall develop curriculum guides to assist
teachers assigned to teach the material described in subsection (a).
(d) The state board shall approve drug education curricula for every
grade from kindergarten through grade 12. instruction required under
subsection (a).
(e) The department shall provide assistance to each school
HEA 1004 — Concur

143
corporation to train at least one (1) teacher in the school corporation in
drug education.
SECTION 114. IC 20-30-5-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 180, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) Each school corporation
shall:
(1) include in the school corporation's curriculum instruction
concerning the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV); and
(2) integrate this effort to the extent possible with instruction on
other serious communicable diseases.
(b) Literature that is distributed to school children and young adults
under this section must include information required by IC 20-34-3-17.
(c) The department shall do the following:
(1) In consultation with the Indiana department of health, shall
develop HIV educational materials.
(2) The department shall Make the materials developed under this
section described in subdivision (1) available to school
corporations.
SECTION 115. IC 20-30-5-23, AS AMENDED BY P.L.150-2024,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. (a) Each public high school, including each
charter school, shall offer at least one (1) computer science course as
a one (1) semester elective in the public high school's curriculum at
least once each school year for high school students. This subsection
expires July 1, 2028.
(b) After June 30, 2028, each public high school, including each
charter school, shall offer at least once each school year at least one (1)
computer science course as a separate subject in the public high
school's curriculum that:
(1) satisfies the computer science instruction content
requirements; and
(2) beginning in 2029, enables high school students to
successfully complete instruction on computer science to be
eligible to graduate from high school under the requirements;
set forth in IC 20-32-4-18.
(c) Each public school, including each charter school, shall include
computer science in the public school's curriculum for students in
kindergarten through grade 12. Before July 1, 2028, a public high
school fulfills the requirements under this subsection by meeting the
requirements under subsection (a). After June 30, 2028, a public high
school fulfills the requirements under this subsection by meeting the
requirements under subsection (b).
HEA 1004 — Concur

144
(d) If a public school fails to comply with this section, the
department shall assist the public school in meeting the requirements
under this section.
(e) The department shall:
(1) prepare an annual report concerning the implementation of
computer science courses in public schools, including charter
schools, that includes the information described in subsection (f);
and
(2) submit, before December 1 of each year, the report to the
following:
(A) The state board.
(B) The general assembly.
(C) The commission for higher education.
The department shall submit the written report to the general assembly
in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(f) The report under subsection (e) must include the following
information:
(1) The total number and percentage of computer science unique
student course enrollments and course completions for each:
(A) public elementary school, including each charter school,
for students in grade 8; and
(B) public high school, including each charter school;
by each course title approved by the department.
(2) The number and percentage of unique student enrollments and
course completions in a computer science course by each course
title approved by the department and disaggregated by:
(A) race;
(B) gender;
(C) grade;
(D) ethnicity;
(E) limited English language proficiency;
(F) free or reduced price lunch status; and
(G) eligibility for special education.
(3) The number of computer science instructors at each school
disaggregated by:
(A) gender;
(B) certification, if applicable; and
(C) academic degree.
(4) The number of public schools, including charter schools,
that offer courses in digital literacy.
(4) (5) Any other pertinent matters.
(g) The department shall post the report described in subsections (e)
HEA 1004 — Concur

145
and (f) on the department's website.
SECTION 116. IC 20-30-5-25 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 25. (a) This section applies to a high school that is:
(1) a public school, including a charter school;
(2) a state accredited nonpublic school; or
(3) an eligible school (as defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7).
(b) Each high school shall do one (1) of the following:
(1) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, offer the Indiana
college core developed under IC 21-42-3 in the high school's
curriculum for high school students.
(2) Not later than October 1, 2024, submit an implementation
plan to the commission for higher education, in a manner
prescribed by the commission for higher education, to offer the
Indiana college core developed under IC 21-42-3 in the high
school's curriculum for high school students by the 2025-2026
school year.
(3) Not later than October 1, 2024, submit a detailed
implementation plan to the commission for higher education, in
a manner prescribed by the commission for higher education, to
offer the Indiana college core developed under IC 21-42-3 in the
high school's curriculum for high school students by the
2026-2027 school year.
(4) Not later than October 1, 2024, submit an Indiana college core
feasibility report to the commission for higher education in
accordance with IC 21-42-3-6 if the high school does not plan to
offer the Indiana college core by the 2026-2027 school year.
(c) This section expires July 1, 2026.
SECTION 117. IC 20-30-6.1-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.150-2024,
SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) As used in this section, "online challenge"
means an Internet trend that encourages individuals to copy behaviors
or actions that may cause harm to the individual.
(b) Each school corporation may:
(1) include instruction regarding Internet safety in the school
corporation's curriculum; and
(2) offer instruction or programs regarding the potential risks
and consequences of creating and sharing sexually suggestive
or explicit materials through cellular telephones, social
networking websites, computer networks, and other digital
media.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2025, the department shall approve
previously developed curricula for use by school corporations under
HEA 1004 — Concur

146
subsection (b).
(d) Each curriculum approved under subsection (c) must include age
appropriate instruction regarding the following:
(1) Thinking critically about the possible provenance, reliability,
and intended effect of online information before acting on the
information.
(2) Acting ethically in the student's interactions with others
online, and reacting appropriately to unethical behavior such as:
(A) cyberbullying (as described in IC 20-19-3-11.5); and
(B) promotion of dangerous behavior, including self-harm or
participation in an online challenge;
that is directed at the student by others online.
(3) Considering the uncertainties inherent in interacting with
others online, particularly with regard to the ability of an
individual to misrepresent the individual's identity online.
(4) Recognizing the economics of providing Internet content and
social media services, including:
(A) the economic relationship between:
(i) users; and
(ii) providers;
of Internet content and social media services;
(B) the economic incentives of a provider to influence the
behavior of a user when the user is interacting with the
provider's content or services; and
(C) methods used by providers to influence user behavior.
(5) Practicing cybersecurity, including recognizing:
(A) the danger of:
(i) identity theft; and
(ii) financial fraud;
when interacting with others online, accessing Internet
content, or using social media services; and
(B) the potential for information shared online to remain
accessible to others in perpetuity.
SECTION 118. IC 20-30-8-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.286-2013,
SECTION 96, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The program organizer may request the
approval from the department for the following:
(1) To receive the grant for alternative education programs under
IC 20-20-33. IC 20-20.5-9.
(2) To be granted waivers from rules adopted by the state board
that may otherwise interfere with the objectives of the alternative
education program, including waivers of:
HEA 1004 — Concur

147
(A) certain high school graduation requirements;
(B) the length of the student instructional day as set forth in
IC 20-30-2-2;
(C) required curriculum and curricular materials;
(D) teacher certification requirements; and
(E) physical facility requirements.
SECTION 119. IC 20-30-8-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2006,
SECTION 145, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Before a program organizer
is eligible for the funding under IC 20-20-33, IC 20-20.5-9, a program
organizer must have the grant for the program approved by both:
(1) the department; and
(2) the budget agency after review by the budget committee.
(b) A school corporation may initiate the program and waiver
approval process under section 7 of this chapter and the grant approval
process under this section by submitting an application for the
proposed alternative education program, on forms developed by the
department, to the department. The application must include the
following information:
(1) The number of eligible students expected to participate in the
alternative education program.
(2) A description of the proposed alternative education program,
including a description of the nature of the alternative education
program curriculum.
(3) The extent to which the manner of instruction at the
alternative education program differs from the manner of
instruction available in the traditional school setting.
(4) A description of specific progressive disciplinary procedures
that:
(A) are reasonably designed to modify disruptive behavior in
the traditional school learning environment without
necessitating admission to an alternative education program;
and
(B) will be used before admitting a disruptive student to an
alternative education program.
(5) Any other pertinent information required by the department.
(c) The term of a grant may not exceed one (1) school year. If a
school corporation fails to conduct an alternative education program in
conformity with:
(1) this chapter;
(2) the rules adopted by the state board; or
(3) the terms of the approved grant;
HEA 1004 — Concur

148
the department or the budget agency, after review by the budget
committee, may terminate funding for the alternative education
program before the grant expires.
SECTION 120. IC 20-31-8-5.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 395, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) Not later than July 1, 2024,
the state board shall do the following:
(1) Establish a compilation of longitudinal data indicating school
performance success in various selected and enumerated program
areas.
(2) Present the data described in subdivision (1) for each school
in a manner that:
(A) can be conveniently and easily accessed from a single web
page on the state board's website; and
(B) is commonly known as an Internet dashboard.
(b) The dashboard must include the following:
(1) Indicators of student performance in elementary school,
including schools for grades 6 through 8, and high school.
(2) The school's graduation rate, as applicable.
(3) The percentage of high school graduates who earned college
credit before graduating, as applicable.
(4) The pass rate of the statewide assessment program tests (as
defined in IC 20-32-2-2.3), as applicable.
(5) The growth data of the statewide assessment program tests (as
defined in IC 20-32-2-2.3), as applicable.
(6) The attendance rate.
(7) State, national, and international comparisons for the
indicators, if applicable.
(8) The school's grade 3 reading proficiency rate, as applicable.
(9) The school's disciplinary incident data.
(10) Data regarding the school's socioeconomic status and poverty
rate.
(11) The school's proportion of fully licensed teachers.
(c) The dashboard may include any other data indicating school
performance success that the state board determines is relevant.
(d) Each school shall post conspicuously on a web page maintained
on the school's website the exact same data and in a similar format as
the data presented for the school on the state board's website. However,
the school may include custom indicators on the web page described
in this subsection. the link to the school's web page on the Internet
dashboard.
SECTION 121. IC 20-31-8-8, AS AMENDED BY THE
HEA 1004 — Concur

149
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Before July 1, 2018, the state board shall
establish a definition of a high mobility school for schools with a high
concentration of mobile students.
(b) For each school year, beginning after June 30, 2018, the
department shall make a report regarding the performance of high
mobility schools, as defined by the state board. The report shall be
posted on the department's Internet web site website each year on a
date determined by the department.
SECTION 122. IC 20-31-12-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.286-2013,
SECTION 107, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The department may not
establish criteria for a state accredited nonpublic school or eligible
school (as defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7) to be eligible for a recognition
program that are different from the criteria established for a public
school of the same grade levels.
SECTION 123. IC 20-32-5.1-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.150-2024,
SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The governing body of each school
corporation or the equivalent authority for each charter school, eligible
school (as defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7), or state accredited nonpublic
school is entitled to acquire at no charge from the department:
(1) the assessments under the statewide assessment program; and
(2) the scoring reports used by the department.
(b) A state accredited nonpublic school or an eligible school (as
defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7) shall
(1) administer the statewide assessment program's assessment or
assessments, as applicable, to its students at the same time or
times that school corporations administer the program's
assessment or assessments, as applicable, under section 7 of this
chapter; and
(2) make available to the department the results of the statewide
assessment program's assessment or assessments, as applicable.
SECTION 124. IC 20-32-7-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 3. The department shall make available to schools
optional student diagnostic tools such as actual assessment instruments
or computer banks containing appropriate essential skills items to assist
schools in implementing the diagnostic assessments.
SECTION 125. IC 20-32-7-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 4. After a governing body holds a public hearing on a
proposed portfolio program, the governing body may establish a
HEA 1004 — Concur

150
portfolio program to maintain a portfolio of a student's work at grade
levels designated by the governing body.
SECTION 126. IC 20-32-7-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 5. The governing body shall develop guidelines for the
portfolio program, including guidelines governing the appropriate
contents of the portfolios.
SECTION 127. IC 20-33-2-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 1. The legislative intent for this chapter is to provide an
efficient and speedy means of insuring that students receive a proper
education whenever it is reasonably possible.
SECTION 128. IC 20-33-2-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.208-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) This section and sections 15 through 17.8
of this chapter apply to a student who attends either a public school or
a nonpublic school.
(b) (a) The governing body of each school corporation shall adopt
a policy:
(1) outlining the conditions for excused and unexcused absences;
and
(2) providing for the categorization of excused absences in
accordance with the categorization framework established by the
department under IC 20-19-3-12.4.
(c) (b) The governing body of each school corporation shall have a
policy regarding the participation of a habitually truant in
extracurricular and co-curricular activities.
(d) (c) The policy under subsection (b) (a) must include the grounds
for excused absences required by sections section 15 through 17.8 of
this chapter or another law.
(e) (d) Any absence that results in a person not attending at least one
hundred eighty (180) days in a school year must be in accordance with
the governing body's policy under subsection (b) (a) to qualify as an
excused absence.
(f) Service as a page for or as an honoree of the general assembly is
a lawful excuse for a student to be absent from school, when verified
by a certificate of the secretary of the senate or the chief clerk of the
house of representatives. A student excused from school attendance
under this section may not be recorded as being absent on any date for
which the excuse is operative and may not be penalized by the school
in any manner.
SECTION 129. IC 20-33-2-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The governing body of a Each school
HEA 1004 — Concur

151
corporation, charter school, and the chief administrative official of a
accredited nonpublic secondary school system shall authorize the
absence and excuse of each secondary school student who serves:
(1) on the precinct election board; or
(2) as a helper to a political candidate or to a political party on the
date of each general, city or town, special, and primary election
at which the student works.
(b) Before the date of the election, the student must submit a
document signed by one (1) of the student's parents giving permission
to participate in the election as provided in this section, and the student
must verify to school authorities the performance of services by
submitting a document signed by the candidate, political party
chairman, campaign manager, or precinct officer generally describing
the duties of the student on the date of the election. A student excused
from school attendance under this section may not be recorded as being
absent on any date for which the excuse is operative and may not be
penalized by the school in any manner. is absent for any of the
following:
(1) The student serves as a page for or as an honoree of the
general assembly.
(2) The student serves on the precinct election board.
(3) The student works as a helper to a political candidate or to
a political party on the date of each general, city or town,
special, and primary election at which the student works.
(4) The student appears in court in response to a subpoena to
appear in court as a witness in a judicial proceeding.
(5) The student is:
(A) not a habitual truant; and
(B) ordered to active duty with the armed forces of the
United States, including their reserve components, or the
Indiana National Guard for not more than fifteen (15)
instructional days in a school year.
However, the school corporation, charter school, or
accredited nonpublic school may authorize additional excused
absences for a student ordered to active duty.
(6) The student is:
(A) a member of the Indiana wing of the civil air patrol;
and
(B) participating in a civil air patrol:
(i) international air cadet exchange program for the
length of the program; or
(ii) emergency service operation for not more than five
HEA 1004 — Concur

152
(5) instructional days in a school year.
(7) The student participates or exhibits in the Indiana state
fair for educational purposes. However, the number of
excused absences a student may receive under this subdivision
may not exceed five (5) instructional days in a school year.
(8) The student participates in a scheduled competition,
exhibition, or event offered by:
(A) the National FFA Organization;
(B) the Indiana FFA Association; or
(C) a 4-H club.
However, the number of excused absences a student may
receive under this subdivision may not exceed a total of six (6)
instructional days in a school year.
(b) If a school corporation, charter school, or accredited
nonpublic school authorizes the absence and excuse of a student for
a nonclassroom related activity that is organized or facilitated by
the school, the school shall send, at least one (1) full school day
before the nonclassroom related activity occurs, a parent of the
student a written notification regarding the nonclassroom related
activity that includes:
(1) a description of the activity; and
(2) the anticipated date and time that the activity is scheduled
to occur.
(c) For a student to receive an excused absence under subsection
(a)(6) through (a)(8), the student must be in good academic
standing, as determined by the school corporation, charter school,
or accredited nonpublic school.
(d) A student excused from school attendance under subsection
(a) may not be recorded as being absent on any date for which the
excuse is operative and may not be penalized by the school in any
manner.
(e) The appropriate school authority shall request relevant
documentation verifying a student's participation in an activity
listed in subsection (a).
SECTION 130. IC 20-33-2-16 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 16. The governing body of a school corporation or the
chief administrative officer of a nonpublic school system shall
authorize the absence and excuse of a student who is issued a subpoena
to appear in court as a witness in a judicial proceeding. A student
excused under this section shall not be recorded as being absent on any
date for which the excuse is operative and shall not be penalized by the
school in any manner. The appropriate school authority may require
HEA 1004 — Concur

153
that the student submit the subpoena to the appropriate school authority
for verification.
SECTION 131. IC 20-33-2-17 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 17. The governing body of a school corporation, the
organizer of a charter school, or the chief administrative officer of a
nonpublic school system shall authorize the absence and excuse of each
secondary school student who is:
(1) not a habitual truant (as defined in IC 20-18-2-6.5); and
(2) ordered to active duty with the armed forces of the United
States, including their reserve components, or the Indiana
National Guard for at least fifteen (15) days in a school year.
However, the governing body of a school corporation, the organizer of
a charter school, or the chief administrative officer of a nonpublic
school system may authorize additional excused absences for
additional military training. For verification, the student must submit
to school authorities a copy of the orders to active duty and a copy of
the orders releasing the student from active duty. A student excused
from school attendance under this section may not be recorded as being
absent on any date for which the excuse is operative and may not be
penalized by the school in any manner.
SECTION 132. IC 20-33-2-17.2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 17.2. The governing body of a school corporation
or the chief administrative officer of a nonpublic school system shall
authorize the absence and excuse of each secondary school student who
is a member of the Indiana wing of the civil air patrol and who is
participating in a civil air patrol:
(1) international air cadet exchange program, for the length of the
program; or
(2) emergency service operation, including:
(A) search and rescue missions designated by the Air Force
Rescue Coordination Center;
(B) disaster relief, when requested by the Federal Emergency
Management Agency or the department of homeland security
established by IC 10-19-2-1;
(C) humanitarian services, when requested by the Federal
Emergency Management Agency or the department of
homeland security established by IC 10-19-2-1;
(D) United States Air Force support designated by the First Air
Force, North American Aerospace Defense Command; or
(E) United States Air Force military flights, if the flights are
not available on days when school is not in session;
for not more than five (5) days in a school year;
HEA 1004 — Concur

154
if the student submits to school authorities appropriate documentation
from the Indiana wing of the civil air patrol detailing the reason for the
student's absence. A student excused from school attendance under this
section may not be recorded as being absent on any date to which the
excuse applies and may not be penalized by the school in any manner.
SECTION 133. IC 20-33-2-17.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 17.5. (a) The governing body of a school
corporation may authorize the absence and excuse of a student who
attends any educationally related nonclassroom activity. Any
educationally related nonclassroom activity and nonclassroom activity
must meet all the following conditions:
(1) Is consistent with and promotes the educational philosophy
and goals of the school corporation and the state board.
(2) Facilitates the attainment of specific educational objectives.
(3) Is a part of the goals and objectives of an approved course or
curriculum.
(4) Represents a unique educational opportunity.
(5) Cannot reasonably occur without interrupting the school day.
(6) Is approved in writing by the school principal.
(b) A student excused from school attendance under this section
may not be recorded as being absent on any date for which the excuse
is operative and may not be penalized by the school in any manner.
SECTION 134. IC 20-33-2-17.7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 17.7. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the
governing body of a school corporation or the chief administrative
officer of a nonpublic school system shall authorize the absence and
excuse of each school student if the student or a member of the
student's household participates or exhibits in the Indiana state fair for
educational purposes, as evidenced in writing by the student's parent
and as approved in writing by the student's school principal. The
number of excused absences a student may receive under this section
may not exceed five (5) instructional days in a school year. A student
excused from school attendance under this section may not be recorded
as being absent on any date for which the excuse is operative and may
not be penalized by the school in any manner.
(b) In order for a student to receive an excused absence under
subsection (a), the student must be in good academic standing, as
determined by the school corporation.
SECTION 135. IC 20-33-2-17.8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 17.8. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and
(c), the governing body of a school corporation or the chief
administrative officer of a nonpublic school system shall authorize the
HEA 1004 — Concur

155
absence and excuse of each school student if the student participates in
a scheduled competition, exhibition, or event offered by:
(1) the National FFA Organization;
(2) the Indiana FFA Association; or
(3) a 4-H club;
for educational purposes as evidenced in writing by the student's parent
and as approved in writing by the student's school principal. A student
excused from school attendance under this section may not be recorded
as being absent on any date for which the excuse is operative and may
not be penalized by the school in any manner.
(b) The number of excused absences a student may receive under
subsection (a) may not exceed six (6) instructional days in a school
year.
(c) In order for a student to receive an excused absence under
subsection (a), the student must be in good academic standing, as
determined by the school corporation or nonpublic school.
SECTION 136. IC 20-33-8-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.233-2015,
SECTION 261, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) As used in this section,
"firearm" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-47-1-5.
(b) As used in this section, "deadly weapon" has the meaning set
forth in IC 35-31.5-2-86. The term does not include a firearm or
destructive device.
(c) As used in this section, "destructive device" has the meaning set
forth in IC 35-47.5-2-4.
(d) Notwithstanding section 20 of this chapter, a student who is:
(1) identified as bringing a firearm or destructive device to school
or on school property; or
(2) in possession of a firearm or destructive device on school
property;
must be expelled for at least one (1) calendar year, with the return of
the student to be at the beginning of the first school semester after the
end of the one (1) year period.
(e) The superintendent or principal of the applicable school may,
on a case by case basis, modify the period of expulsion under
subsection (d) for a student who is expelled under this section.
(f) Notwithstanding section 20 of this chapter, a student who is:
(1) identified as bringing a deadly weapon to school or on school
property; or
(2) in possession of a deadly weapon on school property;
may be expelled for not more than one (1) calendar year.
(g) A superintendent or the superintendent's designee shall
HEA 1004 — Concur

156
immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency having
jurisdiction over the property where the school is located if a student
engages in a behavior described in subsection (d). The superintendent
may give similar notice if the student engages in a behavior described
in subsection (f). Upon receiving notification under this subsection, the
law enforcement agency shall begin an investigation and take
appropriate action.
(h) A student with a disability (as defined in IC 20-35-1-8) who
possesses a firearm on school property is subject to procedural
safeguards under 20 U.S.C. 1415.
SECTION 137. IC 20-33-8-17 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 17. A student may be expelled from school if the
student's legal settlement is not in the attendance area of the school
corporation where the student is enrolled.
SECTION 138. IC 20-33-8-23, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. The superintendent or the person designated
by the superintendent under section 19(a) of this chapter may continue
suspension of a student for more than the ten (10) school day period of
the principal's suspension and until the time of the expulsion decision
under section 19 of this chapter if the superintendent or the designated
person determines that the student's continued suspension will prevent
or substantially reduce the risk of:
(1) interference with an educational function or school purposes;
or
(2) a physical injury to the student, other students, school
employees, or visitors to the school.
However, a student may not be suspended from school pending a
meeting on a student's proposed expulsion if the expulsion is ordered
under section 17 of this chapter.
SECTION 139. IC 20-33-8-30, AS AMENDED BY P.L.233-2015,
SECTION 263, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 30. (a) This section applies to the
following:
(1) A student who:
(A) is expelled from a school corporation or charter school
under this chapter; or
(B) withdraws from a school corporation or charter school to
avoid expulsion.
(2) A student who:
(A) is required to separate for disciplinary reasons from a
nonpublic school or a school in a state other than Indiana by
HEA 1004 — Concur

157
the administrative authority of the school; or
(B) withdraws from a nonpublic school or a school in a state
other than Indiana in order to avoid being required to separate
from the school for disciplinary reasons by the administrative
authority of the school.
(b) The student referred to in subsection (a) may enroll in another
school corporation or charter school during the period of the actual or
proposed expulsion or separation if:
(1) the student's parent informs the school corporation in which
the student seeks to enroll and also:
(A) in the case of a student withdrawing from a charter school
that is not a conversion charter school to avoid expulsion, the
conversion charter school; or
(B) in the case of a student withdrawing from a conversion
charter school to avoid expulsion:
(i) the conversion charter school; and
(ii) the school corporation that sponsored the conversion
charter school;
of the student's expulsion, separation, or withdrawal to avoid
expulsion or separation;
(2) the school corporation (and, in the case of a student
withdrawal described in subdivision (1)(A) or (1)(B), the charter
school) consents to the student's enrollment; and
(3) the student agrees to the terms and conditions of enrollment
established by the school corporation (or, in the case of a student
withdrawal described in subdivision (1)(A) or (1)(B), the charter
school or conversion charter school).
(c) If:
(1) a student's parent fails to inform the school corporation of the
expulsion or separation or withdrawal to avoid expulsion or
separation; or
(2) a student fails to follow the terms and conditions of enrollment
under subsection (b)(3);
the school corporation or charter school may withdraw consent and
prohibit the student's enrollment during the period of the actual or
proposed expulsion or separation.
(d) This section does not apply to a student who is expelled under
section 17 of this chapter.
SECTION 140. IC 20-34-8-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.232-2025,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) This section applies to:
(1) a head coach or assistant coach who coaches an athletic
HEA 1004 — Concur

158
activity;
(2) a marching band leader;
(3) a drama or musical leader; or
(4) a leader of an extracurricular activity in which students have
an increased risk of sudden cardiac arrest activity as determined
by the department in consultation with an organization that
specializes in the prevention of sudden cardiac arrest.
(b) An individual described in subsection (a) shall complete the
sudden cardiac arrest training course offered by a provider approved by
the department in a manner specified by the state board under
IC 20-28-5.5-1 or IC 20-28-5.5-1.5.
(c) An individual described in subsection (a) who complies with this
section and provides coaching or leadership services in good faith is
not personally liable for damages in a civil action as a result of a
sudden cardiac arrest incurred by an applicable student participating in
an event in which students have an increased risk of sudden cardiac
arrest for which the head coach, assistant coach, marching band leader,
drama or musical leader, or other applicable leader provided coaching
or leadership services, except for an act or omission by the individual
described in subsection (a) that constitutes gross negligence or willful
or wanton misconduct.
(d) An individual described in subsection (a) shall ensure that an
operational automated external defibrillator (AED) is present:
(1) at each event events in which students have an increased risk
of sudden cardiac arrest for which the individual described in
subsection (a) is providing coaching or leadership; and
(2) as specified in the venue specific emergency action plan for
sudden cardiac arrest developed by a school corporation,
charter school, or state accredited nonpublic school under
subsection (f).
(e) At each event in which students have an increased risk of sudden
cardiac arrest, an individual described in subsection (a) shall inform all
individuals who are coaching or providing leadership at the event in
which students have an increased risk of sudden cardiac arrest of the
location of the automated external defibrillator (AED).
(f) A school corporation, charter school, and state accredited
nonpublic school shall do the following:
(1) Develop a venue specific emergency action plan for sudden
cardiac arrest that includes:
(A) elements recommended by the American Heart
Association, Heart Safe Schools Program, or another similar
nationally recognized evidence based program; and
HEA 1004 — Concur

159
(B) the number and location of automated external
defibrillators (AED) that are required to be present at
events in which students have an increased risk of sudden
cardiac arrest.
(2) Share the plan described in subdivision (1) with each
individual described in subsection (a).
(3) Before the beginning of the season of each event in which
students have an increased risk of sudden cardiac arrest, share the
plan described in subdivision (1) with all applicable students.
(g) A school corporation, a charter school, a state accredited
nonpublic school or an accredited nonpublic school (as defined in
IC 10-21-1-1) may apply for a grant under IC 10-21-1-2(a)(1)(C)(viii)
to purchase an automated external defibrillator (AED) if the school
corporation, charter school, state accredited nonpublic school or
accredited nonpublic school develops a venue specific emergency
action plan for sudden cardiac arrest.
SECTION 141. IC 20-34-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Student and Parent Support Services Grant Program).
SECTION 142. IC 20-35-5-17, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) A teacher who:
(1) has not retained a status as a semipermanent, permanent, or
nonpermanent teacher with a participating school corporation;
and
(2) loses the teacher's job in a special education cooperative
because of a reduction in services or discontinuance of the
cooperative;
shall be considered for any job opening for which the teacher is
qualified that occurs in any of the participating school corporations in
the school year immediately following the reduction in services or
discontinuance of the cooperative.
(b) A teacher employed under this section has the same rights and
privileges as teachers employed under IC 20-26-10-5 and
IC 20-26-10-6.
SECTION 143. IC 20-38-2-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 6. On or before July 1, 2027, and July 1 biennially
thereafter, the education commission of the states shall submit a report
to the executive director of the legislative services agency, in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6, for review by the interim committee
on government in accordance with IC 1-1-15.5-4 and IC 2-5-1.3-13(g).
The report shall describe:
(1) official action taken; and
HEA 1004 — Concur

160
(2) actionable items considered;
by the education commission of the states during the preceding two (2)
years.
SECTION 144. IC 20-40-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Funds Established Outside IC 20-40).
SECTION 145. IC 20-40-18-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 198, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) This section sets forth an
exclusive list of the expenditures that may be made from the operations
fund under section 5(1) of this chapter, as set forth in the school
corporation's plan or amended plan.
(b) Subject to the expenditures that are identified in the school
corporation's plan or amended plan, the operations fund shall be used
for the following:
(1) Site acquisition.
(2) Site development.
(3) Building acquisition, construction, replacement, renovation,
remodeling, improvement, and maintenance, including building
materials and employment services described in subsection (c).
(4) Rental of real estate, buildings, facilities, and equipment.
However, the fund may not be used for payments authorized
under IC 20-47-2 and IC 20-47-3.
(5) To repair and replace buildings and to repair and replace
building fixtures that are:
(A) owned or leased by the school corporation; and
(B) of a type constituting loss capable of being covered by
casualty insurance.
(6) Purchase, lease, repair, or maintenance of equipment,
including maintenance vehicles to be used by the school
corporation. However, the fund may not be used to pay for the
following:
(A) The purchase, lease, repair, or maintenance of vehicles
that are not maintenance vehicles.
(B) Except as provided in subdivision (7), equipment to be
used primarily for interscholastic or extracurricular activities.
(7) Service contracts for janitorial and custodial services,
maintenance services, snow and ice removal services, trash
removal services, mowing and lawn care services, pest control
services, and any other routine services normally required in the
maintenance or upkeep of school facilities.
(8) Repair, replacement, or site acquisition that is necessitated by
an emergency.
HEA 1004 — Concur

161
(9) Construction, repair, replacement, remodeling, or maintenance
of a school sports facility. However, the maximum expenditures
under this subdivision in a calendar year may not exceed two and
seven-tenths percent (2.7%) of the property tax revenues levied
for the fund in the calendar year.
(10) Utilities.
(11) Property and casualty insurance.
(12) Purchase, lease, upgrade, maintain, or repair technology that
will not be allocated to student instruction and learning under
IC 20-42.5, including the following:
(A) Computer hardware, computer software, wiring and
computer networks, and communication access systems used
to connect with computer networks or electronic gateways.
(B) Services of full-time or part-time computer maintenance
employees.
(C) Conducting nonrecurring inservice technology training of
school employees.
(D) Implementing the technology preparation curriculum.
(E) Participating in a program to provide educational
technologies, including
(i) computers in the homes of students (commonly referred
to as "the buddy system project") under IC 20-20-13-6;
(ii) the 4R's technology program; or
(iii) any other program under the educational technology
program described in IC 20-20-13. IC 20-20.5-6.
(F) Obtaining any combination of equipment or services
described in clauses (D) and (E).
(13) To pay advances, together with interest on the advances,
from the common school fund for educational technology
programs under IC 20-49-4.
(14) To pay for energy saving contracts entered into by a school
corporation under IC 36-1-12.5.
(15) To maintain a joint school established with a school
corporation in an adjacent state under IC 20-23-11 as is otherwise
provided by law for maintaining the public schools in Indiana.
(16) To pay a judgment rendered against the school corporation,
or rendered against an officer or employee of the school
corporation for which the school corporation is liable under
IC 34-13-2, IC 34-13-3, or IC 34-13-4 (or IC 34-4-16.5,
IC 34-4-16.6, or IC 34-4-16.7 before their repeal).
(17) To pay a claim or settlement for which the school corporation
is liable under IC 34-13-2, IC 34-13-3, or IC 34-13-4 (or
HEA 1004 — Concur

162
IC 34-4-16.5, IC 34-4-16.6, or IC 34-4-16.7 before their repeal).
(18) To pay a premium, management fee, claim, or settlement for
which the school corporation is liable under a federal or state
statute, including IC 22-3 and IC 22-4.
(19) To pay a settlement or claim for which insurance coverage
is permitted under IC 20-26-5-4(a)(15).
(20) All other lawful expenses that are not expenses described in
IC 20-40-2-4.
(21) To pay for expenses incurred as a result of unusual
circumstances.
(c) The fund shall be used to pay for services of school corporation
employees who perform services considered to be a skilled trade by the
United States Department of Labor, Employment and Training
Administration. For purposes of this subsection, skilled trade services
do not include janitorial or comparable routine services normally
provided in the daily operation of school facilities or equipment.
Payment may be made for employee services only if the employees
perform:
(1) construction of;
(2) renovation of;
(3) remodeling of;
(4) repair of; or
(5) maintenance on;
the facilities and equipment of the school corporation.
SECTION 146. IC 20-40-18-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.162-2024,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A school corporation shall use the
operations fund to pay the transportation costs attributable to
transportation of school children as specified in subsection (b).
(b) Only the following costs are payable from the fund:
(1) Salaries paid to bus drivers, transportation supervisors,
mechanics and garage employees, clerks, and other transportation
related employees.
(2) Contracted transportation services.
(3) Wages of independent contractors.
(4) Contracts with common carriers.
(5) Student fares.
(6) Transportation related insurance.
(7) Transportation of school children to:
(A) an apprenticeship program (as defined in IC 20-43-8-0.3);
(B) a career and technical education (as defined in
IC 20-20-38-1) IC 20-20.5-10-1) program;
HEA 1004 — Concur

163
(C) a modern youth apprenticeship (as defined in
IC 20-51.4-2-9.5); and
(D) a work based learning course (as defined in
IC 20-43-8-0.7).
(8) Other expenses of operating the school corporation's
transportation service, including gasoline, lubricants, tires,
repairs, contracted repairs, parts, supplies, equipment, and other
related expenses.
(c) Percentages or parts of salaries of teaching personnel or
principals are not attributable to transportation. However, parts of
salaries of instructional aides who are assigned to assist with the school
transportation program are attributable to transportation. The costs
described in this subsection (other than instructional aide costs) may
not be budgeted for payment or paid from the fund.
(d) Costs for a calendar year are those costs attributable to
transportation for students during the school year ending in the
calendar year.
SECTION 147. IC 20-40-18-10.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 214, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) This section applies only
to eligible charter schools that receive amounts distributed under
IC 20-46-8-11.2 or IC 20-46-8-12.
(b) For purposes of this section, "charter board" means the
governing body of the organizer (as defined in IC 20-24-1-7) of an
eligible charter school.
(c) The operations fund may be used only to do the following:
(1) Carry out a capital projects plan under the following
conditions:
(A) The plan must include all proposed expenditures that
exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and are for:
(i) capital assets; or
(ii) projects that are considered capital in nature, including
technology related projects.
(B) If a charter school wants to use money in the operations
fund during the year to pay for any items listed in clause (E)
that are considered capital in nature, the charter board must
approve a plan following a public hearing. The charter school
shall post the proposed plan or proposed amended plan on the
charter school's website before the hearing. The charter school
shall submit the proposed capital projects plan to the
department of local government finance's computer gateway
at least ten (10) days before the public hearing. The
HEA 1004 — Concur

164
department of local government finance shall make the
proposed plan available at least ten (10) days before the
hearing, through the department's computer gateway. If an
amendment to a capital projects plan is proposed, the charter
board must declare the nature of and need for the amendment
in the plan amendment.
(C) If a charter board adopts a plan under clause (B), the
charter school must then submit the plan to the department of
local government finance for inclusion on the department's
computer gateway not later than thirty (30) days after adoption
of the plan. The department of local government finance shall
immediately make the proposed plan available through the
gateway website.
(D) This clause applies to an amendment to a plan that is
required because of an emergency that results in costs that
exceed the amount accumulated in the fund for repair,
replacement, or site acquisition that is necessitated by an
emergency. The charter board is not required to comply with
clause (C). If the charter board determines that an emergency
exists, the governing body may adopt an amendment to the
plan. An amendment to a plan is not subject to the deadline
and procedures for adoption of a plan described in this
subdivision.
(E) This clause sets forth an exclusive list of the expenditures
that may be made from the operations fund under clause (B),
as set forth in the charter board's plan or amended plan.
Subject to the expenditures that are identified in the charter
school's plan or amended plan, the operations fund shall be
used for the following:
(i) Site acquisition.
(ii) Site development.
(iii) Building acquisition, construction, replacement,
renovation, remodeling, improvement, and maintenance,
including building materials and employment services.
(iv) Rental of real estate, buildings, facilities, and
equipment.
(v) To repair and replace buildings and to repair and replace
building fixtures that are owned or leased by the charter
school and of a type constituting loss capable of being
covered by casualty insurance.
(vi) Purchase, lease, repair, or maintenance of equipment,
including maintenance vehicles to be used by the charter
HEA 1004 — Concur

165
school. However, the fund may not be used to pay for the
purchase, lease, repair, or maintenance of vehicles that are
not maintenance vehicles, or equipment to be used primarily
for interscholastic or extracurricular activities.
(vii) Service contracts for janitorial and custodial services,
maintenance services, snow and ice removal services, trash
removal services, mowing and lawn care services, pest
control services, and any other routine services normally
required in the maintenance or upkeep of charter school
facilities.
(viii) Repair, replacement, or site acquisition that is
necessitated by an emergency.
(ix) Construction, repair, replacement, remodeling, or
maintenance of a school sports facility.
(x) Utilities.
(xi) Property and casualty insurance.
(xii) Purchase, lease, upgrade, maintenance, or repair
technology that will not be allocated to student instruction
and learning, to include computer hardware, computer
software, wiring and computer networks, and
communication access systems used to connect with
computer networks or electronic gateways; services of
full-time or part-time computer maintenance employees;
conducting nonrecurring inservice technology training of
school employees; implementing the technology preparation
curriculum; participating in a program to provide
educational technologies, including computers in the homes
of students (commonly referred to as "the buddy system
project") under IC 20-20-13-6, the 4R's technology program,
or any other program under the educational technology
program described in IC 20-20-13; IC 20-20.5-6; and
obtaining any combination of equipment or services in the
preceding two (2) categories of this item.
(xiii) Services of charter school employees who perform
services considered to be a skilled trade by the United States
Department of Labor, Employment and Training
Administration. For purposes of this item, skilled trade
services do not include janitorial or comparable routine
services normally provided in the daily operation of school
facilities or equipment. Payment may be made for employee
services only if the employees perform construction of,
renovation of, remodeling of, repair of, or maintenance on
HEA 1004 — Concur

166
the facilities and equipment of the charter school.
(2) Pay transportation costs under the following conditions:
(A) A charter school shall use the operations fund to pay the
transportation costs attributable to transportation of school
children as specified in clause (B).
(B) Only the following costs are payable from the fund:
(i) Salaries paid to bus drivers, transportation supervisors,
mechanics and garage employees, clerks, and other
transportation related employees.
(ii) Contracted transportation services.
(iii) Wages of independent contractors.
(iv) Contracts with common carriers.
(v) Student fares.
(vi) Transportation related insurance.
(vii) Other expenses of operating the school corporation's
transportation service, including gasoline, lubricants, tires,
repairs, contracted repairs, parts, supplies, equipment, and
other related expenses.
(C) Percentages or parts of salaries of teaching personnel or
principals are not attributable to transportation. However, parts
of salaries of instructional aides who are assigned to assist
with the school transportation program are attributable to
transportation. The costs described in this clause (other than
instructional aide costs) may not be budgeted for payment or
paid from the fund.
(D) Costs for a calendar year are those costs attributable to
transportation for students during the school year ending in the
calendar year.
(3) Carry out a school bus replacement plan approved by the
charter school board under the following conditions:
(A) Before a charter school may use money in the operations
fund for replacing school buses, a resolution approving the
school bus replacement plan or amended plan must be
submitted to the department of local government finance.
(B) The department of local government finance shall
prescribe the format of the plan. A plan must apply to at least
the five (5) budget years immediately following the year the
plan is adopted and include at least an estimate for each year
to which it applies of the nature and amount of proposed
expenditures from the fund, and if the school corporation is
seeking to acquire or contract for transportation services that
will provide additional school buses or school buses with a
HEA 1004 — Concur

167
larger seating capacity as compared with the number and type
of school buses from the prior school year, evidence of a
demand for increased transportation services within the school
corporation. However, the evidence requirement regarding a
contract for transportation services does not apply if contracted
transportation services are not paid from the fund.
(C) If the charter school is seeking to require a contractor to
replace a school bus, evidence that the need exists for the
replacement of the school bus. This clause does not apply if
contracted transportation services are not paid from the
operations fund.
(D) Evidence that the charter school that seeks to acquire
additional school buses under this subdivision is acquiring or
contracting for the school buses only for the purposes
specified in clause (B) or for replacement purposes.
(E) If a charter school wants to use money in the operations
fund during the year to pay for school bus replacement, the
governing body must adopt a resolution approving the bus
replacement plan or amended plan. The charter school shall
post the proposed plan or proposed amended plan on the
charter school's website before the hearing. The governing
body must hold a hearing on the adoption of the plan. The
charter school shall submit the proposed school bus
replacement plan or amended plan to the department of local
government finance's computer gateway at least ten (10) days
before the hearing on the adoption of the plan. The department
of local government finance shall make the proposed plan
available to taxpayers, at least ten (10) days before the hearing,
through the department's computer gateway. If an amendment
to a bus replacement plan is being proposed, the charter school
must declare the nature of and the need for the amendment in
the resolution to adopt the amendment to the plan.
(4) Pay expenses that are allocated to overhead and operational
expenditures.
(5) Establish, maintain, and equip a public playground.
SECTION 148. IC 20-42.5-2-0.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.126-2017,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter, "applicable nonpublic
school" has the meaning set forth in IC 20-20-1-0.5. IC 20-20.5-1-1.
SECTION 149. IC 20-42.5-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.126-2017,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Educational service centers established
HEA 1004 — Concur

168
under IC 20-20-1 IC 20-20.5-1 shall support and facilitate actions by
school corporations and charter schools under this article, including by
the use of an educational service center's existing cooperative
agreements.
(b) School corporations, charter schools, and educational service
centers may use the division of finance of the department and the office
of management and budget to provide technical assistance under this
article.
(c) Not later than August 31 of each year, the educational service
centers shall report to the state board the results of the efforts of the
educational service centers under this article during the preceding
school year.
SECTION 150. IC 20-42.5-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.130-2018,
SECTION 90, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) For each school year using the 2005-2006
school year as a baseline:
(1) the office of management and budget shall analyze and report
to the state board, the governor, and the general assembly
concerning the progress or lack of progress of each school
corporation, of all school corporations in each educational service
center's area, and in Indiana as a whole in improving the ratio of
student instructional expenditures to all other expenditures for the
previous school year; and
(2) the state board shall recognize publicly each school
corporation and educational service center that has an improved
ratio of student instructional expenditures to all other
expenditures during the previous school year;
(3) the office of management and budget and the division of
finance of the department shall be available to consult with and
provide technical assistance to each school corporation that did
not have an improved ratio of student instructional expenditures
to all other expenditures during the previous school year; and
(4) (2) each school corporation shall submit a report or make
available to the department in a form and manner determined
by the department the following information to the public in the
school corporation's annual performance report and to the
members of the general assembly whose districts include the
school corporation:
(A) the percentage of resources spent by the school
corporation during the previous school year on each of the
following categories of expenditures:
(i) (A) Student academic achievement expenditures.
HEA 1004 — Concur

169
(ii) (B) Student instructional support expenditures.
(iii) (C) Overhead and operational expenditures.
(iv) (D) Nonoperational expenditures.
(B) The trend line for each category described in clause (A).
(C) Whether the school corporation did or did not make
progress in improving the ratio of student instructional
expenditures to all other expenditures during the previous
school year.
(b) The reports to the general assembly under subsection (a)(1) and
to individual members of the general assembly under subsection (a)(4)
must be submitted to the executive director of the legislative services
agency in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 151. IC 20-42.5-3-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.130-2018,
SECTION 91, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The chart of accounts used by school
corporations must:
(1) coincide with the categories of expenditures described in
section 5(a)(4)(A) 5(a)(2) of this chapter; and
(2) provide the ability to determine expenditures made at and for
each individual school building of a school corporation.
Each school corporation shall on January 1, 2019, begin using use the
chart of accounts developed under this section.
(b) The state board of accounts may, in consultation with the
department and the office of management and budget, modify the chart
of accounts as necessary to make the chart of accounts coincide with
the categories of expenditures described in section 5(a)(4)(A) 5(a)(2)
of this chapter.
SECTION 152. IC 20-42.5-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. (Emergency Measures to Maintain Instruction and Learning
Programs).
SECTION 153. IC 20-43-8-7.5, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) The department of workforce development
shall designate each career and technical education program as:
(1) an apprenticeship program;
(2) a cooperative education program;
(3) a work based learning program;
(4) a high value program;
(5) a moderate value program;
(6) a less than moderate value program;
(7) an introductory program; or
HEA 1004 — Concur

170
(8) a foundational career and technical education course.
The designation of career and technical education programs by the
department of workforce development under this section must be
reviewed and approved by the state board as provided in this section.
(b) Not later than December 1, 2019, and each December 1
thereafter, the department of workforce development shall designate
each career and technical education program as:
(1) an apprenticeship program;
(2) a work based learning program;
(3) a high value level 1 program;
(4) a high value level 2 program;
(5) a moderate value level 1 program;
(6) a moderate value level 2 program;
(7) a less than moderate value level 1 program;
(8) a less than moderate value level 2 program;
(9) a planning for college and career course; or
(10) an introductory program.
The designation of career and technical education programs by the
department of workforce development under this section must be
reviewed and approved by the state board as provided in this section.
(c) If a new career and technical education program is created by
rule, the department of workforce development shall determine the
category in which the program is designated under subsection (a) or
(b). A career and technical education program must be approved by the
department of workforce development in order for a school corporation
to be eligible to receive a grant amount for the career and technical
education program under section 15 of this chapter.
(d) Not later than December 1 of each year, the department of
workforce development shall provide a report to the state board that
includes the following information:
(1) A list of the career and technical education courses for the
next school year that are designated by the department of
workforce development under this section.
(2) The labor market demand used to designate each career and
technical education program under this section.
(3) The average wage level used to designate each career and
technical education program under this section.
(4) If applicable, the labor market demand and average wage level
data for specific regions, counties, and municipalities.
(5) Any other information pertinent to the methodology used by
the department of workforce development to designate each
career and technical education program under this section.
HEA 1004 — Concur

171
(e) Not later than January 1 of each year, the state board shall
review and approve the report provided by the department of workforce
development under subsection (d) at a public meeting to ensure that the
list of courses is in compliance with the long range state plan
developed under IC 20-20-38-4. IC 20-20.5-10-4. Not later than
January 1 of each year, the state board shall send its determination to
the department of workforce development. Upon receipt of the state
board's determination, the department of workforce development shall
provide the approved report to the department.
(f) The department of workforce development shall publish the
approved report under subsection (e) on the department of workforce
development's Internet web site, website, including the following:
(1) The list of career and technical education programs that are
designated by the department of workforce development under
this section.
(2) The labor market demand used to designate each career and
technical education program under this section.
(3) The average wage level used to designate each career and
technical education program under this section.
(4) If applicable, the labor market demand and average wage level
data for specific regions, counties, and municipalities.
(5) Any other information pertinent to the methodology used by
the department of workforce development to designate each
career and technical education program under this section.
In addition, the department shall notify all school corporations of the
state board's approval of the report under subsection (e) and provide a
link within the notice to the approved report published on the
department of workforce development's Internet web site website under
this subsection.
SECTION 154. IC 20-49-4-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.189-2023,
SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. The state board may advance money to school
corporations and charter schools to be used for:
(1) school building construction programs; and
(2) subject to IC 20-20-13-7, educational technology programs;
as provided in this chapter.
SECTION 155. IC 21-13-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.232-2025,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. "Fund":
(1) for purposes of IC 21-13-2, refers to the William A. Crawford
minority teacher scholarship fund established by IC 21-13-2-1;
(2) for purposes of IC 21-13-4, refers to the National Guard
HEA 1004 — Concur

172
tuition supplement program fund established by IC 21-13-4-1;
(3) for purposes of IC 21-13-5, refers to the National Guard
scholarship extension fund established by IC 21-13-5-1;
(4) for purposes of IC 21-13-6, refers to the primary care
physician loan forgiveness fund established by IC 21-13-6-3;
(5) (4) for purposes of IC 21-13-6.5, refers to the medical
residency education fund established by IC 21-13-6.5-1; and
(6) (5) for purposes of IC 21-13-12, refers to the county deputy
prosecuting attorney and public defender scholarship fund
established by IC 21-13-12-6.
SECTION 156. IC 21-13-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Primary Care Physician Loan Forgiveness Program).
SECTION 157. IC 21-18-21-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 251, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The commission shall biennially
prepare a plan for implementing postsecondary career and technical
education programming after considering the long range state plan
developed under IC 20-20-38-4. IC 20-20.5-10-4. The commission
shall submit the plan to the state board for its review and
recommendations. The commission shall specifically report on how the
plan addresses preparation for employment.
SECTION 158. IC 21-18-21-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 251, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The commission may make
recommendations to the state board concerning the legislative budget
requests prepared under IC 20-20-38-12 IC 20-20.5-10-12 by state
educational institutions for state funds for career and technical
education.
SECTION 159. IC 21-18.5-6-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 9. The cost of performing a team onsite investigation for
purposes of section 8 of this chapter shall be paid by the applicant
postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institution.
However, the total cost of an inspection, including room, board, and
mileage that does not require travel outside Indiana, may not exceed
one thousand dollars ($1,000) for any one (1) postsecondary credit
bearing proprietary educational institution.
SECTION 160. IC 21-38-1-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 9. "Endowment" refers to an endowment described in
IC 21-38-8-2.
SECTION 161. IC 21-38-1-13, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 279, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. "Fund",
HEA 1004 — Concur

173
(1) for purposes of IC 21-38-7, refers to the Indiana state teachers'
retirement fund established by IC 5-10.4-2-1. and
(2) for purposes of IC 21-38-8, refers to the Indiana excellence in
teaching endowment established under IC 21-38-8-2.
SECTION 162. IC 21-38-1-14, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 279, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. "Fund member", for purposes
of IC 21-38-7, means an individual who qualifies for membership in
the fund described in section 13(1) 13 of this chapter under
IC 5-10.4-4-1.
SECTION 163. IC 21-38-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Indiana Excellence in Teaching Endowment).
SECTION 164. IC 21-42-3-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.94-2024,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The definitions in IC 20-18-2 apply
throughout this section.
(b) This section applies to a high school that is:
(1) a public school, including a charter school;
(2) a state accredited nonpublic school; or
(3) an eligible school (as defined in IC 20-51-1-4.7).
(c) If a high school submits to the commission for higher education
an Indiana college core feasibility report under IC 20-30-5-25, the high
school shall submit the report, in a manner prescribed by the
commission for higher education, not later than October 1, 2024.
(d) (c) The commission for higher education, in collaboration with
the department, shall:
(1) review each feasibility report submitted by each high school;
and
(2) provide guidance to the applicable high school on removing
any barriers that prevent or hinder the high school from offering
the Indiana college core.
(e) Not later than December 1, 2025, the commission for higher
education shall do the following:
(1) Prepare a report regarding the following:
(A) The number of high schools that offer and the number of
high schools that do not offer the Indiana college core.
(B) The outcomes of students who earn the Indiana college
core.
(2) Submit the report prepared under subdivision (1) to the:
(A) governor; and
(B) legislative council in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 165. IC 31-16-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.263-2019,
HEA 1004 — Concur

174
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The duty to support a child under this
chapter, which does not include support for educational needs, ceases
when the child becomes nineteen (19) years of age unless any of the
following conditions occurs:
(1) The child is emancipated before becoming nineteen (19) years
of age. In this case the child support, except for the educational
needs outlined in section 2(a)(1) of this chapter, terminates at the
time of emancipation, although an order for educational needs
may continue in effect until further order of the court.
(2) The child is incapacitated. In this case the child support
continues during the incapacity or until further order of the court.
(3) The child:
(A) is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(B) has not attended a secondary school or postsecondary
educational institution for the prior four (4) months and is not
enrolled in a secondary school or postsecondary educational
institution; and
(C) is or is capable of supporting himself or herself through
employment.
In this case the child support terminates upon the court's finding
that the conditions prescribed in this subdivision exist. However,
if the court finds that the conditions set forth in clauses (A)
through (C) are met but that the child is only partially supporting
or is capable of only partially supporting himself or herself, the
court may order that support be modified instead of terminated.
(4) The child is a full-time student in a secondary school (as
defined in IC 20-18-2-18(a)) IC 20-18-2-18) and a parent or
guardian of the child files notice under subsection (c) advising the
court that the child continues or will continue to be enrolled in
secondary school. In this case, the child support:
(1) continues until; and
(2) terminates upon;
the child's graduation from secondary school.
(b) For purposes of determining if a child is emancipated under
subsection (a)(1), if the court finds that the child:
(1) is on active duty in the United States armed services;
(2) has married; or
(3) is not under the care or control of:
(A) either parent; or
(B) an individual or agency approved by the court;
the court shall find the child emancipated and terminate the child
HEA 1004 — Concur

175
support.
(c) Notice under subsection (a)(4) must:
(1) be filed with the court and provided to each party to the child
support proceeding:
(A) not earlier than the date on which the child becomes
seventeen (17) years of age; and
(B) not later than the date on which the child becomes
nineteen (19) years of age; and
(2) include:
(A) proof of the child's enrollment; and
(B) the child's expected graduation date.
(d) If:
(1) a parent or guardian files a notice under subsection (a)(4); and
(2) an objection or request for a hearing is not filed by a party to
the child support proceeding not later than thirty (30) days after
the party receives the notice;
the court may, without holding a hearing, issue an order continuing
child support through the date on which the child is expected to
graduate.
(e) If a court has established a duty to support a child in a court
order issued before July 1, 2012, the:
(1) parent or guardian of the child; or
(2) child;
may file a petition for educational needs until the child becomes
twenty-one (21) years of age.
(f) If a court has established a duty to support a child in a court
order issued after June 30, 2012, the:
(1) parent or guardian of the child; or
(2) child;
may file a petition for educational needs until the child becomes
nineteen (19) years of age.
(g) If:
(1) an order was issued after June 30, 2012, that denied support
for educational needs to a child who was less than twenty-one
(21) years of age at the time the petition for educational needs
was filed; and
(2) support for educational needs was denied based on the fact
that the child was older than eighteen (18) years of age;
notwithstanding any other law, a parent or guardian of the child or the
child may file with the court a subsequent petition for educational
needs. The court shall consider the petition on the merits in accordance
with this section and may not consider the absence of subsection (e)
HEA 1004 — Concur

176
from law at the time of the initial filing.
SECTION 166. IC 33-24-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.77-2025,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The office of judicial administration shall
do the following:
(1) Examine the administrative and business methods and systems
employed in the offices of the clerks of court and other offices
related to and serving the courts and make recommendations for
necessary improvement.
(2) Collect and compile statistical data and other information on
the judicial work of the courts in Indiana. All justices of the
supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of all trial
courts, and any city or town courts, whether having general or
special jurisdiction, court clerks, court reporters, and other
officers and employees of the courts shall, upon notice by the
chief administrative officer and in compliance with procedures
prescribed by the chief administrative officer, furnish the chief
administrative officer the information as is requested concerning
the nature and volume of judicial business. The information must
include the following:
(A) The volume, condition, and type of business conducted by
the courts.
(B) The methods of procedure in the courts.
(C) The work accomplished by the courts.
(D) The receipt and expenditure of public money by and for
the operation of the courts.
(E) The methods of disposition or termination of cases.
(3) Prepare and publish reports, not less than one (1) or more than
two (2) times per year, on the nature and volume of judicial work
performed by the courts as determined by the information
required in subdivision (2).
(4) Serve the judicial nominating commission and the judicial
qualifications commission in the performance by the commissions
of their statutory and constitutional functions.
(5) Administer the civil legal aid fund as required by IC 33-24-12.
(6) Administer the court technology fund established by section
12 of this chapter.
(7) By December 31, 2013, develop and implement a standard
protocol for sending and receiving court data:
(A) between the protective order registry, established by
IC 5-2-9-5.5, and county court case management systems;
(B) at the option of the prosecuting attorney, for:
HEA 1004 — Concur

177
(i) a prosecuting attorney's case management system;
(ii) a county court case management system; and
(iii) a county court case management system developed and
operated by the office of judicial administration;
to interface with the electronic traffic tickets, as defined by
IC 9-30-3-2.5; and
(C) between county court case management systems and the
case management system developed and operated by the office
of judicial administration.
The standard protocol developed and implemented under this
subdivision shall permit private sector vendors, including vendors
providing service to a local system and vendors accessing the
system for information, to send and receive court information on
an equitable basis and at an equitable cost, and for a case
management system developed and operated by the office of
judicial administration, must include a searchable field for the
name and bail agent license number, if applicable, of the bail
agent or a person authorized by the surety that pays bail for an
individual as described in IC 35-33-8-3.2.
(8) Establish and administer an electronic system for receiving
information that relates to certain individuals who may be
prohibited from possessing a firearm for the purpose of:
(A) transmitting this information to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for inclusion in the NICS; and
(B) beginning July 1, 2021, compiling and publishing certain
statistics related to the confiscation and retention of firearms
as described under section 14 of this chapter.
(9) Establish and administer an electronic system for receiving
drug related felony conviction information from courts. The office
of judicial administration shall notify NPLEx of each drug related
felony entered after June 30, 2012, and do the following:
(A) Provide NPLEx with the following information:
(i) The convicted individual's full name.
(ii) The convicted individual's date of birth.
(iii) The convicted individual's driver's license number, state
personal identification number, or other unique number, if
available.
(iv) The date the individual was convicted of the felony.
Upon receipt of the information from the office of judicial
administration, a stop sale alert must be generated through
NPLEx for each individual reported under this clause.
(B) Notify NPLEx if the felony of an individual reported under
HEA 1004 — Concur

178
clause (A) has been:
(i) set aside;
(ii) reversed;
(iii) expunged; or
(iv) vacated.
Upon receipt of information under this clause, NPLEx shall
remove the stop sale alert issued under clause (A) for the
individual.
(10) After July 1, 2018, establish and administer an electronic
system for receiving from courts felony or misdemeanor
conviction information for each felony or misdemeanor described
in IC 20-28-5-8(c). IC 20-28-5-8(b). The office of judicial
administration shall notify the department of education at least
one (1) time each week of each felony or misdemeanor described
in IC 20-28-5-8(c) IC 20-28-5-8(b) entered after July 1, 2018,
and do the following:
(A) Provide the department of education with the following
information:
(i) The convicted individual's full name.
(ii) The convicted individual's date of birth.
(iii) The convicted individual's driver's license number, state
personal identification number, or other unique number, if
available.
(iv) The date the individual was convicted of the felony or
misdemeanor.
(B) Notify the department of education if the felony or
misdemeanor of an individual reported under clause (A) has
been:
(i) set aside;
(ii) reversed; or
(iii) vacated.
(11) Perform legal and administrative duties for the justices as
determined by the justices.
(12) Provide staff support for the judicial conference of Indiana
established in IC 33-38-9.
(13) Work with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
to identify and address the needs of veterans in the court system.
(14) If necessary for purposes of IC 35-47-16-1, issue a retired
judicial officer an identification card identifying the retired
judicial officer as a retired judicial officer.
(15) Establish and administer the statewide juvenile justice data
aggregation plan established under section 12.5 of this chapter.
HEA 1004 — Concur

179
(16) Create and make available an application for detention to be
used in proceedings under IC 12-26-5 (mental health detention,
commitment, and treatment).
(17) Create and make available a uniform form to assist a court in
making an indigency determination under IC 35-33-7-6.5.
(18) Before July 1, 2025, establish and administer an electronic
system for:
(A) receiving a request for a chronological case summary
from; and
(B) transmitting a chronological case summary to;
the state police department for purposes of expungement or
sealing of records.
(b) All forms to be used in gathering data must be approved by the
supreme court and shall be distributed to all judges and clerks before
the start of each period for which reports are required.
(c) The office of judicial administration may adopt rules to
implement this section.
SECTION 167. IC 34-13-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 182, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A governmental entity or an
employee acting within the scope of the employee's employment is not
liable if a loss results from the following:
(1) The natural condition of unimproved property.
(2) The condition of a reservoir, dam, canal, conduit, drain, or
similar structure when used by a person for a purpose that is not
foreseeable.
(3) The temporary condition of a public thoroughfare or extreme
sport area that results from weather.
(4) The condition of an unpaved road, trail, or footpath, the
purpose of which is to provide access to a recreation or scenic
area.
(5) The design, construction, control, operation, or normal
condition of an extreme sport area, if all entrances to the extreme
sport area are marked with:
(A) a set of rules governing the use of the extreme sport area;
(B) a warning concerning the hazards and dangers associated
with the use of the extreme sport area; and
(C) a statement that the extreme sport area may be used only
by persons operating extreme sport equipment.
This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a governmental
entity from liability for the continuing duty to maintain extreme
sports areas in a reasonably safe condition.
HEA 1004 — Concur

180
(6) The initiation of a judicial or an administrative proceeding.
(7) The performance of a discretionary function; however, the
provision of medical or optical care as provided in IC 34-6-2.1-54
shall be considered as a ministerial act.
(8) The adoption and enforcement of or failure to adopt or
enforce:
(A) a law (including rules and regulations); or
(B) in the case of a public school or charter school, a policy;
unless the act of enforcement constitutes false arrest or false
imprisonment.
(9) An act or omission performed in good faith and without
malice under the apparent authority of a statute which is invalid
if the employee would not have been liable had the statute been
valid.
(10) The act or omission of anyone other than the governmental
entity or the governmental entity's employee.
(11) The issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation of, or failure
or refusal to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any permit, license,
certificate, approval, order, or similar authorization, where the
authority is discretionary under the law.
(12) Failure to make an inspection, or making an inadequate or
negligent inspection, of any property, other than the property of
a governmental entity, to determine whether the property
complied with or violates any law or contains a hazard to health
or safety.
(13) Entry upon any property where the entry is expressly or
impliedly authorized by law.
(14) Misrepresentation if unintentional.
(15) Theft by another person of money in the employee's official
custody, unless the loss was sustained because of the employee's
own negligent or wrongful act or omission.
(16) Injury to the property of a person under the jurisdiction and
control of the department of correction if the person has not
exhausted the administrative remedies and procedures provided
by section 7 of this chapter.
(17) Injury to the person or property of a person under supervision
of a governmental entity and who is:
(A) on probation;
(B) assigned to an alcohol and drug services program under
IC 12-23, a minimum security release program under
IC 11-10-8, a pretrial conditional release program under
IC 35-33-8, or a community corrections program under
HEA 1004 — Concur

181
IC 11-12; or
(C) subject to a court order requiring the person to be escorted
by a county police officer while on or in a government
building (as defined in IC 36-9-13-3) owned by a county
building authority under IC 36-9-13, unless the injury is the
result of an act or omission amounting to:
(i) gross negligence;
(ii) willful or wanton misconduct; or
(iii) intentional misconduct.
(18) Design of a highway (as defined in IC 9-13-2-73), toll road
project (as defined in IC 8-15-2-4(4)), tollway (as defined in
IC 8-15-3-7), or project (as defined in IC 8-15.7-2-14) if the
claimed loss occurs at least twenty (20) years after the public
highway, toll road project, tollway, or project was designed or
substantially redesigned; except that this subdivision shall not be
construed to relieve a responsible governmental entity from the
continuing duty to provide and maintain public highways in a
reasonably safe condition.
(19) Development, adoption, implementation, operation,
maintenance, or use of an enhanced emergency communication
system.
(20) Injury to a student or a student's property by an employee of
a school corporation if the employee is acting reasonably under a:
(A) discipline policy adopted under IC 20-33-8-12; or
(B) restraint and seclusion plan adopted under IC 20-20-40-14.
IC 20-20.5-13-16.
(21) An act or omission performed in good faith under the
apparent authority of a court order described in IC 35-46-1-15.1
or IC 35-46-1-15.3 that is invalid, including an arrest or
imprisonment related to the enforcement of the court order, if the
governmental entity or employee would not have been liable had
the court order been valid.
(22) An act taken to investigate or remediate hazardous
substances, petroleum, or other pollutants associated with a
brownfield (as defined in IC 13-11-2-19.3) unless:
(A) the loss is a result of reckless conduct; or
(B) the governmental entity was responsible for the initial
placement of the hazardous substances, petroleum, or other
pollutants on the brownfield.
(23) The operation of an off-road vehicle (as defined in
IC 14-8-2-185) by a nongovernmental employee, or by a
governmental employee not acting within the scope of the
HEA 1004 — Concur

182
employment of the employee, on a public highway in a county
road system outside the corporate limits of a city or town, unless
the loss is the result of an act or omission amounting to:
(A) gross negligence;
(B) willful or wanton misconduct; or
(C) intentional misconduct.
This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a governmental
entity from liability for the continuing duty to maintain highways
in a reasonably safe condition for the operation of motor vehicles
licensed by the bureau of motor vehicles for operation on public
highways.
(24) Any act or omission rendered in connection with a request,
investigation, assessment, or opinion provided under
IC 36-9-28.7.
(b) This subsection applies to a cause of action that accrues during
a period of a state disaster emergency declared under IC 10-14-3-12 to
respond to COVID-19, if the state of disaster emergency was declared
after February 29, 2020, and before April 1, 2022. A governmental
entity or an employee acting within the scope of the employee's
employment is not liable for an act or omission arising from COVID-19
unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence, willful or
wanton misconduct, or intentional misrepresentation. If a claim
described in this subsection is:
(1) a claim for injury or death resulting from medical malpractice;
and
(2) not barred by the immunity provided under this subsection;
the claimant is required to comply with all of the provisions of
IC 34-18 (medical malpractice act).
SECTION 168. IC 34-30-2.1-269, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 269. IC 20-20-40-15 IC 20-20.5-13-17
(Concerning actions taken to promote student conduct under a restraint
and seclusion plan).
SECTION 169. IC 35-50-10-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.43-2021,
SECTION 145, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this section,
"offense requiring license revocation" means an offense listed in
IC 20-28-5-8(c). IC 20-28-5-8(b).
(b) If an individual is or was a teacher in a school corporation,
charter school, or nonpublic school and is convicted of an offense
requiring license revocation, the judge who presided over the trial or
accepted a plea agreement shall give written notice of the conviction
HEA 1004 — Concur

183
to the secretary of education and the chief administrative officer of the
school corporation, charter school, or nonpublic school, or, if the
individual is employed in a public school, the superintendent of the
school district in which the individual is employed.
(c) Notice under subsection (b) must occur not later than seven (7)
days after the date the judgment is entered.
(d) The notification sent to a school or school district under
subsection (b) must include only the felony for which the individual
was convicted.
(e) If a judge later modifies the individual's sentence after giving
notice under this section, the judge shall notify the school or the school
district of the modification.
(f) After receiving a notification under subsection (b), the secretary
of education shall initiate procedures to revoke the individual's license
to teach.
SECTION 170. IC 36-1-7-13 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 13. Whenever an agreement authorized by this chapter
is between school corporations, teachers employed under the
agreement have the same rights and privileges as teachers employed
under IC 20-26-10-5, IC 20-26-10-6, and IC 20-26-10-7.
SECTION 171. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) 512 IAC 4-1-3(b)
is void. The publisher of the Indiana Administrative Code and
Indiana Register shall remove this rule from the Indiana
Administrative Code.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
HEA 1004 — Concur

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1004 — Concur